S.  HRG.  109–1094 

REVIEW  OF  THE  UNITED  STATES’  CLIMATE 
POLICY,  THE  $5  BILLION  BUDGET  REQUEST 

FOR  CLIMATE–RELATED  SCIENCE  AND 
TECHNOLOGY  IN  FISCAL  YEAR  2006 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON GLOBAL CLIMATE CHANGE 

AND IMPACTS 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JULY  20,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

62–359 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office,

http://bookstore.gpo.gov. For more information, contact the GPO Customer Contact Center,

U.S. Government Printing Office. Phone 202–512–1800, or 866–512–1800 (toll-free). E-mail, gpo@custhelp.com.

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  GLOBAL  CLIMATE  CHANGE  AND  IMPACTS 

DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 

FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey, 

Ranking 

JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on July 20, 2005 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Vitter  ....................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Cicerone, Ralph J., Ph.D., President, National Academy of Sciences  .................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Conover,  David  W.,  Principal  Deputy  Assistant  Secretary,  Office  of  Policy 
and  International  Affairs;  Director,  U.S.  Climate  Change  Technology  Pro-
gram, Department of Energy 
..............................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Mahoney, Hon. James R., Ph.D., Assistant Secretary of Commerce for Oceans 
and Atmosphere; Deputy Administrator, National Oceanic and Atmospheric 
Administration (NOAA)  .......................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Reifsnyder,  Daniel  A.,  Director,  Office  of  Global  Change,  Bureau  of  Oceans 
and  International  Environmental  and  Scientific  Affairs,  Department  of 
State  ......................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Dr. James R. Mahoney 

Response  to  written  question  submitted  by  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye  to 
........................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lautenberg  to: 
Dr. Ralph J. Cicerone  .......................................................................................
David W. Conover  .............................................................................................
Hon. James R. Mahoney  ..................................................................................
Daniel A. Reifsnyder  ........................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. John F. Kerry to: 

David W. Conover  .............................................................................................
Hon. James R. Mahoney  ..................................................................................
Response to written questions submitted by Hon. John McCain to Hon. James 
R. Mahoney  ...........................................................................................................

Page 
1 
3 
44 
1 

28 
30 

14 
16 

5 
7 

22 
24 

53 

66 
68 
61 
67 

69 
54 

62 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

REVIEW  OF  THE  UNITED  STATES’  CLIMATE 
POLICY,  THE  $5  BILLION  BUDGET  REQUEST 
FOR  CLIMATE–RELATED  SCIENCE  AND 
TECHNOLOGY  IN  FISCAL  YEAR  2006 

WEDNESDAY,  JULY  20,  2005 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON GLOBAL CLIMATE CHANGE AND IMPACTS, 
COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10:30 a.m. in room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  David  Vitter,  Chair-
man of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID VITTER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM LOUISIANA 

Senator VITTER. Good morning, I’m very excited to hold this first 
hearing  of  the  Subcommittee  on  Global  Climate  Change  and  Im-
pacts. This hearing will focus on our national climate strategy with 
particular  focus  on  two  things:  first,  the  Administration’s  Fiscal 
Year  2006  budget  request  for  climate-related  science  and  tech-
nology  programs;  and  second,  how  our  climate  policy  may  be  ef-
fected  by  the  recent  G8  Summit  in  Scotland,  and  other  inter-
national  climate  forums  later  this  year.  I’m  really  not  sure  whose 
idea  it  was  to  give  a  freshman  a  gavel,  but  I  like  the  idea,  it’s  the 
first time I’ve actually been able to sit up here, at least when other 
people were in the room. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  VITTER.  So,  it’s  great  to  be  here  to  chair  this.  Seriously, 
though, it’s a very important topic, and I expect the Subcommittee 
to spend a lot of time on this topic in Congress, this is only the first 
in  a  series  of  hearings  that  I  plan  to  pursue  on  the  issue.  As  you 
know,  the  Commerce  Committee  has  very  broad  jurisdiction  in  re-
gard  to  climate  change,  we  intend  to  exert  our  full  authority  over 
that  issue,  the  Science  Program,  the  Technology  Program,  the 
agencies  that  will  be  responding  to  the  changes  caused  by  climatic 
variability;  therefore,  all  of  you  should  get  comfortable  here,  be-
cause  I  know  we’re  going  to  be  delving  into  this  issue  very  seri-
ously. 

As  the  President  recently  confirmed  at  the  G8  Summit  in  Scot-
land,  the  United  States  has  spent  over  $20  billion  in  climate-re-
lated  science  and  technology  programs,  clearly  much  more  than 
any  other  nation.  In  addition  to  half  a  billion  dollars  in  tax  incen-
tives,  the  President  has  also  requested  an  additional  $5  billion  for 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

these  programs  in  Fiscal  Year  2006  alone.  It’s  a  tremendous 
amount of money, and I’m very interested to learn of our witnesses’ 
plans  for  2006,  how  this  relates  to  our  larger  policies  on  climate 
change,  and  our  role  in  the  international  community.  My  top  pri-
ority here is ensuring that our taxpayers are getting their money’s 
worth,  there  are  a  lot  of  things  any  of  us  could  decide  to  do  with 
$5 billion, and I hope you are, and will continue to provide tangible 
results for our country and the world. 

In  addition,  the  Senate  recently  passed  comprehensive  energy 
legislation which is now in conference. This is critical, and overdue, 
to  our  national  energy  policy  and  includes  a  number  of  the  impor-
tant  policy  changes  that  reflect  the  advances  in  our  science  and 
technological  base,  and  I  think  it’s  a  really  good  step  forward  for 
our country. 

Finally,  many  people  have  used  some  of  the  temperature  trends 
and  climate  changes  and  their  potential  effects  as  something  that 
our  children  and  grandchildren  will  have  to  deal  with,  however, 
some  of  those  changes  we’re  experiencing,  for  instance,  in  Alaskan 
villages  today,  really  cannot  wait  that  long.  I’m  certain  Chairman 
Stevens will pay particular attention to this as the Committee con-
ducts its work this Congress, and if I know what’s good for me, this 
Subcommittee  will  have  particular  focus  on  that,  probably  with 
field  hearings  on  that  as  well.  That  is  one  of  the  very  specific  and 
concrete,  and  important,  impacts  that  the  name  of  this  Sub-
committee directly refers to, because it is about climate change and 
impacts. 

Being  from  Louisiana,  I  would  be  remiss  if  I  didn’t  mention  an-
other  very  important,  specific  impact  that  we  will  also  touch  on 
this  Congress,  and  that  is  coastal  erosion  in  Louisiana.  In  Lou-
isiana we lose up to 35 square miles a year due to coastal erosion, 
that  is  a  football  field  of  land  every  38  minutes.  Recent  reports  by 
NOAA  and  USGS  show  that  these  same  areas  are  also  sinking 
through  subsidence  faster  than  anywhere  else  in  the  world.  Some 
areas of coastal Louisiana have dropped over 20 inches in the past 
decade, almost two feet, and so we’re experiencing the practical ef-
fects  of  sea  level  rise  in  Louisiana,  and  we’re  going  to  need  to  ad-
dress these problems as well. 

Before  we  move  on  to  the  Ranking  Member’s  statement,  I  would 
like  to  quickly  acknowledge  that  Dr.  Mahoney  announced  his  re-
tirement  yesterday.  Dr.  Mahoney  is  the  Assistant  Secretary  of 
Commerce,  and  Director  of  our  Climate  Science  Program.  Doctor, 
I  know  you’re  not  leaving  right  away,  but  I  want  to  thank  you  for 
your  service,  standing  up  for  a  science  program  involving  13  dif-
ferent agencies is an extraordinary task, and I know you and your 
family  have  been  through  a  lot  lately,  so  thank  you  for  all  of  that 
service.  We  certainly  wish  you  and  your  family  the  best  in  all  of 
your future endeavors. 

Dr. MAHONEY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator VITTER. Absolutely, and with that, let me turn it over to 

Senator Lautenberg, the Ranking Member. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thanks  Mr.  Chairman,  this  is  a  kind  of  a 
new  experience  for  each  of  us,  neither  one  of  us  are  new  to  the 
Congress,  but  this  is  a  Committee  just  identified  in  this  last  year, 
and  so  we  have  an  important  task.  I  look  forward  to  working  with 
Senator  Vitter,  and  I  hope  that  we  will  get  ourselves  going  in  a 
way that identifies the seriousness of some of the problems that we 
have seen, and that Dr. Mahoney—we’re sorry to see you leaving— 
but  we  look  forward  to  hearing  anything  that  you’ve  got  to  say, 
even after you’ve left. 

So,  Mr.  Chairman,  thanks  for  convening  the  hearing,  I  look  for-
ward  to  working  with  you  on  this  issue.  Climate  change,  or  global 
warming,  is  one  of  the  most  daunting  challenges  affecting  our  fu-
ture, and I’m concerned that we’re not treating it with the urgency 
that it deserves. Now, if one found out that their house was on fire, 
they  would  immediately  call  the  fire  department.  They  wouldn’t 
wait  until  all  the  neighbors  agreed  about  how  long  the  fire  had 
been burning, or about how much damage it would do. You would, 
immediately,  when  you  see  it  and  feel  it,  you  would  call  the  fire-
men to put it out. Well, that’s my feeling about global warming, we 
know that the Earth is getting hotter, the four warmest years ever 
recorded were in 1998, 2002, 2003, and 2004, and judging by recent 
temperature  levels  around  here,  it  looks  like  we’re  headed  for  an 
unenviable  new  record.  The  10  hottest  years  we’ve  experienced 
have  all  occurred  since  1987,  that  grouping  tells  you  something. 
The  last  55  years,  the  volume  of  ice  in  the  Arctic  Ocean  has  been 
reduced  by  45  percent,  and  the  Chairman  mentioned  what  kind  of 
loss they’ve had of land in the area around Louisiana. 

As  this  ice  has  melted,  sea  levels  have  risen  around  the  world, 
and  in  New  Jersey,  the  sea  rose  about  17  inches  in  the  last  cen-
tury.  Now,  we  also  know  that  burning  fossil  fuel  produces  carbon 
dioxide  and  methane,  and  they  are  the  two  most  important  gases 
that  intensify  the  Earth’s  natural  greenhouse  effect,  and  these  are 
the  facts:  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  recently  released  a 
joint  statement  with  the  Science  Academies  of  ten  other  nations. 
They  declared  that  scientific  evidence  of  global  warming  is  solid 
enough  to  warrant  mandatory  reduction  of  greenhouse  gases.  It’s 
the  strongest  statement  yet  from  the  National  Academy  of 
Sciences,  and  it  represents  the  overwhelming  consensus  of  the 
world  scientific  community.  It’s  time  for  action.  The  United  States 
must  provide  the  leadership.  We  have  the  leadership  position  that 
dominates  so  much  of  the  world,  and  we  have  a  responsibility  to 
accept  that  leadership  and  put  it  into  place.  With  only  4  percent 
of  the  world’s  population,  we  produce  25  percent  of  all  greenhouse 
gases,  and  if  we  fail  to  act,  how  can  we  expect  other  countries  to 
pick  up  their  share  of  the  burden?  Most  of  us  realize  the  serious-
ness of the issue, and that is why we’re spending $5 billion a year 
on  climate  science  and  climate  technologies.  Our  Subcommittee  is 
responsible  for  seeing  that  these  studies  are  delivered  in  a  timely 
manner and that they are free of political spin. 

Now,  unfortunately,  we’ve  seen  both,  spinning  and  delays.  We 
had  a  White  House  official,  Mr.  Cooney  by  name,  a  man  with  no 
scientific  background,  editing  reports  on  global  warming,  and  now 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

he’s  gone  back  to  work  for  the  oil  industry  where  he  was  before. 
A national climate assessment from the Administration was due to 
Congress  a  year  ago,  but  we  still  haven’t  seen  it,  and  there  is  evi-
dently  no  plan  to  produce  it.  And  to  those  who  say  there’s  nothing 
we  can  do  about  global  warming,  I  would  point  to  my  home  state, 
New  Jersey,  has  an  aggressive  program  for  reducing  greenhouse 
gases, major state utilities have established data registries to track 
emissions,  and  to  those  who  say,  ‘‘It  costs  too  much,’’  I  ask,  what 
is  the  cost  of  doing  nothing?  What  would  be  the  economic  impact 
if  the  State  of  Florida  is  under  water,  or  if  the  sea  rises  another 
two  feet  along  New  Jersey’s  125  miles  of  shore,  as  it  is  projected 
to  do  by  the  end  of  this  century  if  we  fail  to  take  action.  Left  un-
checked,  global  warming  will  ravage  our  environment  and  our 
economy,  and  it  is  not  the  legacy  that  I  as  a  grandfather  want  to 
leave  for  my  10  grandchildren.  They  are  my  most  precious  assets, 
and  I  think  I  owe  it  to  them  to  at  least  give  them  a  chance  to 
breathe  clean  air,  to  be  able  to  drink  water  that’s  not  contami-
nated,  and  to  live  in  a  world  in  which  we  don’t  have  natural 
changes that bring us nothing but problems. 

There’s  one  more  indisputable  fact  about  global  warming,  that 
we  can’t  do  anything  in  the  short-term  to  reverse  it.  So,  it  means 
long-term  planning,  long-term  investment.  Carbon  dioxide  is  a 
long-lived gas, and once it’s released into our atmosphere, it pretty 
much  stays  there.  We  can’t  reverse  global  warming,  we  can  only 
slow it down by reducing greenhouse gas emissions. Every day that 
we fail to act is lost forever. 

Now, I took the time a couple of years ago to go down to Antarc-
tica  to  visit  the  South  Pole,  and  to  see  what  the  National  Science 
Foundation  was  doing  there,  and  you  could  almost  hear  the  pain 
that  the  ice  structure  was  feeling.  The  groaning  at  night,  and  no 
nights  at  that  time,  barely  any  that  were  going  through  the  reac-
tion. And then to see these huge chunks of ice floating off into the 
ocean,  and  where  we  had  70  percent  of  the  world’s  fresh  water 
stored in that ice, that’s rapidly disappearing. 

And  in  Australia,  kids  have  to  wear  full  bathing  suits  before 
they’re allowed to go out on the beach because of the threat of skin 
cancer,  because  of  the  global  warming  and  the  hole  in  the  ozone 
layers, so Mr. Chairman, we’ve got a lot to do, and I thank you for 
giving  us  the  opportunity  to  begin  our  work  on  such  an  important 
issue. 

Senator  VITTER.  Thank  you,  Senator,  and  now  we’ll  move  to  our 

distinguished panel. 

We  have  the  Honorable  James  Richard  Mahoney,  Assistant  Sec-
retary  for  Oceans  and  Atmosphere,  and  also  Director  of  the  Cli-
mate  Science  Program  in  the  U.S.  Department  of  Commerce;  Dr. 
David Conover, Principal Deputy Assistant Secretary, Office of Pol-
icy  and  International  Affairs;  Director,  U.S.  Climate  Change  Tech-
nology  Program,  in  the  U.S.  Department  of  Energy;  Mr.  Daniel 
Reifsnyder, Director of the Office of Global Change in the U.S. De-
partment of State; and, Dr. Ralph J. Cicerone, President of the Na-
tional Academy of Sciences. Thank you all for being here today and 
participating  in  our  hearing,  and  we  will  start  with  Dr.  Mahoney. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

STATEMENT OF HON. JAMES R. MAHONEY, PH.D., 

ASSISTANT SECRETARY OF COMMERCE FOR OCEANS 

AND ATMOSPHERE; DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR, NATIONAL 
OCEANIC AND ATMOSPHERIC ADMINISTRATION (NOAA) 

Dr. MAHONEY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and thank you to Sen-
ator  Lautenberg,  also.  I’m  pleased  to  be  here  today,  since  you  gra-
ciously  mentioned  my  health  challenges  and  my  just-announced 
plan  to  retire,  I  want  to  note  for  the  record,  as  I  begin  my  state-
ment, that I am doing that on the basis that I will stay in my post 
through  the  time  when  my  successor  is  confirmed  and  ready  to 
begin, so I understand—and my supervisors do, too—that that may 
be  months,  it  may  be  the  end  of  the  year,  or  beyond.  So,  I  wanted 
to be clear for the record that I don’t view today to be a statement, 
and then I’m leaving, unfortunately because I had been very much 
looking  forward  to  working  through  this  term  of  the  President,  it 
is  the  responsible  thing  for  me  to  step  down  because  of  the  health 
challenges  I’ve  had,  but  I  don’t  intend  to  be  off-the-scene  right 
away.  And  I  look  forward  to  dialoguing  with  you,  and  responding 
to  some  of  the  very  serious  questions  and  challenges,  including 
some  that  have  been  brought  to  our  attention  quite  recently,  so  I 
would just note that for the record in the beginning. 

I’ll  get  along  with  my  statement,  I’m  obviously  very  pleased  to 
appear  here  today,  and  I  want  to  start  by  noting  that  President 
Bush  certainly  recognizes  climate  change  to  be  a  very  important 
issue  for  us  to  address,  and  in  fact,  the  same  metric  that  you 
cited—while  there  are  many  others—the  fact  that  the  President 
has,  among  other  things,  requested  a  budget  this  year,  as  in  prior 
years, of more than $5 billion, represents his commitment to under-
standing the depth of the problem, and taking action, so I want to 
note that at the beginning of my statement. 

I also want to note the statement that he made at the event, the 
evening before the G8 session began recently. He said, specifically, 
‘‘We  note  that  the  surface  of  the  earth  is  warmer  and  that  an  in-
crease in greenhouse gases caused by humans is contributing to the 
problem.’’ And I note, of course, that the research that we’re doing, 
and  the  technology  development  we’re  doing  is  aimed  at  directly 
addressing those matters. 

So,  I  want  to  begin  with  that,  and  then  I’ll  move  along  with  the 
rest  of  my  statement  here.  In  mid-2001,  and  then  again  in  Feb-
ruary  of  2002,  the  President  set  out  a  new  program  for  strength-
ening  the  approach  to  the  research  and  technology  development 
that this government is following, and he created both the U.S. Cli-
mate  Change  Science  Program,  and  the  related  Climate  Change 
Technology Program, both building on the work that had been done 
over  the  decade  before,  at  that  time.  He  furthered  these  commit-
ments  with  the  many  discussions  he  had  at  the  G8  meeting,  and 
we’ve seen the outcome of that just recently. 

The  Climate  Change  Science  Program,  as  the  Chairman  indi-
cated,  integrates  the  work  of  13  Federal  agencies,  addressing  the 
climate  change  issue.  I  will  focus  on  that,  my  colleague,  of  course, 
David  Conover  will  address  the  technology  side  directly,  although 
I think we’re most ready to answer collaborative questions as they 
may arise. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

While I note the budget number is approximately $2 billion, with 
one  more  digit  accuracy,  the  request  this  year  for  the  13  agencies 
combined  is  about  $1.8,  or  even  more  accurately,  $1.83  billion.  So, 
for  those  to  whom  another  $170  million  is  a  difference,  it  is  not 
quite  two  billion,  it’s  a  little  bit  less,  but  it’s  in  the  range  of  the 
request in recent years. 

Briefly describing, giving the initiative that this subcommittee is 
now  taking,  what  we  have  done  with  the  Program,  we  began  with 
the President’s initiatives, and actually, they were pretty much co- 
terminous  with  my  swearing  into  my  post  in  early  2002,  as  well. 
We began with an inventory of the research programs that the Fed-
eral  agencies  were  conducting  at  that  time,  to  set  out  to  refresh, 
and re-prioritize, and re-budget, that kind of inventory of programs 
has  been  continued  annually,  since  then  and  in  the  process  of  try-
ing  to  increase  the  prioritization,  and  make  sure  that  we  don’t  get 
in  the  pattern  of  ‘‘same  old,  same  old’’  where  we  repeat  the  work 
from  the  year  before  and  we  have  set  a  mark  specifically.  While 
much work needs to continue because it relates to long-term trends 
and  analyses,  but  we  have  set  a  mark  in  our  prioritization  and 
budgeting, aimed specifically at assuring that even at a level budg-
et  environment  that  we  are,  in  fact,  pursuing  initiatives,  which 
means,  automatically,  that  we’re  also  letting  fall  off  the  bottom  of 
that distribution some things in order to keep our budgets level in 
that period. 

I  want  to  note  in  background  that  just  2  years  ago  this  month, 
almost  this  day,  3  days  from  now,  we  released  a  massive  strategic 
plan for our climate science program work that had been developed 
over  the  better  part  of  the  year  before  with  massive  public  input, 
massive  input  by  the  science  community.  We  had  a  workshop 
which  was  attended  by  about  1,300  climate  scientists  from  around 
the world to discuss and debate the draft of that plan. We engaged 
the  National  Academy  of  Sciences,  from  whose  President  you  will 
hear  shortly  here,  to  review  not  only  our  draft,  but  we  specifically 
engaged  them  to  review  the  draft  and  make  comments,  and  stay 
on  board  to  review  the  final  version  that  resulted  from  all  of  the 
earlier  comments,  their  own  included.  I  note  for  the  record,  it’s  in 
my statement, to say briefly, the Academy heavily praised the plan 
for  balance,  I  also  note  that  they  raised  many  cautions,  and  they 
raised  many  issues  that  needed  special  attention.  But  if  I  could 
quote  just  one  sentence  from  their  report,  it  was  that  ‘‘the  revised 
strategic  plan,  having  in  mind  the  changes  that  have  been  made, 
is  much  improved  over  the  first  draft,  and  now  includes  the  ele-
ments  of  management  framework  that  can  permit  it  to  effectively 
guide  research  on  climate  and  associated  global  change  over  the 
next decades.’’ 

I’ll  quickly  go  on  to  note,  we  produce  an  annual  report  on  Our 
Changing Planet, and I want to say in the work we’re trying to do 
to develop our scientific information in a form to deliver for the de-
cision process, we have taken a three-step framework. 

The  first  step  is  to  develop  very  detailed  synthesis  and  assess-
ment  products  aimed  at  getting  us  the  best  current  view  on  the 
state-of-science, and the state-of-relevant-science in the areas we’re 
concerned  with.  This  is  especially  important  because  there’s  so 
much  that  adds  in  quickly  in  our  science,  that  if  we  don’t  really 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

challenge  ourselves  and  get  the  best  approach  with  good  peer  re-
view on this, we’re really stuck. So, we’re doing that, we’re working 
on  adaptive  management  for  planning  for  climate  change,  this 
means  addressing  questions  of  drought,  fire  suppression,  agri-
culture, coastal development and so forth, and that’s all a big part 
of this, and at the end of the day, we’re dealing with the questions 
of  the  use  of  our  rapidly  expanding  climate  modeling  capability  to 
address the policy questions about what is the U.S. role, and what 
are the world roles in dealing with the climate change. 

Let  me  just  note  for  the  record,  too,  that  when  we  look  at  our 
science  advancement,  we  tend  to  look  in  three  areas.  First,  detec-
tion—how well do we know what is really changing in the climate, 
since the climate record is, in any case, a noisy record, and the key 
issue  is  how  well  can  we  segregate  real  change  from  the  normal 
variability. 

Second, attribution—how well can we segregate between natural 
variability and human influences, because that is core to the issue 
of  our  ability  to  make  plans  to  mitigate  those  human  influences 
over time. 

Third is projection—if we have all of that, how good are our mod-
els and how well can we project going forward, so let me just men-
tion  that.  I  know  my  time  is  about  up,  I  want  to  just  mention  a 
couple of last things. I have in my statement extensive information 
about  the  NOAA  climate  program.  Within  the  overall  Administra-
tion  program,  NOAA  is  a  mission  agency  which,  at  its  core,  is  re-
sponsible,  we  are  responsible  for  developing  scientific  data  and 
using it for weather forecasting, fisheries management, many other 
purposes,  and  you  will  see  extensive  information  about  that  in  my 
statement,  including  dealing  with  El  Nin˜ o  conditions,  western 
drought  conditions,  working  closely  with  the  Western  Governors 
Association,  and  many  other  things,  including  some  important 
international efforts which, for reasons of time I won’t mention fur-
ther. 

I’ll  close  with  just  a  note  on  our  budget  request,  and  I’ll  be  de-
lighted to talk about this more in response to questions as may be 
appropriate.  First  of  all,  speaking  about  NOAA,  we  request  right 
around  $240  million  as  our  part  of  the  climate  program,  and  for 
NOAA’s specific activities in Fiscal Year 2006 request, I’ll mention 
for  the  CCSP  Program,  remember,  I  already  mentioned  $1.83  bil-
lion, and there are some important segregations between long-term 
satellite-based observations and other science work and that, if it’s 
appropriate, we can get to in the questions with all of that. 

Thank you for allowing me to give you this overview, and I’m de-

lighted to work with you and your colleagues, thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Mahoney follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON.  JAMES R.  MAHONEY,  PH.D.,  ASSISTANT SECRETARY 
OF COMMERCE FOR OCEANS AND ATMOSPHERE; DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR, NATIONAL 
OCEANIC AND ATMOSPHERIC ADMINISTRATION (NOAA) 
Good  morning,  Senator  Vitter,  Senator  Lautenberg,  and  members  of  the  Sub-
committee.  I  am  James  R.  Mahoney,  Assistant  Secretary  of  Commerce  and  Deputy 
Administrator  of  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA).  I 
am  also  appearing  today  in  my  capacity  as  Director  of  the  Federal  interagency  Cli-
mate  Change  Science  Program  (CCSP).  I  am  very  pleased  to  have  this  opportunity 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

to  describe  the  progress  of  the  Administration’s  climate  science  program  as  well  as 
the NOAA Climate Program and its contribution to CCSP. 
U.S. Climate Change Science Program 

President George W. Bush recognizes climate change to be an important issue for 
the  United  States  to  address.  On  May  11,  2001,  the  Administration  commissioned 
the  National  Academies 1—National  Research  Council  (NRC)  to  examine  the  state 
of our knowledge and understanding of climate change science. Based on the result-
ing NRC report, and the Administration’s ongoing climate science planning activity, 
President Bush created a new cabinet-level management committee (the Committee 
on Climate Change Science and Technology Integration) in February 2002, to super-
vise  the  approximately  $5  billion  annual  investment  in  climate  change  science  and 
technology.  The  President’s  direction  resulted  in  the  creation  of  the  U.S.  Climate 
Change  Science  Program  (CCSP),  combining  the  existing  U.S.  Global  Change  Re-
search  Program  (USGCRP)  and  the  Climate  Change  Research  Initiative  (CCRI),  as 
well  as  the  creation  of  the  Climate  Change  Technology  Program  (CCTP).  President 
Bush  furthered  these  efforts  at  the  recent  G8  Summit  in  Scotland,  where  the  U.S. 
committed  to  grow  economies,  aid  development,  and  improve  the  environment 
through  technological  innovation  to  achieve  the  combined  goals  of  addressing  cli-
mate change, reducing harmful air pollution and improving energy security. 

The  Climate  Change  Science  Program  integrates  Federal  research  on  global 
change and climate change, as sponsored by thirteen Federal agencies (the National 
Science Foundation (NSF), the Department of Commerce, the Department of Energy 
(DOE),  the  Environmental  Protection  Agency  (EPA),  the  National  Aeronautics  and 
Space Administration (NASA), the Department of State, the Department of the Inte-
rior  (DOI),  the  Department  of  Agriculture  (DOA),  Health  and  Human  Services 
(HHS), the Department of Transportation (DOT), the Department of Defense (DoD), 
U.S.  Agency  for  International  Development  (USAID),  and  the  Smithsonian  Institu-
tion),  and  with  liaisons  in  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy,  the  Council 
on  Environmental  Quality,  the  National  Economic  Council,  and  the  Office  of  Man-
agement and Budget. 

We know that the surface of the Earth is warmer, and that an increase in green-
house  gases  caused  by  humans  is  contributing  to  the  problem.  Research  conducted 
through  CCSP  is  deepening  our  understanding  of  the  interplay  of  natural  and 
human-caused  forces.  CCSP  is  charged  with  investigating  natural  and  human-in-
duced  changes  in  the  Earth’s  global  environmental  system;  monitoring  important 
climate parameters; predicting global change; and providing a sound scientific basis 
for national and international decisionmaking. 

Since  CCSP  was  created,  the  program  has  successfully  integrated  a  wide  range 
of  research,  climate  science  priorities,  and  budgets  of  the  thirteen  CCSP  agencies. 
With an approximately $2 billion annual expenditure, CCSP has taken on the most 
challenging  questions  in  climate  science,  and  is  developing  products  to  convey  the 
most  advanced  state  of  knowledge  to  be  used  by  Federal,  state,  and  local  decision-
makers, resource managers, the science community, the media, and the general pub-
lic.  We  have  identified  several  methods  to  address  these  challenges.  I  briefly  de-
scribe  the  steps  we  have  already  taken,  the  scientific  advances  we  have  achieved, 
and our future directions. 

Inventory  of  Research  Programs:  A  comprehensive  inter-agency  inventory  of 
climate  and  global  change  research  programs  was  initiated  in  May  2002,  and  has 
been updated annually since then. This essential stocktaking exercise (the first con-
ducted  in  several  years)  enhanced  coordination,  efficiency,  and  effectiveness  of  the 
entire research effort. All CCSP agencies participated in this inventory. 

CCSP  Strategic  Plan:  In  July  2003,  CCSP  released  its  Strategic  Plan  for  the 
U.S. Climate Change Science Program, the first comprehensive update of a national 
plan  for  climate  and  global  change  research  since  the  original  U.S.  Global  Change 
Research Program strategy was issued at the inception of the program in 1990. 

We took several steps to ensure that the Plan received extensive public input and 
scientific  review.  The  Administration  released  a  CCSP  Discussion  Draft  Strategic 
Plan  for  public  review  in  November  2002.  The  Discussion  Draft  outlined  a  com-
prehensive, collaborative approach for developing a deeper understanding of climate 
change  and  its  potential  impacts.  It  was  guided  by  the  priority  information  needs 
identified by scientists and stakeholders, both nationally and internationally. 

External  comments,  obtained  through  several  mechanisms,  played  an  important 
role in revising the draft plan. First, CCSP held a workshop, in December 2002, that 
was  attended  by  1,300  scientists  and  other  participants,  including  individuals  from 
47 states and 36 nations. This workshop was designed to facilitate extensive discus-

1 Formerly known as the National Academy of Sciences. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

sion and comments on the draft plan. In addition, written comments on the Discus-
sion  Draft  were  submitted  during  a  public  review  period,  and  amounted  to  nearly 
900  pages  of  input.  Last,  CCSP  commissioned  a  special  committee  of  the  NRC  to 
review the plan. The NRC conveyed its comments and recommendations on the Dis-
cussion Draft in a February 2003 report. 

After  consideration  of  the  extensive  external  input  and  internal  inter-agency  re-
view  process,  the  (revised)  Strategic  Plan  for  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Pro-
gram  was  released  in  July  2003.  In  February  2004,  the  NRC  review  committee 
issued  a  second  public  report,  Implementing  Climate  and  Global  Change  Research: 
A  Review  of  the  Final  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program  Strategic  Plan.  This 
NRC  report  expressed  the  committee’s  conclusions  on  the  content,  objectivity,  qual-
ity,  and  comprehensiveness  of  the  updated  Strategic  Plan,  on  the  process  used  to 
produce  the  Plan,  and  on  the  proposed  process  for  developing  subsequent  findings 
to  be  reported  by  the  CCSP.  The  following  quote  is  taken  from  the  Executive  Sum-
mary of the 2004 NRC report: 

‘‘The  Strategic  Plan  for  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program  articulates  a 
guiding vision, is appropriately ambitious, and is broad in scope. It encompasses 
activities related to areas of long-standing importance, together with new or en-
hanced  cross-disciplinary  efforts.  It  appropriately  plans  for  close  integration 
with  the  complementary  Climate  Change  Technology  Program.  The  CCSP  has 
responded  constructively  to  the  National  Academies  review  and  other  commu-
nity  input  in  revising  the  strategic  plan.  In  fact,  the  approaches  taken  by  the 
CCSP to receive and respond to comments from a large and broad group of sci-
entists and stakeholders, including a two-stage independent review of the plan, 
set a high standard for government research programs. As a result, the revised 
strategic  plan  is  much  improved  over  its  November  2002  draft,  and  now  in-
cludes  the  elements  of  a  strategic  management  framework  that  could  permit  it 
to  effectively  guide  research  on  climate  and  associated  global  changes  over  the 
next  decades.  Advancing  science  on  all  fronts  identified  by  the  program  will  be 
of vital importance to the Nation.’’ 

We have frequently noted that the CCSP Strategic Plan is a living document and 
we  look  forward  to  continued  dialogue  with  Congress,  the  NRC,  the  scientific  com-
munity,  and  the  public  throughout  the  implementation  of  the  Plan,  as  the  science 
evolves and priorities change over time. 

Annual  Program  Report,  Our  Changing  Planet:  Our  Changing  Planet  is  an 
annual  report  of  the  CCSP.  This  program  report  is  issued  as  a  Supplement  to  the 
President’s  Fiscal  Year  budgets  and  submitted  to  Congress  pursuant  to  a  require-
ment of the 1990 Global Change Research Act. The document is intended to provide 
summaries  and  related  budget  data  of  ongoing  CCSP-supported  climate  change 
work. 

CCSP Assessment Information to Support Decisionmaking: The CCSP Stra-
tegic  Plan  identified  three  broad  types  of  deliverables  to  be  produced  in  support  of 
enhanced  policy  development  and  decisionmaking  by  national  and  regional  govern-
ment officials, resource managers, planners, and the scientific community. 

(1)  Synthesis  and  Assessment  Products:  Twenty-one  Synthesis  and  Assessment 
Products are identified in the Strategic Plan. These reports are designed to ad-
dress a full range of scientific questions and evaluate options for responses that 
are  of  greatest  relevance  to  decision  and  policymakers  and  planners.  These 
products are intended to provide the best possible state of scientific information, 
developed by a diverse group of climate experts, for the decision community. In 
response  to  an  April  14,  2005  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  report, 
Congressional  inquiries,  and  our  own  internal  assessment,  on  July  15  we  pre-
sented to this committee, and other interested Members, a revision of the sched-
ule  and  scope  of  the  Synthesis  and  Assessment  Products.  We  look  forward  to 
further dialogue with you on these important issues. 
(2)  Adaptive  management  and  planning  for  resources  and  infrastructure: 
‘‘Adaptive management decisions’’ are operational decisions, principally for man-
aging  infrastructure  (e.g.,  waste  water  treatment  systems),  natural  and  man-
aged  resources  (e.g.,  water  supply,  agriculture),  and  societal  response  mecha-
nisms (e.g., health alerts). They typically occur within existing frameworks (e.g., 
legal,  institutional,  economic),  usually  recurring  on  annual  or  shorter  time 
scales.  ‘‘Planning’’  focuses  on  these  and  additional  sectors  (e.g.,  urban  or  re-
gional  planning),  typically  involving  development  of  infrastructure  and  institu-
tions with long lifetimes (several decades or more), and with decision processes 
over  long  timescales  (years  to  decades).  CCSP  research  results,  data  products, 
forecasts, and model results are already being applied to adaptive management 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

and  planning  in  a  number  of  regional  and  sectoral  case  studies.  Specific  exam-
ples  include  climate  observations  and  projections  for  crop  management,  water 
quality  management,  and  urban  planning,  as  well  as  integrated  products  illus-
trating  snowpack,  precipitation,  streamflow,  and  the  potential  for  drought  con-
ditions. 
(3) Support for policymaking: As described in the Strategic Plan, CCSP is focus-
ing on two objectives in the area of support for policymakers: (1) developing sci-
entific  syntheses  and  analytical  frameworks  to  support  integrated  evaluations, 
and (2) initially conducting a limited number of case studies with evaluation of 
the  lessons  learned,  to  guide  future  analyses.  Integrated  analysis  of  climate 
change  is  essential  for  bringing  together  research  from  many  contributing  dis-
ciplines  and  applying  it  to  gain  comparative  insight  into  policy-related  ques-
tions.  Full  integration  of  information  including  research  on  human  activities, 
greenhouse  gas  and  aerosol  emissions,  land-use  and  land-cover  change,  cycling 
of  carbon  and  other  nutrients,  climatic  responses,  and  impacts  on  people,  the 
economy,  and  resources  is  necessary  for  analyses  of  many  important  questions 
about the potential economic and environmental implications of changing green-
house gas concentrations and various technology portfolios. Specific examples of 
this  type  of  work  under  CCSP  include  the  DOE  Integrated  Assessment  of  Cli-
mate  Change  Research  Program  that  sponsors  research  to  develop  comprehen-
sive benefit/cost models for use in assessing the implications of potential climate 
change policies. NOAA, EPA, and NSF sponsor additional studies to improve as-
pects  of  such  models,  and  to  allow  for  the  application  of  the  models  to  address 
particular questions. 

Scientific  Advancements:  CCSP  has  supported  a  highly  integrated  array  of 
Earth  system  observations  as  well  as  a  broad  set  of  new  scientific  information.  A 
large bibliography of new peer-reviewed scientific studies reflecting the advances in 
climate  change  detection,  attribution,  and  projection,  described  below,  will  be  re-
ported  in  the  upcoming  edition  of  Our  Changing  Planet,  and  these  studies  will  be 
reflected in the relevant CCSP Synthesis and Assessment Products. 

Detection:  CCSP-sponsored  observational  and  scientific  studies  have  more  com-
pletely  characterized  the  nature  of  observed  increase  in  surface  temperatures,  and 
have  significantly  advanced  our  understanding  of  observed  variability  in  ocean  sa-
linity  and  heat  content.  CCSP  research  has  also  investigated  changes  in  the  global 
distributions of snowfall and snowpack, and natural fluctuations in ocean circulation 
that influence the transport of heat and energy around the globe. 

Building on the CCSP observations and monitoring strategy identified in its Stra-
tegic Plan, the U.S. Government has taken several steps toward establishing a com-
prehensive,  coordinated,  and  sustained  Earth  observation  system  since  hosting  the 
inaugural  Earth  Observation  Summit  in  June  2003.  CCSP  agencies  have  provided 
leadership,  definition,  and  support  for  the  Earth  Observation  meetings,  and  are 
closely  integrating  the  U.S.  observation  and  data  management  programs  with  the 
international  programs  launched  by  this  effort.  At  the  most  recent  meeting,  the 
Earth  Observation  Summit  III  in  Brussels,  a  ten-year  Implementation  Plan  for  the 
Global  Earth  Observation  System  of  Systems  (GEOSS)  was  adopted,  and  the  60- 
member  intergovernmental  Group  on  Earth  Observations  was  established  to  begin 
implementation  of  the  2-,  6-,  and  10-year  targets  identified  in  the  plan.  The  U.S. 
contribution to GEOSS is the Integrated Earth Observation System (IEOS). In April 
2005,  the  U.S.  Government  Committee  on  Environment  and  Natural  Resources 
(CENR)  released  the  Strategic  Plan  for  the  U.S.  Integrated  Earth  Observation  Sys-
tem  that  addresses  the  policy,  technical,  fiscal,  and  societal  benefit  components  of 
this  integrated  system,  and  established  the  U.S.  Group  on  Earth  Observation 
(USGEO),  a  subcommittee  of  the  National  Science  and  Technology  Council  Com-
mittee on Environment and Natural Resources. 

Attribution: CCSP research also works to establish and understand the most like-
ly  causes  for  climate  change,  with  special  emphasis  on  distinguishing  between  nat-
ural variability and human-induced effects. Recent advances in attribution research 
include  the  use  of  additional  variables  in  climate  models  (e.g.,  salinity,  runoff,  and 
regional-scale attribution) to obtain more insight on the origin of the climate signals 
and trends, as well as expansion of climate models to include improved representa-
tion of aerosols (airborne fine particles) and variability in solar energy output. These 
climate  models,  which  have  been  produced  for  CCSP,  include  improved  representa-
tions of physical processes and increased resolution to effort to enhance our climate 
modeling capabilities. 

Projection:  Through  climate  projections,  CCSP  attempts  to  present  scientifically 
justifiable illustrations of the future climate and its potential impacts upon key ele-
ments of the Earth system. We are working in conjunction with the Climate Change 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

Technology  Program  (CCTP)  to  update  greenhouse  gas  emissions  scenarios  that  in-
corporate  improved  socio-economic  data  and  consider  expanded  use  of  emerging 
technological  options.  These  scenarios  are  being  used  with  a  new  generation  of  cli-
mate  models  to  develop  improved  climate  projections  for  consideration  by  decision- 
makers. 

Expanded  CCSP/NRC  Advisory  Contract:  CCSP  has  recently  expanded  its 
contract with the NRC to incorporate important new elements of NRC advice to the 
program. The enhanced NRC advisory assignment involves three areas: 

(1)  Overall  NRC  advice  on  the  CCSP  research  program  on  a  continuing  basis 
over  the  next  3  years,  involving  an  NRC  committee  with  wide  areas  of  exper-
tise; 
(2)  A  comparative  evaluation  of  relevant  previous  climate  change  assessments 
conducted  around  the  world,  to  provide  background  information  for  the  assess-
ments being prepared by CCSP in compliance with the GCRA; and 
(3)  Designated  support  from  two  existing  committees  of  the  NRC  that  are  well 
positioned  to  support  CCSP  with  expertise  in  areas  central  to  CCSP’s  core  re-
sponsibilities,  the  Climate  Research  Committee  and  the  Committee  on  the 
Human Dimensions of Global Change. 

The  Administration  has  endorsed  the  scope  of  the  expanded  contract  to  ensure 
that  CCSP  receives  independent  and  credible  scientific  advice,  as  CCSP  continues 
to implement its Strategic Plan. 

Climate  Change  Science  Program  Workshop:  Climate  Science  in  Support  of 
Decisionmaking:  CCSP  will  hold  a  public  workshop  November  14–16,  2005,  in  Ar-
lington,  VA.  The  CCSP  Workshop  will  address  the  capability  of  climate  science  to 
inform decision-making and will serve as a forum to address the progress and future 
plans regarding CCSP’s three decision-support deliverables as described above. The 
Workshop will provide an opportunity for scientists and user communities to discuss 
needs  and  future  application  of  scientific  information  on  climate  variability  and 
change,  as  well  as  discussion  on  expected  outcomes  of  CCSP’s  research  and  assess-
ment  activities  that  are  necessary  for  sound  resource  management,  adaptive  plan-
ning and policy. 
NOAA Climate Program 

NOAA  is  responsible  for  developing  and  making  accessible  climate  information 
products  and  services  for  near-term  issues  such  as  drought  management  and  long- 
term issues such as potential effects of climate change on managed and natural eco-
systems.  As  a  mission  agency,  NOAA  has  a  direct  responsibility  to  provide  climate 
information,  products,  and  services  that  enable  us  to  understand  and  respond  to 
changing climate conditions. 

The  NOAA  Climate  Program  goals  are  aligned  with  the  CCSP  goals  outlined  in 
the CCSP Strategic Plan. Climate is one of NOAA’s four mission goals; it is designed 
to produce two outcomes. First, a predictive understanding of the global climate sys-
tem  on  time  scales  of  weeks  to  decades  with  quantified  uncertainties  sufficient  for 
making informed and reasoned decisions; and second, a climate-literate public effec-
tively  incorporating  NOAA’s  climate  products  into  their  plans  and  decisions.  These 
outcomes are achieved through the following programs that are described in our Fis-
cal Year 2006 Budget: 

• The  Climate  and  Global  Change  (CGC)  program  goal  is  to  establish  a  na-
tional  information  service  based  on  reliable  assessments  and  quantitative  pre-
dictions  of  changing  global  climate  in  partnership  with  the  university  commu-
nity.  CGC  will  help  NOAA  provide  high-quality  predictions  and  assessments  to 
the  public  and  private  sectors,  other  Federal  and  state  agencies,  and  the  inter-
national  community.  The  near-term  objective  is  to  provide  reliable  predictions 
of  global  climate  changes,  both  natural  and  human-induced,  and  their  associ-
ated human effects on time scales ranging from seasons to that of a century or 
more.  The  Climate  and  Global  Change  Program  is  an  important  part  of  CCSP. 
Activities  include  atmospheric  composition,  carbon  cycle,  physical  climate  re-
search, analysis of the climate record, climate predictions on time scales of sea-
sonal,  interannual,  and  decadal,  and  regional  integrated  sciences  and  assess-
ments. 
• The Climate Observations and Services (COS) program supports the devel-
opment  of  the  information  and  insights  needed  to  help  reduce  impacts  to  the 
Nation  from  climate  variations  and  change.  We  do  this  by  monitoring  the 
Earth’s  climate  system,  delivering  data,  developing  predictions  and  impact  as-
sessments,  and  continuing  performance-enhancing  research.  This  is  an  inte-
grated, multi-line organization activity within NOAA and involves the Office of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Research;  National  Environmental  Satellite,  Data, 
and  Information  Service;  and  the  National  Weather  Service.  The  program  in-
volves  an  important  transition  of  research  observing  and  data  systems  into 
operational  systems  and  products.  NOAA  activities  supporting  the  Climate 
Change Research Initiative (CCRI) are also administered under the Climate Ob-
servations  and  Services  program.  Activities  under  this  program  include  atmos-
pheric and ocean observations, data assimilation and data management, transi-
tion of the Tropical Atmospheric Ocean (TAO) buoy array from research to oper-
ations,  and  assessments  of  climate  change  and  variability  (i.e.,  Stratospheric 
Ozone,  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change,  and  CCSP  Synthesis  and 
Assessment Products). NOAA is leading the production of seven of the 21 CCSP 
Synthesis  and  Assessment  Products  called  for  in  the  CCSP  Strategic  Plan,  and 
is contributing to eleven others. 

• The Arctic Research Program (ARP) is coordinated with other U.S. Govern-
ment  agencies  through  the  Study  of  Environmental  Arctic  Change  (SEARCH) 
program.  The  specific  role  of  the  ARP  is  long-term  climate  observations  and 
analysis  of  Arctic  climate  data.  ARP  continues  to  focus  on  key  aspects  of  the 
Arctic  climate  system.  The  information  provided  will  improve  forecasts  of  tem-
perature,  precipitation,  and  storms  across  Alaska  and  the  mainland  United 
States.  This  information  will  also  support  improvements  in  forecasting  and 
planning for energy needs, growth seasons, hazardous storm seasons and water 
resources,  as  well  as  provide  for  better  management  of  Alaskan  and  Arctic  re-
sources. 
• Partnership  Programs  cover  a  wide  range  of  activities  with  a  multitude  of 
external research partners. These partnerships extend to other parts of NOAA; 
other  Federal,  state,  and  local  government  entities;  international  government 
programs; universities; and industry. 

Recent Highlights of the NOAA Climate Program 

NOAA  is  Detecting  and  Forecasting  El  Nin˜ o  Conditions:  NOAA’s  Tropical 
Atmosphere  Ocean  (TAO)  array  provided  the  observational  backbone  for  detecting 
and  forecasting  evolving  El  Nin˜ o  conditions  in  2004.  TAO  array  buoys,  along  with 
complementary buoys maintained by Japan in the western Pacific, are used to track 
the evolution of subsurface ocean warming that typically precedes the full-blown de-
velopment  of  El  Nin˜ o.  In  2004,  the  buoys  detected  a  weakening  of  the  trade  winds 
and  warming  surface  ocean  temperatures.  These  data,  which  are  available  to  oper-
ational  weather  forecasting  centers  and  climate  researchers  around  the  world,  led 
to  NOAA’s  recent  declaration  of  a  weak  El  Nin˜ o  currently  forming  in  the  tropical 
Pacific. 

NOAA  Leads  Implementation  of  a  National  Integrated  Drought  Informa-
tion System (NIDIS): In a letter to the President on August 30, 2004, the Western 
Governor’s Association recommended a team led by NOAA begin implementation of 
the  National  Integrated  Drought  Information  System  (NIDIS).  NOAA  is  coordi-
nating with stakeholders, states, and Federal agencies to implement NIDIS. NIDIS 
goals  include  fostering  and  supporting  research,  creating  an  early  drought  warning 
system,  providing  interactive  delivery  systems,  providing  a  framework  for  inter-
acting with and educating decisionmakers and the public, and developing an under-
standing of the impacts and data needs at the local level. 

NOAA Implemented International Climate/Air Quality Field Study: NOAA 
is  helping  to  lead  and  implement  a  multi-agency  air  quality  and  climate  study  per-
formed  under  the  auspices  of  the  International  Consortium  for  Atmospheric  Re-
search  on  Transport  and  Transformation  (ICARTT),  which  was  initiated  in  New 
England in Summer of 2004 (New England Air Quality—Intercontinental Transport 
and  Chemical  Transformation  Study).  Colleagues  from  five  nations  are  engaged  in 
the endeavor, which extended from the western U.S. to continental Europe. This re-
search  is  addressing  significant  information  gaps  and  delivering  sound  science  that 
will  improve  the  understanding  of  the  long-distance  transport  processes  that  influ-
ence  the  air  pollution  levels  that  impact  the  population  centers  such  as  the  New 
England region. 

NOAA  Contributes  to  Increased  Understanding  of  Regional  Weather  and 
Climate Patterns: NOAA successfully completed the North American Monsoon Ex-
periment  (NAME)  2004  field  campaign  in  collaboration  with  other  U.S.,  Mexican 
and Central American agencies and academic institutions. NAME 2004, provided an 
unprecedented collection of detailed atmospheric, oceanic, and land-surface observa-
tions  in  the  core  region  of  the  North  American  Monsoon  over  northwest  Mexico, 
southwest  U.S.,  and  adjacent  oceanic  regions.  It  documented  the  evolution  of  the 
monsoon  convection  and  precipitation,  and  helped  to  outline  the  key  physical  proc-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

esses that must be parameterized for improved simulations and predictions with cli-
mate models. 

13 

NOAA  Implements  an  Operational  Critical  Climate  Forecast  System:  In 
August  2004,  a  global  ocean  and  atmosphere  coupled  Climate  Forecast  System 
(CFS)  became  operational  at  the  National  Centers  for  Environmental  Prediction  of 
the National Weather Service. The Climate Forecast System is a fully coupled model 
representing  the  interactions  between  the  Earth’s  oceans  and  atmosphere.  These 
interactions are critical for determining climate on seasonal time scales. This imple-
mentation  is  a  recent  example  of  a  successful  transition  of  research  into  operations 
through  long-term,  ongoing  collaborative  efforts  by  NOAA  scientists,  other  Federal 
Agencies (NASA, NSF), and the university research community. 

NOAA  Supports  Development  of  Urban  Climate  Planning  Website:  NOAA 
has supported the development of the Climate Change Information Resource for the 
New  York  Metropolitan  Area  (CCIR–NY),  a  website  (http://ccir.ciesin.columbia 
.edu/nyc)  that  includes  information  tools  developed  for  decision-makers  and  those 
interested  in  planning  for  climate  in  an  urban  environment.  Users  of  CCIR–NY  in-
clude  city,  municipal,  and  county  planners;  natural  resource  managers;  transpor-
tation managers; water managers; waste managers; educators and citizens. In addi-
tion  to  providing  basic  information  about  climate  in  the  NYC  area,  the  website 
serves  as  a  forum  for  users  to  share  expertise  and  information  related  to  climate 
change  and  variability  in  the  NY  metropolitan  area.  The  website  is  serving  as  an 
international  model  for  the  development  of  similar  web  tools  in  Tokyo  and  London. 
NOAA  Contributes  to  Operational  Seasonal  Wildland  Fire  Outlooks:  In 
Fiscal  Year  2003,  NOAA  helped  to  support  the  first  operational  annual  nationwide 
fire  assessment  workshop,  bringing  together  climatologists,  predictive  service  mete-
orologists, fire analysts, and wildland fire managers from state and Federal agencies 
across  11  geographic  area  coordination  centers.  The  result  was  to  begin  production 
of climate-informed, regional- and national-scale seasonal fire potential outlooks for 
the  United  States.  A  sustained  commitment  from  NOAA  and  the  Department  of 
Commerce has resulted in the development of innovative methods for combining sci-
entific  expertise  with  regional  and  local  knowledge  to  produce  unique,  stakeholder- 
driven  decision  support  products.  Through  the  National  Interagency  Fire  Center,  it 
is now possible for managers to access interactive geographic and national-level fire 
outlook maps over daily to seasonal timeframes. As NOAA expands its vision of pro-
viding  operational  climate  services,  this  approach  will  serve  as  a  model  for  addi-
tional  climate  applications,  such  as  drought  outlooks,  air-quality  predictions,  im-
proved land-use planning, and crop-yield forecasts. 

NOAA  Deploys  Ocean  Climate  Observing  Systems:  NOAA  is  working  with 
international  partners  to  establish  and  maintain  a  sustained  Global  Ocean  Observ-
ing System (GOOS, a program of the International Oceanographic Commission) nec-
essary for long-term monitoring of the climate system and improved climate projec-
tions. NOAA provides a major U.S. contribution to the global component of the U.S. 
Integrated  Ocean  Observing  System  (IOOS),  integral  to  the  U.S.  Integrated  Earth 
Observing  System  (IEOS)  and  the  Global  Earth  Observation  System  of  Systems 
(GEOSS). NOAA’s contribution to the observing system consists of various buoy net-
works,  profiling  floats  (Argo),  tide  gauges,  surface  drifting  buoys,  tropical  moored 
buoys, ocean reference stations) and ship observations (ships of opportunity, routine 
oceanographic  surveys,  air-sea  flux  studies).  GOOS  will  be  51  percent  complete  by 
the end of Fiscal Year 2005. 

NOAA  Advances  Seasonal-to-Interannual  Prediction  Capabilities:  Due  to 
our advanced observing systems (TOGA/TAO and satellites) as well as over 10 years 
of research and operational innovation, NOAA has recently developed the capability 
to  make  skillful  U.S.  winter  forecasts  associated  with  strong  El  Nin˜ o  or  La  Nin˜ a 
conditions. We also have improved the accuracy of our forecasts of the level of Atlan-
tic  and  Gulf  seasonal  hurricane  activity.  Major  challenges  remain  for  warm  season 
prediction,  especially  of  precipitation,  as  well  as  cold  season  prediction  in  the  ab-
sence  of  a  strong  El  Nin˜ o  or  La  Nin˜ a.  To  meet  these  challenges,  we  are  expanding 
observations to the Indian Ocean with international partners; developing predictions 
of  the  southwest  monsoon  over  North  America;  and  transferring  information  to  re-
source managers to prepare for extreme weather events, fisheries impacts, and man-
agement of water resources. 

NOAA Provides Weather and Climate Products to the FEWS Network: The 
International  Weather  and  Climate  Monitoring  Project  at  NOAA’s  Climate  Pre-
diction  Center  is  an  extension  of  an  earlier  USAID  Famine  Early  Warning  System 
(FEWS)  program  that  originally  covered  only  Sub-Sahelian  Africa.  The  project  has 
now grown to encompass all of Africa, Afghanistan, Central America, and the Carib-
bean,  the  Mekong  River  Basin,  and  much  of  southern  Asia.  Work  is  underway  to 
create  a  global  weather  and  climate  monitoring  program  to  address  any  inter-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

national  region  where  humanitarian  support  is  needed.  The  goal  of  the  program  is 
to  provide  weather  and  climate  related  information  to  users  within  USAID  as  well 
as international partner organizations, such that a greater level of humanitarian as-
sistance may be offered. The goal is only accomplished through constant interaction 
with  our  partner  groups  such  as  the  USGS,  NASA,  USAID,  private-sector  contrac-
tors, and local African organizations. A more thorough and accurate analysis of con-
ditions is possible via these collaborations. 

NOAA  Supports  RANET:  The  RAdio  and  InterNET  for  the  Communication  of 
Hydro-Meteorological  Information  for  Rural  Development  (RANET)  program  is  an 
international  collaboration  with  based  funding  from  USAID  and  NOAA  to  make 
weather  and  seasonal  information  available  to  remote  populations  in  developing 
countries in Africa, Asia, and the Pacific. To achieve its mission, the program works 
to  improve  the  basic  communication  and  dissemination  capacities  of  National 
Hydro-Meteorological Services (NHMSs) and related national agencies. The RANET 
program  addresses  its  core  objectives  by  applying  technologies  that  can  bridge  and 
extend  existing  dissemination  networks,  by  providing  technical  training,  developing 
and  using  unique  applications  of  technology,  and  nurturing  an  overall  community- 
based  dialogue  on  issues  related  to  weather  and  the  environment.  As  a  testament 
to RANET’s sustainable design, several of the recipient national meteorological serv-
ices have dedicated personnel and resources to their own RANET efforts. In keeping 
with recent language from the G8 action plan on climate and energy, RANET exem-
plifies  strategies  that  seek  to  further  scientific  capacity  in  pursuit  of  larger  social, 
environmental, and economic objectives in ways that are truly consistent with local 
and regional realities. 
NOAA Climate Program Budget for Fiscal Year 2006 

The NOAA Climate Program is requesting $239.9 million in Fiscal Year 2006, re-
flecting a net increase of $19.6M over the Fiscal Year 2006 base level. This increase 
includes  $10.6M  for  the  high  priority  Climate  Change  Research  Initiative  (CCRI); 
$7.4M  to  reactivate  activities  requested  under  Climate  Observations  and  Services 
(COS) in the Fiscal Year 2005 President’s Budget; and $1.6M to restore funding re-
quested in Fiscal Year 2005 for other ongoing climate activities. 

This  increase  responds  to  the  long-term  observational  requirements  of  climate 
predictions  and  assessments.  Funding  to  reactivate  COS  activities  will  ensure  con-
tinuation  of  climate  observing  networks,  such  as  the  highly  regarded  Climate  Ref-
erence  Network  (CRN)  and  NOAA’s  Baseline  Observatories.  NOAA  will  be  able  to 
ensure critical monitoring of long-term trends in important climate variables and to 
improve  forecasting  capabilities  and  applications  development  over  timescales  from 
weeks to seasons. 

These programs serve as a foundation for NOAA’s participation in CCSP by fund-
ing  important  research  and  key  observations  and  thereby  reducing  uncertainties  in 
climate  change  science.  These  increases  also  support  the  objective  in  the  Depart-
ment  of  Commerce  Strategic  Plan  to  ‘‘Advance  understanding  and  predict  changes 
in  the  Earth’s  environment  to  meet  America’s  economic,  social,  and  environmental 
needs.’’  In  addition,  these  increases  will  support  the  research  and  production  of 
CCSP Synthesis and Assessment Products. 

NOAA  will  continue  building  and  maintaining  a  global  ocean  observing  system; 
initiate  a  new  five-year  effort  to  better  understand  how  aerosols  influence  climate 
by  their  interaction  with  clouds;  expand  the  Tropical  Atmospheric  Ocean  (TAO) 
buoy array into the Indian Ocean; conduct new studies to better explain the causes 
for  observed  climate  variability  and  change;  and  continue  expanding  and  refining 
regional integrated research and outreach. 

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  I  look  forward  to  the 

opportunity to respond to any questions you may have. 

Senator VITTER. Thank you, Doctor, now Mr. Conover. 
STATEMENT OF DAVID W. CONOVER, PRINCIPAL DEPUTY 

ASSISTANT SECRETARY, OFFICE OF POLICY AND 

INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS; DIRECTOR, U.S. CLIMATE 

CHANGE TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM, DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY 
Mr.  CONOVER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  good  morning,  and 
good  morning,  Senator  Lautenberg,  it’s  nice  to  see  you  again. 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  to  dis-
cuss  climate  change  activities  at  the  Department  of  Energy.  My 
name  is  Dave  Conover,  and  I’m  Principal  Deputy  Assistant  Sec-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

retary  in  the  Department’s  Office  of  Policy  and  International  Af-
fairs.  I  also  serve  as  the  Director  of  the  Climate  Change  Tech-
nology Program, known as CCTP. 

The essence of my testimony today is that the Department of En-
ergy  has  a  number  of  important  climate  change  initiatives  under-
way that support the Administration’s comprehensive and strategic 
approach to climate change. 

First,  a  little  background.  In  February  2002,  President  Bush  re- 
affirmed  his  Administration’s  commitment  to  the  U.N.  Framework 
Convention  on  Climate  Change,  and  its  central  goal—stabilization 
of greenhouse gas concentrations in the atmosphere, at a level that 
prevents dangerous interference with the climate system. The Bush 
Administration  believes  that  the  most  effective  way  to  meet  this 
challenge  is  through  an  agenda  that  promotes  economic  growth, 
provides  energy  security,  reduces  pollution,  and  mitigates  green-
house gas emissions. 

Although  climate  change  is  a  complex  and  long-term  challenge, 
the  Bush  Administration  recognizes  that  there  are  cost-effective 
steps  we  can  take  now.  In  2002,  President  Bush  set  an  ambitious 
national  goal,  to  reduce  the  greenhouse  gas  intensity  in  the  U.S. 
economy by 18 percent by 2012. To meet this goal, the Administra-
tion has developed an array of policy measures, including financial 
incentives  and  voluntary  programs.  Among  these  are  DOE’s  Cli-
mate VISION Program, and the Voluntary Greenhouse Gas Report-
ing System known as the 1605(b) program. Climate VISION is the 
Presidential  public/private  partnership  launched  by  the  Depart-
ment  in  February  2003,  to  contribute  to  the  President’s  goal  of  re-
ducing  greenhouse  gas  emissions  intensity.  Business  associations 
representing  14  energy-intensive  industry  sectors  accounting  for 
about  40  percent  of  U.S.  gas  emissions,  and  the  business  round-
table participate in this program. 

The  1605(b)  Program  is  a  voluntary  system  for  companies  to 
record  their  progress  in  reducing  greenhouse  gas  emissions.  We 
will be issuing new guidelines this fall to meet the President’s 2002 
directive that the 1605(b) Program be revised to enhance the accu-
racy,  reliability,  and  verifiability  of  the  data  reported  through  the 
system. 

Data  for  2003  and  2004,  suggest  we  were  ahead  of  schedule  in 
meeting  the  President’s  intensity  goal,  further  detail  on  that  is  in 
my  written  statement.  The  Administration  is  also  laying  a  strong 
technological foundation to develop realistic and cost-effective miti-
gation  options  to  meet  climate  and  other  objectives.  The  U.S.  Cli-
mate Change Technology Program, or CCTP, was created to coordi-
nate  and  prioritize  the  Federal  Government’s  nearly  $3  billion  an-
nual investment in climate-related technology research. 

Later this week, Energy Secretary Sam Bodman will release the 
CCTP  Vision  and  Framework  for  a  Strategic  Plan.  This  document 
lays  out  the  guiding  principles  for  investment  and  climate-related 
technology  and  research,  development,  demonstration,  and  deploy-
ment.  This  investment  includes  expanded  and  realigned  activities, 
as well as new initiatives in strategic technology areas, such as the 
President’s  Hydrogen  Fuel  Initiative;  and  the  FreedomCAR  Pro-
gram;  carbon  sequestration;  FutureGen,  the  coal-fired,  zero  emis-
sions  power  project;  next  generation  nuclear  energy  and  fusion.  In 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

addition  to  our  domestic  R&D  work,  the  Administration  believes 
well-designed  multilateral  collaborations  can  accelerate  develop-
ment in commercialization of new technologies. 

The  International  Partnership  for  the  Hydrogen  Economy,  the 
Carbon  Sequestration  Leadership  Forum,  Generation  for  Inter-
national  Nuclear  Forum—all  U.S.  initiatives  provide  vehicles  for 
international  collaboration  to  advance  these  technologies.  In  addi-
tion, the U.S. participates in ITER, a proposed multilateral collabo-
rative  project,  to  design  and  demonstrate  a  fusion  energy  produc-
tion system. 

Our most recent multilateral initiative led by EPA was launched 
in November 2004. The Methane to Markets Partnership focuses on 
the  recovery  of  methane  from  landfills,  underground  coal  mines, 
natural gas, and oil systems, for use as a clean energy source. The 
Department  also  participates  in  14  climate  partnerships  with  key 
countries and regional organizations that, together with the United 
States,  account  for  almost  80  percent  of  global  greenhouse  gas 
emissions. 

The  U.S.  launched  the  Clean  Energy  Initiative,  and  joined  the 
Renewable  Energy  and  Energy  Efficiency  partnership  in  order  to 
assist  developing  countries  to  reduce  poverty  and  increase  their 
economic  growth  and  environmental  quality  by  modernizing  their 
energy  production  and  use,  but  with  cleaner,  more  efficient  tech-
nologies, 

As  you  can  see,  the  Bush  Administration  has  developed  a  com-
prehensive  strategy  on  climate  change  that  is  informed  by  science, 
emphasizes  innovation  and  technological  solutions,  and  promotes 
international  collaboration  to  support  the  U.N.  framework  conven-
tion objective. DOE is proud to be a major contributor to this strat-
egy. 

Thank  you  for  your  attention,  and  I  would  be  pleased  to  answer 

any questions that you have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Conover follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID W.  CONOVER,  PRINCIPAL DEPUTY ASSISTANT 
SECRETARY,  OFFICE OF POLICY AND INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS;  DIRECTOR,  U.S.  CLI-
MATE CHANGE TECHNOLOGY, DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY 
Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to 
appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  climate  change  activities  at  the  Department  of 
Energy (DOE). 

As  a  signatory  to  the  United  Nations  Framework  Convention  on  Climate  Change 
(UNFCCC),  the  United  States  shares  with  many  countries  its  ultimate  objective: 
stabilization of greenhouse gas concentrations in the atmosphere at a level that pre-
vents  dangerous  interference  with  the  climate  system.  In  February  2002,  President 
Bush reaffirmed his Administration’s commitment to this central goal of the Frame-
work Convention. 

The  Bush  Administration  believes  that  the  most  effective  way  to  meet  this  chal-
lenge  is  to  focus  not  solely  on  greenhouse  gas  emissions,  but  rather  on  a  broader 
agenda that promotes economic growth, provides energy security, reduces pollution, 
and  mitigates  greenhouse  gas  emissions.  Many  of  the  DOE  programs  I  will  discuss 
today advance these goals. 

Addressing global climate change will require a sustained, long-term commitment 
by  all  nations  over  many  generations.  To  this  end,  the  President  has  established  a 
robust  and  flexible  climate  change  policy  that  harnesses  the  power  of  markets  and 
technological  innovation,  uses  the  best  available  science,  maintains  economic 
growth,  and  encourages  global  participation.  Major  elements  of  this  approach  in-
clude: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

• implementing  near-term  policies  and  measures  to  slow  the  growth  in  green-

house gas emissions; 

• advancing climate change science; 
• accelerating technology development; and 
• promoting international collaboration. 

Near-Term Policies and Measures 

Although climate change is a complex and long-term challenge, the Bush Adminis-
tration  recognizes  that  there  are  cost-effective  steps  we  can  take  now.  In  2002, 
President  Bush  set  an  ambitious  national  goal  to  reduce  the  greenhouse  gas  inten-
sity of the U.S. economy—i.e., emissions per unit of economic output—by 18 percent 
by  2012,  which  represents  about  a  28  percent  increase  in  the  rate  of  improvement 
projected by the Energy Information Administration (EIA) over this period. 

A hallmark of the intensity approach is flexibility, an especially important consid-
eration  when  confronted  with  the  many  uncertainties  surrounding  climate  change. 
These uncertainties suggest that a measured response is required that concentrates 
first  on  slowing  emissions  growth  before  trying  to  stop  and  eventually  reverse  it. 
Unlike  the  Kyoto  Protocol  approach,  a  greenhouse  gas  emissions  intensity  goal  can 
encourage  reductions  without  risking  economic  consequences  that  could  jeopardize 
our ability to invest in long-run scientific and technological solutions. 

In  2002,  the  Administration  estimated  that  its  18  percent  intensity  improvement 
goal  will  reduce  cumulative  emissions  of  carbon  by  more  than  1,833  million  metric 
tons  of  carbon  dioxide  by  2012.  Recent  EIA  projections  suggest  that  achieving  the 
18  percent  goal  will  reduce  carbon  emissions  by  366  million  metric  tons  of  carbon 
dioxide in 2012 alone. 

To  this  end,  the  Administration  has  developed  an  array  of  policy  measures,  in-
cluding  financial  incentives  and  voluntary  programs.  Among  these  are  DOE’s  Cli-
mate  VISION  program  and  the  Voluntary  Reporting  of  Greenhouse  Gases  Program 
authorized  under  subsection  1605(b)  the  Energy  Policy  Act  of  1992  and  commonly 
known as the ‘‘1605(b)’’ program. 

• Climate  VISION:  In  setting  the  18  percent  decade  goal,  President  Bush  issued 
a  challenge  to  the  private  sector  to  do  its  part.  The  President’s  call  resonated 
with business, and in February 2003, the Federal Government and industry or-
ganizations  representing  thousands  of  companies  from  12  energy-intensive  eco-
nomic  sectors  (since  expanded  to  14)  and  The  Business  Roundtable  joined  in  a 
voluntary  partnership  known  as  Climate  VISION  (Voluntary  Innovative  Sector 
Initiatives: Opportunities Now). These Climate VISION partners, which include 
some  of  the  largest  companies  in  America,  represent  a  broad  range  of  industry 
sectors—oil  and  gas,  electricity  generation,  coal  and  mineral  production  and 
mining,  manufacturing  (automobiles,  cement,  iron  and  steel,  magnesium,  alu-
minum,  chemicals,  and  semiconductors),  railroads,  and  forestry  products—ac-
counting for about 40 to 45 percent of total U.S. greenhouse gas emissions. Four 
Federal  agencies  participate  in  the  program:  DOE  (lead),  Department  of  Agri-
culture,  Department  of  Transportation,  and  Environmental  Protection  Agency. 
Climate  VISION  is  unique  in  that  it  focuses  on  economic  sectors,  not  specific 
companies,  with  each  industry  association  making  a  commitment  on  behalf  of 
its  members  to  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emissions  intensity.  The  program  works 
with  its  partners  in  four  areas:  (1)  measuring  and  monitoring;  (2)  finding  cost- 
effective  solutions  to  reduce  energy  use  and  GHG  emissions;  (3)  helping  to  di-
rect industry’s energy efficiency R&D investments; and (4) exploring cross-sector 
efficiency gains to reduce emissions. 
The  Climate  VISION  program  also  is  exploring  risk-based  incentives  for  early 
commercial uses of advanced energy technologies to tip private investment deci-
sions  and  speed  the  market  penetration  of  new  technologies  and  systems.  It  is 
looking  at  several  areas  where  this  approach  could  be  applied,  including  resi-
dential  and  commercial  buildings,  coal  gasification,  nuclear  energy,  and  bio-
refining.  Climate  VISION  and  DOE’s  Building  America  program,  for  example, 
have  been  working  with  three  states—California,  Texas,  and  New  York—on 
pilot projects aimed at using a transaction chain approach to transform housing 
markets  to  increase  the  penetration  of  energy  efficient  homes.  The  lessons 
learned  in  these  pilots  could  help  inform  policies  to  move  the  housing  market 
toward greater energy efficiency. 
The Climate VISION website—www.climatevision.gov—is an excellent source of 
information  about  the  program  and  the  voluntary  activities  undertaken  by  in-
dustry to reduce emissions intensity. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

• ‘‘1605(b)’’  Voluntary  Greenhouse  Gas  Registry:  The  1605(b)  program  is  a  vol-
untary  system  administered  by  EIA 
(http://www.eia.doe.gov/oiaf/1605/ 
frntvrgg.html) that provides a vehicle for companies to record progress in reduc-
ing  greenhouse  gas  emissions.  Currently,  about  220  companies  file  annual  re-
ports.  In  February  2002,  President  Bush  directed  that  the  1605(b)  program  be 
revised  to  enhance  the  ‘‘accuracy,  reliability,  and  verifiability’’  of  the  data  re-
ported to the system. 
Based  on  this  guidance,  DOE’s  Policy  Office  has  been  working  with  an  inter-
agency  group  to  improve  the  system.  We  issued  draft  revised  General  Guide-
lines in November 2003, and subsequently held a public workshop to discuss the 
proposed guidelines and to receive comments. 
Interim  Final  General  Guidelines  and  a  Notice  of  Availability  for  the  Draft 
Technical Guidelines were published in the Federal Register of March 24, 2005, 
for public comment. The Department of Energy hosted a public workshop April 
26–27, 2005, to discuss the guidelines and to receive public comment. The agen-
da  for  this  workshop,  the  presentation  slides  used  during  the  workshop,  a  list 
of  participants,  and  a  full  transcript  of  the  plenary  sessions  are  now  available 
on DOE’s website. On May 5, 2005, the Departments of Agriculture and Energy 
held a workshop on the agricultural and forestry elements of the guidelines. On 
June  30,  2005,  EIA  issued  a  Federal  Register  notice  soliciting  public  comment 
on  draft  reporting  forms  and  instructions  based  on  the  Interim  Final  General 
Guidelines  and  Draft  Technical  Guidelines.  It  is  DOE’s  intention  that  final 
guidelines be issued this fall. 

Other  key  Administration  programs,  like  the  Environmental  Protection  Agency’s 
Climate  Leaders  and  SmartWay  Transport  Partnership,  also  work  in  voluntary 
partnership  with  industry  to  reduce  emissions.  Further,  the  Department  of  Agri-
culture  is  using  its  conservation  programs  to  provide  an  incentive  for  actions  that 
increase  carbon  sequestration.  DOE  is  pursuing  many  energy  supply  technologies 
with  comparatively  low  or  zero  carbon  dioxide  emissions  profiles,  such  as  solar, 
wind,  bioenergy,  and  combined  heat  and  power.  And  the  Bush  Administration  also 
has increased fuel economy standards for new light trucks and sport utility vehicles 
by  1.5  miles  per  gallon  over  the  next  three  model  years.  A  new  round  of  standards 
is being prepared for proposal later this summer. 

These and other initiatives may be contributing to greenhouse gas emission inten-
sity reductions that we have seen already. The President’s 18 percent ten-year goal 
represents  an  average  annual  rate  of  about  2.0  percent  (compounded).  According  to 
Energy  Information  Administration’s  (EIA)  Emissions  of  Greenhouse  Gases  in  the 
United States 2003 report, the energy-related greenhouse gas intensity was 2.3 per-
cent  lower  in  2003  than  in  2002,  and  a  recent  EIA  estimate  suggests  a  further  im-
provement  in  carbon  dioxide  emissions  intensity  of  2.6  percent  in  2004.  Overall, 
then,  the  Nation  appears  to  be  ahead  of  schedule  in  meeting  the  President’s  goal. 
Accelerating Climate Change Technology Development 

While  acting  to  slow  the  pace  of  greenhouse  gas  emissions  intensity  in  the  near 
term, the Administration is laying a strong technological foundation to develop real-
istic mitigation options to meet energy security and climate change objectives. 

The  Bush  Administration  is  moving  ahead  on  advanced  technology  options  that 
have the potential to substantially reduce, avoid, or sequester future greenhouse gas 
emissions.  Over  80  percent  of  current  anthropogenic  greenhouse  gas  emissions  are 
energy  related,  and  although  projections  vary  considerably,  a  tripling  of  global  en-
ergy  demand  by  2100  is  not  unimaginable.  Therefore,  to  provide  the  energy  nec-
essary for continued economic growth while we reduce greenhouse gas emissions, we 
may  have  to  develop  and  deploy  cost-effective  technologies  that  alter  the  way  we 
produce and use energy. 

The  Climate  Change  Technology  Program  (CCTP),  which  I  direct,  was  created  to 
coordinate  and  prioritize  the  Federal  Government’s  nearly  $3  billion  annual  invest-
ment  in  climate-related  technology  research,  development,  demonstration,  and  de-
ployment  (RDD&D).  Using  various  analytical  tools,  CCTP  is  assessing  different 
technology  options  and  their  potential  contributions  to  reducing  greenhouse  gas 
emissions. Given the tremendous capital investment in existing energy systems, the 
desired transformation of our global energy system may take decades or more to im-
plement  fully.  A  robust  RDD&D  effort  can  make  advanced  technologies  available 
sooner  rather  than  later  and  can  accelerate  modernization  of  capital  stock  at  lower 
cost and with greater flexibility. 

Later  this  week,  Energy  Secretary  Bodman,  who  chairs  the  President’s  Cabinet 
Committee on Climate Change Science and Technology Integration, will release the 
CCTP Vision and Framework for our forthcoming draft Strategic Plan. CCTP’s stra-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

tegic  vision  has  six  complementary  goals:  (i)  reducing  emissions  from  energy  use 
and  infrastructure;  (ii)  reducing  emissions  from  energy  supply;  (iii)  capturing  and 
sequestering  CO2;  (iv)  reducing  emissions  of  other  greenhouse  gases;  (v)  measuring 
and monitoring emissions; and (vi) bolstering the contributions of basic science. The 
larger Strategic Plan will be published for public comment later this summer. 

The  Administration  continues  strong  investment  in  many  strategic  technology 

areas. 

• Energy Efficiency and Renewable Energy: Energy efficiency is the single largest 
investment  area  under  CCTP  and  it  provides  tremendous  short-term  potential 
to reduce energy use and greenhouse gas emissions. Renewable energy includes 
a  range  of  different  technologies  that  can  play  an  important  role  in  reducing 
greenhouse  gas  emissions.  The  United  States  invests  considerable  resources  in 
wind,  solar  photovoltaics,  geothermal,  and  biomass  technologies.  Many  of  these 
technologies  have  made  considerable  progress  in  price  competitiveness,  but 
there  remain  opportunities  to  reduce  manufacturing,  operating,  and  mainte-
nance costs of many of these technologies. Annually the Administration invests 
about $1.2 billion for these activities. 
• Hydrogen:  President  Bush  launched  his  Hydrogen  Fuel  Initiative  in  his  2003 
State  of  the  Union  Address.  The  goal  is  to  work  closely  with  the  private  sector 
to  accelerate  our  transition  to  a  hydrogen  economy,  on  both  the  technology  of 
hydrogen fuel cells and a fueling infrastructure. The President’s Hydrogen Fuel 
Initiative and the FreedomCAR Partnership launched in 2002, will provide $1.7 
billion  through  2008  to  develop  hydrogen-powered  fuel  cells,  hydrogen  produc-
tion  and  infrastructure  technologies,  and  advanced  automotive  technologies, 
with the goal of commercializing fuel-cell vehicles by 2020. 
• Carbon Sequestration: Carbon capture and sequestration is a central element of 
CCTP’s  strategy  because  for  the  foreseeable  future,  fossil  fuels  will  continue  to 
be the world’s most reliable and lowest-cost form of energy. A realistic approach 
is  to  find  ways  to  capture  and  store  the  carbon  dioxide  produced  when  these 
fuels  are  used.  DOE’s  core  Carbon  Sequestration  Program  emphasizes  tech-
nologies  that  capture  carbon  dioxide  from  large  point  sources  and  store  it  in 
geologic formations. In 2003, DOE launched a nationwide network of seven Re-
gional  Carbon  Sequestration  Partnerships,  involving  State  agencies,  univer-
sities, and the private sector, to determine the best approaches for sequestration 
in  each  geographic  region  represented  and  to  examine  regulatory  and  infra-
structure  needs.  On  June  9  of  this  year,  Secretary  Bodman  announced  a  major 
expansion of the Regional Partnerships program 
• Coal-Fired, Near-Zero-Emissions Power Generation: The United States has vast 
reserves of coal, and about half of its electricity is generated from this fuel. Ad-
vanced coal-based power and fuels, therefore, is an area of special interest from 
both an energy security and climate change perspective. The Coal Research Ini-
tiative  (CRI)  consists  of  research,  development,  and  demonstration  of  coal-re-
lated technologies that will improve coal’s competitiveness in future energy sup-
ply markets. The Clean Coal Power Initiative (CCPI), within the CRI, is a cost- 
shared program between the government and industry to demonstrate emerging 
technologies  in  coal-based  power  generation  and  to  accelerate  their  commer-
cialization.  A  major  initiative  under  CCPI  is  the  FutureGen  project,  a  10-year, 
$1  billion  government-industry  effort  to  design,  build,  and  operate  the  world’s 
first near-zero atmospheric emissions coal-fired power plant. This project, which 
cuts across many CCTP strategic areas, will incorporate the latest technologies 
in carbon sequestration, oxygen and hydrogen separation membranes, turbines, 
fuel cells, and coal-to-hydrogen gasification. Through the CRI, clean coal can re-
main part of a diverse, secure energy portfolio well into the future. 
• Nuclear  Fission:  Concerns  over  resource  availability,  energy  security,  and  air 
quality as well as climate change suggest a larger role for nuclear power as an 
energy  supply  choice.  While  current  generations  of  nuclear  energy  systems  are 
adequate  in  many  markets  today,  new  construction  of  advanced  light-water  re-
actors in the near term and of even more advanced systems in the longer term 
can  broaden  opportunities  for  nuclear  energy,  both  in  industrialized  and  devel-
oping  countries.  The  Nuclear  Power  2010  program  is  working  with  industry  to 
demonstrate the Nuclear Regulatory Commission’s new licensing process, while 
the Generation IV Nuclear Energy Systems Initiative is investigating the more 
advanced reactor and fuel cycle systems that represent a significant leap in eco-
nomic  performance,  safety,  and  proliferation-resistance.  One  promising  system 
being  developed  under  the  Nuclear  Hydrogen  Initiative  would  pair  very-high- 
temperature reactor technology with advanced hydrogen production capabilities 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

that  could  produce  both  electricity  and  hydrogen  on  a  scale  to  meet  transpor-
tation needs. Complementing these programs is the Advanced Fuel Cycle Initia-
tive,  which  is  developing  advanced,  proliferation  resistant  nuclear  fuel  tech-
nologies  that  can  improve  the  fuel  cycle,  reduce  costs,  and  increase  the  safety 
of handling nuclear wastes. 
• Fusion: Fusion energy is a potential major new source of energy that, if success-
fully developed, could be used to produce electricity and possibly hydrogen. Fu-
sion  has  features  that  make  it  is  an  attractive  option  from  both  an  environ-
mental  and  safety  perspective.  However,  the  technical  hurdles  of  fusion  energy 
are very high, and with a commercialization objective of 2050, its impact would 
not be felt until the second half of the century, if at all. Nevertheless, the prom-
ise of fusion energy is simply too great to ignore. 

Advances in these and other technology areas in the CCTP portfolio could put us 
on a path to ensuring access to clean, affordable energy supplies while dramatically 
reducing  the  greenhouse  gas  profile  of  our  economy  over  the  long  term.  Moreover, 
the  deployment  of  cleaner  energy  technologies  in  developing  economies  like  China 
and  India  can  make  a  huge  difference  in  altering  the  future  global  energy  picture. 
Innovative International Partnerships 

The Administration believes that well-designed multilateral collaborations focused 
on  achieving  practical  results  can  accelerate  development  and  commercialization  of 
new technologies. Under President Bush’s leadership, the United States has brought 
together key nations to tackle jointly some tough energy challenges. These multilat-
eral  collaborations  mirror  the  main  strategic  thrusts  of  our  domestic  technology  re-
search  programs,  and  they  address  a  number  of  complementary  energy  concerns, 
such  as  energy  security,  climate  change,  and  environmental  stewardship.  Another 
characteristic  of  each  is  that  they  include  as  partners  Kyoto  countries,  non-Kyoto 
countries,  industrialized  countries,  developing  countries,  and  countries  with  econo-
mies in transition. 

• International  Partnership  for  the  Hydrogen  Economy  (IPHE):  Recognizing  the 
common  interest  in  hydrogen  research  that  many  countries  share,  the  United 
States  called  for  an  international  hydrogen  partnership  in  April  2003,  and  in 
November  2003,  representatives  from  16  governments  gathered  in  Washington 
to launch IPHE.1 IPHE provides a vehicle to organize, coordinate, and leverage 
multi-national  hydrogen  research  programs  that  advance  the  transition  to  a 
global hydrogen economy. It reviews the progress of collaborative projects, iden-
tifies  promising  directions  for  research,  and  provides  technical  assessments  for 
policy  decisions.  IPHE  also  will  develop  common  recommendations  for  inter-
nationally-recognized  standards  and  safety  protocols  to  speed  market  penetra-
tion  of  hydrogen  technologies.  Through  IPHE,  the  U.S.  has  assisted  Brazil  and 
China in developing hydrogen roadmaps. 
• Carbon  Sequestration  Leadership  Forum  (CSLF):  CSLF  is  a  U.S.-launched  ini-
tiative  that  was  established  formally  at  a  ministerial  meeting  held  in  Wash-
ington,  D.C.,  in  June  2003.2 CSLF  is  a  multilateral  initiative  that  provides  a 
framework for international collaboration on sequestration technologies. The Fo-
rum’s  main  focus  is  assisting  the  development  of  technologies  to  separate,  cap-
ture, transport, and store carbon dioxide safely over the long term, making car-
bon sequestration technologies broadly available internationally, and addressing 
wider issues, such as regulation and policy, relating to carbon capture and stor-
age. In addition to these activities, CSLF members and other interested nations 
are invited to participate in the FutureGen clean coal project. 
• Generation IV International Forum (GIF): In 2002, nine countries and Euratom 
joined together with the United States to charter GIF, a multilateral collabora-
tion to fulfill the objective of the Generation IV Nuclear Energy Systems Initia-
tive.3 GIF’s  goal  is  to  develop  the  fourth  generation  of  advanced,  economical, 
safe,  and  proliferation-resistant  nuclear  systems  that  can  be  adopted  commer-
cially  no  later  than  2030.  A  technology  roadmap  developed  by  the  GIF  and  the 

1 Founding  IPHE  member  governments  include  the  United  States,  Australia,  Brazil,  Canada, 
China, European Commission, France, Germany, Iceland, India, Italy, Japan, Norway, Republic 
of  Korea,  Russia,  and  the  United  Kingdom.  In  January  2005,  New  Zealand  became  the  17th 
member. 

2 CSLF member governments include the United States, Australia, Brazil, Canada, China, Co-
lombia,  Denmark,  European  Commission,  France,  Germany,  India,  Italy,  Japan,  Mexico,  Nor-
way, Russia, South Africa, and the United Kingdom. 

3 GIF member countries include the United States, Argentina, Brazil, Canada, France, Japan, 

Korea, South Africa, Switzerland, and the United Kingdom. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

Department of Energy’s Nuclear Energy Research Advisory Committee, in 2003, 
identified six technologies as candidates for future designs. Based on the Road-
map,  GIF  countries  are  jointly  preparing  a  collaborative  research  program  to 
develop and demonstrate the projects. 
• ITER: In January 2003, President Bush announced that the United States was 
joining  the  negotiations  for  the  construction  and  operation  of  the  international 
fusion  experiment  known  as  ITER.4 If  successful,  this  multi-billion-dollar  re-
search  project  will  advance  progress  toward  producing  clean,  renewable,  com-
mercially-available  fusion  energy  by  the  middle  of  the  century.  It  was  recently 
agreed that the experimental reactor will be sited in Cadarache, France. 
• Methane  to  Markets  Partnership:  In  November  of  last  year,  the  United  States 
and representatives from 13 countries 5 launched the Methane to Markets Part-
nership,  which  is  led  on  the  U.S.  side  by  EPA.  This  Partnership  is  an  inter-
national  initiative  that  focuses  on  advancing  cost-effective,  near-term  methane 
recovery and use as a clean energy source to enhance economic growth, promote 
energy  security,  improve  the  environment,  and  reduce  greenhouse  gases.  Ini-
tially, the Partnership will target three major methane sources: landfills, under-
ground coal mines, and natural gas and oil systems. 
• Regional and Bilateral Activities: Since 2001, the United States has established 
15  climate  partnerships  with  key  countries  and  regional  organizations  that,  to-
gether  with  the  United  States,  account  for  almost  80  percent  of  global  green-
house gas emissions.6 These partnerships encompass over 400 individual activi-
ties,  and  successful  joint  projects  have  been  initiated  in  areas  such  as  climate 
change  research  and  science,  climate  observation  systems,  clean  and  advanced 
energy  technologies,  carbon  capture,  storage  and  sequestration,  and  policy  ap-
proaches to reducing greenhouse gas emissions. 

Market Development for Commercialization of New Technologies 

Adoption  and  transfer  of  modern  energy  technologies  is  capital  and  information 
intensive,  and  can  only  be  accomplished  as  part  of  a  broader  effort  to  improve  gov-
ernance,  regulation,  and  management  of  service  providers  in  developing  countries. 
Nations  that  develop  strong,  market-based  institutions  and  the  rule  of  law  will  be 
in  the  best  position  to  make  the  sustained  investments  necessary  to  provide  clean 
energy  and  address  climate  change  over  the  long  term.  One  of  the  biggest  barriers 
to  economic  progress  in  developing  countries  is  lack  of  access  to  affordable,  modern 
energy  services,  such  as  electricity.  Such  services  are  instrumental  to  economic 
growth,  social  development,  and  alleviation  of  poverty,  and  their  availability  can 
amplify  the  impact  of  investments  in  public  health,  education,  sanitation,  clean 
water, agriculture, and others. 

Therefore, an important objective of U.S. participation in many of its international 
collaborations  is  to  mobilize  private  sector  investment  by  promoting  innovative  fi-
nancing  that  reduces  risks  and  transaction  costs.  These  efforts  are  aimed  at  devel-
oping new policies and business models to create self-sustaining markets for financ-
ing energy efficiency, renewable, and infrastructure projects. 

• Clean  Energy  Initiative:  At  the  World  Summit  on  Sustainable  Development 
(WSSD),  the  United  States  launched  a  ‘‘Clean  Energy  Initiative’’  consisting  of 
four  market-oriented,  performance-based  partnerships:  Global  Village  Energy 
Partnership, led by the U.S. Agency for International Development; Partnership 
for  Clean  Indoor  Air,  and  Partnership  for  Clean  Fuels  and  Vehicles,  both  led 
by  EPA;  and  Efficient  Energy  for  Sustainable  Development  (EESD),  led  by 
DOE.  The  mission  of  this  initiative  is  to  bring  together  governments,  inter-
national  organizations,  industry,  and  civil  society  in  partnerships  to  alleviate 
poverty  and  spur  economic  growth  in  the  developing  world  by  modernizing  en-
ergy services. 
DOE’s EESD aims to improve the productivity and efficiency of energy systems, 
while  reducing  pollution  and  waste,  saving  money,  and  improving  reliability 
through less energy intensive products, more energy efficient processes and pro-
duction modernization. In furtherance of the U.S. Clean Energy Initiative, DOE 

4 ITER  member  countries  include  the  United  States,  China,  European  Union,  Japan,  Russia, 

and the Republic of Korea. 

5 Founding  Methane  to  Markets  member  governments  include  the  United  States,  Argentina, 
Australia,  Brazil,  China,  Colombia,  India,  Italy,  Japan,  Mexico,  Nigeria,  Russian  Federation, 
Ukraine, and the United Kingdom 

6 Partners  include  Australia,  Brazil,  Canada,  China,  Central  America  (Belize,  Costa  Rica,  El 
Salvador, Guatemala, Honduras, Nicaragua, and Panama), European Union, India, Italy, Japan, 
Mexico, New Zealand, Republic of Korea, Russian Federation, and South Africa. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

submitted and obtained approval from Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation forum 
Energy Ministers a plan to implement an agenda for financing energy efficiency 
and renewable energy projects within the region. 
• Renewable  Energy  and  Energy  Efficiency  Partnership:  Formed  at  the  World 
Summit on Sustainable Development in Johannesburg, South Africa, in August 
2002, the Renewable Energy and Energy Efficiency Partnership (REEEP) seeks 
to  accelerate  and  expand  the  global  market  for  renewable  energy  and  energy- 
efficiency  technologies.  As  the  world’s  largest  producer  and  consumer  of  renew-
able  energy,  and  with  more  renewable  energy  generation  capacity  than  Ger-
many, Denmark, Sweden, France, Italy, and the United Kingdom combined, the 
United  States  is  one  of  17  countries  who  are  partners  in  REEEP.  The  United 
States  also  actively  participated  in  the  Renewables  2004  conference  sponsored 
by  the  German  Government  in  June  2004,  and  submitted  five  action  items  in-
tended  to  provide  specific  technology  plans  and  cost  targets  for  renewable  en-
ergy technologies using solar, biomass, wind, and geothermal resources. 

Closing Remarks 

The  Bush  Administration  has  developed  a  comprehensive  strategy  on  climate 
change  that  is  informed  by  science,  emphasizes  innovation  and  technological  solu-
tions,  and  promotes  international  collaboration  to  support  the  UNFCCC  objective. 
Further,  the  Administration  remains  committed  to  the  UNFCCC  and  to  the  mu-
tual goals of economic growth and energy security. The President has an ambitious 
near-term goal to reduce the greenhouse gas emission intensity of the U.S. economy, 
and  is  taking  many  actions  to  help  meet  that  goal.  We  are  also  investing  billions 
of  dollars  on  advancing  climate  science  and  accelerating  the  development  of  ad-
vanced  technologies—such  as  hydrogen,  carbon  sequestration,  advanced  nuclear 
power, and fusion energy—that have the potential to transform energy systems. And 
we  are  fully  engaged  internationally  and  lead  major  multilateral  and  bilateral  cli-
mate change science and technology initiatives, and will continue to cooperate with 
all nations. 

Although  the  scientific  and  technology  challenges  are  considerable,  the  President 
remains  committed  to  leading  the  way  on  climate  change  at  home  and  around  the 
world. 

Senator  VITTER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Conover,  we  want  to  welcome 
Chairman  Stevens,  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  being  here.  Now 
we’ll go to Mr. Reifsnyder. 

STATEMENT OF DANIEL A. REIFSNYDER, DIRECTOR, 

OFFICE OF GLOBAL CHANGE, BUREAU OF OCEANS AND 

INTERNATIONAL ENVIRONMENTAL AND SCIENTIFIC AFFAIRS, 

DEPARTMENT OF STATE 
Mr. REIFSNYDER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee, I’m pleased to 
have this opportunity to appear before you today to discuss the out-
come  with  respect  to  climate  change  of  the  recent  G8  Summit  in 
Scotland,  international  meetings  occurring  later  this  year,  and  a 
brief  overview  of  our  bilateral  and  multilateral  climate  change 
agreements. 

With  your  permission,  I  have  a  longer  statement  I  would  like  to 
submit for the record regarding the G8 Summit outcomes. Two key 
documents,  the  Leader’s  Statement  on  Climate  Change,  Clean  En-
ergy and Sustainable Development, and the Gleneagles Plan of Ac-
tion  supporting  the  strategies  set  forth  by  the  President  were  pro-
duced. The G8 leaders affirmed that, and I quote, ‘‘We face serious 
and  linked  challenges  in  tackling  climate  change,  promoting  clean 
energy and achieving sustainable development globally.’’ 

The  G8  leaders  agreed  that  the  Gleneagles  Program  of  Action,  a 
broad-based  practical  program  of  over  50  activities  to  address  cli-
mate change, to secure clean and affordable sources of energy, and 
to  promote  sustainable  development  over  the  coming  decades.  The 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

Gleneagles Program of Action calls for taking forward actions in six 
areas,  including  transforming  the  way  we  use  energy,  powering  a 
cleaner  future,  promoting  research  and  development,  financing  the 
transition  to  cleaner  energy,  managing  the  impact  of  climate 
change, and tackling illegal logging. 

Turning  to  future  international  meetings  as  part  of  the  imple-
mentation of Gleneagles—G8 leaders agreed to take forward a dia-
logue  on  climate  change,  clean  energy,  and  sustainable  develop-
ment,  inviting  other  interested  countries  with  significant  energy 
needs to join them. We understand that the United Kingdom plans 
to host a meeting in London on November 1 to this end, I have no 
additional details on this meeting at the moment, but we anticipate 
that it will focus on the specific elements of the Gleneagles Plan of 
Action, and seek to build on them. 

The  conference  of  the  parties  to  the  United  Nations  Framework 
Convention  on  Climate  Change  will  hold  its  11th  session  in  Mon-
treal  from  November  28  to  December  9,  2005.  As  the  Kyoto  Pro-
tocol  entered  into  force  on  February  16  of  this  year,  the  Montreal 
meeting will also be the first meeting of the parties under that in-
strument.  We  intend  to  carry  forward  our  message,  as  we  have  in 
the last two COPs, and anticipate that it will have increased reso-
nance  as  a  result  of  the  positive  G8  outcomes.  At  those  previous 
COPs, we have highlighted all that the United States is doing with 
respect to science and technology, and with respect to our domestic 
actions and international partnerships related to climate change. 

Turning  to  our  multilateral  and  bilateral  initiatives,  since  June 
of  2001,  the  United  States  has  launched  14  bilateral  or  regional 
partnerships  to  address  climate  change,  and  encompassing  over 
400  collaborative  activities  with  developing  and  developed  coun-
tries. These partnerships have, at their core, the principle that suc-
cessful  climate  change  policy  must  serve  a  larger  purpose  of  fos-
tering prosperity and well-being for citizens around the globe. 

In  recent  years,  the  United  States  has  launched  a  number  of 
multilateral  initiatives  that  address  both  near-term  and  longer- 
term  issues  related  to  climate  change,  science  and  technology,  as 
well  as  near-term  efforts  to  increase  energy  supplies,  while  reduc-
ing greenhouse gas emissions. 

Mr.  Chairman,  inasmuch  as  Mr.  Conover  mentioned,  some  of 
these  specific  initiatives,  the  only  one  I  would  like  also  to  mention 
here  is  the  Earth  Observation  Summit  that  was  held  in  Wash-
ington, D.C., in July 2003, to develop a comprehensive, coordinated 
and sustained Earth Observation System of Systems. That effort is 
well  underway,  as  the  newly  formed  group  on  observations  seeks 
to  meet  the  multiple  targets  in  its  10-year  implementation  plan. 
But  over  60  countries  and  30  international  organizations  are  now 
participating  in  this  effort,  and  an  International  Secretariat  has 
been established in Geneva, at the invitation of the World Meteoro-
logical Organization. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  hope  that  my  testimony  this  morning  conveys 
the sense of the vast extent to which the United States is working 
internationally with multiple partners to reduce greenhouse gas in-
tensity  and  promote  energy-efficient  technologies,  while  also  plac-
ing  primary  importance  on  supporting  economic  growth  and  pros-
perity. We see economic growth and addressing the climate change 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

problem  and  energy  security  as  integrally  related.  Thank  you  for 
this opportunity to testify before the Subcommittee on behalf of the 
Department  of  State.  I  would  be  pleased  to  answer  any  questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Reifsnyder follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DANIEL A.  REIFSNYDER,  DIRECTOR,  OFFICE OF GLOBAL 
CHANGE,  BUREAU OF OCEANS AND INTERNATIONAL ENVIRONMENTAL AND 
SCIENTIFIC AFFAIRS, DEPARTMENT OF STATE 
Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee, I am Dan Reifsnyder, Director 
of  the  Office  of  Global  Change  in  the  Bureau  of  Oceans  and  International  Environ-
mental and Scientific Affairs at the Department of State. I am very pleased to have 
this opportunity to appear before you today to discuss the outcome of the recent G8 
Summit in Gleneagles, Scotland, and upcoming international climate forums in Lon-
don  and  Montreal.  I  will  also  provide  an  overview  of  our  bilateral  climate  agree-
ments and our multilateral initiatives, as requested by Chairman Vitter. 
G8 Outcomes 

The  G8  Meeting  produced  two  key  documents:  (1)  the  Leaders’  Statement  on  Cli-
mate  Change,  Clean  Energy  and  Sustainable  Development,  and  (2)  the  Gleneagles 
Plan of Action. Both proved highly successful for the United States in that they sup-
port the strategy set forth by the President. Specifically, the Leaders noted that: 

‘‘We  face  serious  and  linked  challenges  in  tackling  climate  change,  promoting 
clean energy and achieving sustainable development globally.’’ 

In  other  words,  addressing  the  climate  challenge  is  inextricably  linked  to  our  ef-
forts to promote clean energy and to achieve sustainable development. As President 
Bush said in his speech at the Freer Gallery on June 30, 2005: 

‘‘. . .  Overcoming  extreme  poverty  goes  hand-in-hand  with  improving  the  envi-
ronment.  Stagnant  economies  are  one  of  the  greatest  environmental  threats  in 
our world. People who lack food and shelter, and sanitation cannot be expected 
to preserve the environment at the expense of their own survival. Poor societies 
cannot  afford  to  invest  in  cleaner,  more  efficient  technologies.  Indira  Gandhi 
spoke  of  poverty  and  need  as  the  greatest  polluters.  The  long-term  answer  to 
environmental  challenges  is  the  rapid,  sustained  economic  progress  of  poor  na-
tions.’’ 
The G8 Leaders also affirmed that: 
‘‘While  uncertainties  remain  in  our  understanding  of  climate  science,  we  know 
enough  to  act  now  to  put  ourselves  on  a  path  to  slow  and,  as  the  science  justi-
fies, stop and then reverse the growth of greenhouse gases.’’ 
They said that: 
‘‘Tackling  climate  change  and  promoting  clean  technologies,  while  pursuing  en-
ergy security and sustainable development, will require a global concerted effort 
over a sustained period.’’ 

Therefore, G8 Leaders agreed to the Gleneagles Program of Action, a broad-based, 
practical program of over fifty activities that will promote efforts to address climate 
change, to secure clean and affordable sources of energy, and to promote sustainable 
development over the coming decades. 

The  Gleneagles  Program  of  Action  calls  for  taking  forward  over  fifty  specific  ac-

tions in six key areas: 

‘‘(1)  Transforming  the  way  we  use  energy,’’  including  in  buildings,  appliances, 
surface transport, aviation and industry; 
‘‘(2)  Powering  a  cleaner  future,’’  with  specific  reference  to  cleaner  fossil  fuels, 
renewable energy and electricity grids; 
‘‘(3) Promoting research and development’’; 
‘‘(4) Financing the transition to cleaner energy’’; 
‘‘(5)  Managing  the  impact  of  climate  change,’’  including  with  respect  to  moni-
toring and data interpretation and risk management; and 
‘‘(6) Tackling illegal logging.’’ 

The  Gleneagles  Program  of  Action  puts  forward  one  of  the  most  practical  work 
programs in this area agreed to date by international partners. By focusing on areas 
that can achieve both near—and long—term benefits in multiple areas, it represents 
a  promising  effort  that  can  engage  developing  countries,  which  have  long  indicated 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

they  are  not  prepared  to  accept  negotiated  international  targets  on  greenhouse  gas 
emissions. 

We  are  also  pleased  that  four  of  the  multilateral  initiatives  launched  by  the 

United States are specifically endorsed in these G8 documents, including the: 

(1) Carbon Sequestration Leadership Forum (CSLF) 
(2) International Partnership for the Hydrogen Economy (IPHE) 
(3) Methane to Markets Partnership (M2M) and 
(4) Group on Earth Observations (GEO) 

I will describe each of these with more specificity a bit later. 

G8 London Meeting 

As  part  of  the  implementation  of  Gleneagles,  G8  leaders  agreed  to  take  forward 
a  Dialogue  on  Climate  Change,  Clean  Energy  and  Sustainable  Development,  invit-
ing other interested countries with significant energy needs to join them. They spe-
cifically committed to: 

‘‘(a)  address  the  strategic  challenge  of  transforming  our  energy  systems  to  cre-
ate a more secure and sustainable future; 
(b)  monitor  implementation  of  the  commitments  made  in  the  Gleneagles  Plan 
of Action and explore how to build on this progress; and 
(c) share best practice between participating governments. 

We  understand  that  the  United  Kingdom  plans  to  host  a  meeting  in  London  on 
November  1  to  take  forward  the  Dialogue  on  Climate  Change,  Clean  Energy  and 
Sustainable  Development.  I  have  no  additional  details  on  this  meeting  at  the  mo-
ment, but we anticipate that it will focus on the specific elements of the Gleneagles 
Plan of Action and seek to build on them. 
Montreal  Meeting  of  the  U.N.  Framework  Convention  on  Climate  Change 

(UNFCCC) 

The  Conference  of  the  Parties  (COP)  to  the  United  Nations  Framework  Conven-
tion  on  Climate  Change  will  hold  its  11th  Session  in  Montreal  from  November  28 
to  December  9,  2005.  Under  Secretary  of  State  for  Global  Affairs  Paula  J. 
Dobriansky will head the U.S. delegation to this meeting. As the Kyoto Protocol en-
tered  into  force  on  February  16  of  this  year,  the  Montreal  meeting  will  also  be  the 
first ‘‘meeting of the Parties (MOP)’’ under that instrument. 

While the COP and the MOP will take separate decisions, reflecting the different 
legal instruments involved and the different membership in these two bodies, there 
will be a joint ‘‘High Level Segment’’ from December 7–9. It is likely that statements 
of  ministers  and  other  heads  of  delegation  will  take  up  a  good  portion  of  the  time, 
rather  than  the  more  interactive  and  successful  roundtables  that  characterized  the 
High Level Segments of COP–9 in Milan and COP–10 in Buenos Aires. In addition, 
there  will  be  a  heavy  workload  under  the  MOP  as  the  Parties  to  that  instrument 
seek  to  adopt  the  ‘‘Marrakech  Accords’’  and  other  decisions  to  begin  implementing 
the Kyoto Protocol. 

We  intend  to  carry  forward  our  message,  as  we  have  in  the  last  two  COPs,  and 
anticipate  that  it  will  have  increased  resonance  as  a  result  of  the  positive  G8  out-
comes.  At  those  previous  COPs,  we  have  highlighted  all  that  the  United  States  is 
doing  with  respect  to  science  and  technology,  and  with  respect  to  our  domestic  ac-
tions and international partnerships related to climate change. 
Bilateral Climate Partnerships 

Since June 2001, the United States has launched 14 bilateral or regional partner-
ships to address climate change, encompassing over 400 collaborative activities with 
developing countries, such as Brazil, Central American countries as a group (includ-
ing  Costa  Rica,  El  Salvador,  Guatemala,  Honduras,  Nicaragua,  and  Panama), 
China, India, South Korea, Mexico, and South Africa. Bilateral initiatives with part-
ners  in  the  developed  world  include  those  with  Australia,  Canada,  the  European 
Commission,  Italy,  Japan,  New  Zealand,  and  the  Russian  Federation.  These  part-
nerships have at their core the principle that successful climate change policy must 
serve a larger purpose of fostering prosperity and well-being for citizens around the 
globe.  These  partnerships  have  resulted  in  joint  projects  on  climate  change  science, 
clean and advanced energy technologies, carbon capture, storage and sequestration, 
and policy approaches to greenhouse gas emissions. 
Global Environment Facility 

Another  example  of  international  cooperation  is  the  Global  Environment  Facility 
(GEF),  the  financial  mechanism  under  the  UNFCCC.  The  United  States  is  one  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

the  largest  contributors  to  the  GEF.  President  Bush’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  in-
cludes  a  $107.5  million  request  for  the  GEF.  The  GEF  focuses  on  innovative  and 
generally small scale projects and funds only the incremental costs involved in pro-
ducing global environmental benefits. Our commitment will fund technology transfer 
and  capacity  building  in  developing  countries.  The  GEF  has  committed  about  $5.4 
billion to date, leveraging over $17 billion from other sources, including the private 
sector,  international  development  banks  and  organizations,  governments,  NGO’s, 
and bilateral agencies. The GEF has designed and initiated nearly 1,600 investment 
and capacity building projects that are now being implemented by developing coun-
tries  with  the  help  of  ten  agencies,  including  the  U.N.  Development  Program  and 
the  International  Fund  for  Agricultural  Development.  It  has  also  provided  nearly 
5,000  small  grants  directly  to  NGO’s  and  community  groups  in  over  70  countries. 
Multilateral Initiatives 

In  recent  years,  the  United  States  has  launched  a  number  of  multilateral  initia-
tives  that  address  both  near-term  and  longer-term  issues  related  to  climate  change 
science and technology as well as near term efforts to increase energy supplies while 
reducing greenhouse gas emissions. 
Carbon Sequestration Leadership Forum 

The  Department  of  State  worked  with  the  Department  of  Energy  to  launch  the 
Carbon  Sequestration  Leadership  Forum  (CSLF)  in  June  2003.  The  CSLF,  which 
now  includes  17  countries  and  the  European  Commission,  focuses  on  the  develop-
ment  of  improved,  cost-effective  technologies  for  the  separation,  capture,  transport, 
and long-term storage of carbon dioxide in geological formations. Brazil, China, Co-
lombia,  India,  Mexico,  and  South  Africa  participate  in  this  cooperative  framework 
along with numerous partners in the developed world. 
International Partnership for the Hydrogen Economy 

The  Department  of  State  also  worked  closely  with  the  Department  of  Energy  to 
launch the International Partnership for the Hydrogen Economy in November 2003 
at a ministerial meeting in Washington, D.C. With 17 members, the IPHE provides 
a  forum  in  which  to  organize  and  coordinate  multinational  research,  development, 
and  deployment  of  programs  to  advance  the  transition  to  a  global  hydrogen  econ-
omy.  Among  developing  countries,  partners  include  Brazil,  China,  and  India.  IPHE 
partners are working together in such areas as hydrogen production and infrastruc-
ture,  hydrogen  storage,  and  codes  and  standards.  The  partnership  addresses  inter-
ests  in  both  stationary  and  mobile  sources  of  hydrogen  as  well  as  fuel  cells  and 
seeks  to  foster  implementation  of  large-scale,  long  term  public-private  cooperation 
to advance research, development, demonstration, and commercial use of these tech-
nologies.  Our  goal  is  to  make  fuel  cell  vehicles  commercially  available  by  2020,  in 
line  with  the  President’s  commitments  with  respect  to  both  Freedom  Fuels  and 
FreedomCAR. 
Methane to Markets Partnership 

The Department of State worked closely with the Environmental Protection Agen-
cy,  the  Department  of  Energy,  and  the  U.S.  Agency  for  International  Development 
to  launch  the  Methane  to  Markets  partnership  at  a  ministerial  meeting  in  Wash-
ington, D.C., in November 2004. The Partnership is designed to help promote energy 
security  and  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emissions  through  cost-effective,  near-term  re-
covery  and  use  of  methane.  Through  this  partnership,  the  United  States  and  15 
other  countries,  including  Argentina,  Australia,  Brazil,  Canada,  China,  Colombia, 
India, Italy, Japan, Mexico, Nigeria, Russia, South Korea, Ukraine, and the United 
Kingdom, target methane from oil and gas activities, in coal beds and from landfills. 
By  facilitating  international  cooperation,  the  Partnership  has  the  potential  to  re-
cover up to 500 billion cubic feet of methane annually by 2015, leading to the devel-
opment  of  new  and  cleaner  energy  sources  that  stimulate  economic  growth  and  im-
prove  the  environment.  President  Bush  has  pledged  to  commit  up  to  $53  million  to 
the Partnership over the next 5 years. 
Group on Earth Observations 

The  United  States  held  an  Earth  Observations  Summit  in  Washington,  D.C.  in 
July  2003  to  launch  a  multilateral  effort  to  establish  an  intergovernmental,  com-
prehensive, coordinated, and sustained Earth observation system. Continuous moni-
toring of the state of the Earth will improve our understanding of and ability to pre-
dict dynamic Earth processes and will provide timely, high-quality, long-term, global 
information  as  a  basis  for  sound  decisionmaking  about  climate  change  as  well  as 
for several other areas of societal benefit. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

Through two succeeding ministerial meetings (in Tokyo in April 2004 and in Brus-
sels  in  February  2005)  a  10-year  Implementation  Plan  for  the  Global  Earth  Obser-
vation System of Systems (GEOSS) was adopted, and the intergovernmental Group 
on  Earth  Observations  was  established  to  begin  implementation  of  the  2-,  6-,  and 
10-year  targets  identified  in  the  plan.  Over  60  countries  and  30  international  orga-
nizations  are  now  participating  in  this  effort,  and  an  international  secretariat  has 
been  established  in  Geneva  at  the  invitation  of  the  World  Meteorological  Organiza-
tion. 

The United States Group on Earth Observations (USGEO), a subcommittee of the 
National  Science  and  Technology  Council  Committee  on  Environment  and  Natural 
Resources coordinates the development of the Integrated Earth Observation System 
(IEOS)  which  is  the  U.S.  contribution  to  GEOSS.  GEOSS  and  IEOS  will  facilitate 
the  sharing  and  applied  usage  of  global,  regional,  and  local  data  from  satellites, 
ocean  buoys,  weather  stations  and  other  surface  and  airborne  Earth  observing  in-
struments. 
GEN–IV International Forum 

We are improving the reliability of nuclear power, which is already an important 
greenhouse  gas  emissions-free  energy  source  in  many  parts  of  the  world.  In  2001, 
the Department of Energy launched the Generation IV International Forum (GEN– 
IV), in which ten nations and Euratom are working together on the next generation 
of  nuclear  power  that  will  be  safer,  more  affordable,  and  more  proliferation-resist-
ant.  These  advanced  nuclear  technologies  will  help  provide  a  clean,  stable,  and 
abundant source of energy while reducing the global demand for fossil fuels. We are 
working closely with the Department of Energy on this initiative. 
ITER 

The  United  States  has  rejoined  an  effort  to  build  an  experimental  fusion  energy 
reactor.  ITER’s  members  include  China,  the  European  Union,  Japan,  the  Russian 
Federation, and South Korea. Fusion holds enormous promise as a potential source 
of  clean,  unlimited  energy  and  is  another  component  in  the  suite  of  technologies 
that comprise our long-term vision of developing and deploying transformational en-
ergy  technologies  as  the  key  to  energy  security  and  reduction  of  GHG  emissions. 
With the recent agreement to site the $5 billion experimental reactor in Cadarache, 
France, we look forward to continued progress in this endeavor. 
Tropical Forest Conservation 

Many of our international activities also help to promote the biological sequestra-
tion  of  carbon  dioxide,  an  important  tool  for  addressing  climate  change  that  can 
have  benefits  both  for  conservation  and  climate  change.  The  Tropical  Forest  Con-
servation  Act  (TFCA)  offers  eligible  developing  countries  opportunities  to  reduce 
concessional  debt  owed  to  the  United  States  while  generating  local  currency  funds 
to  support  programs  to  conserve  tropical  forests.  Since  1998,  the  United  States  has 
concluded nine TFCA agreements with eight countries that will generate more than 
$95  million  for  tropical  forest  conservation  over  the  next  10–25  years.  Three  U.S.- 
based international NGO’s (The Nature Conservancy, the World Wildlife Fund, and 
Conservation  International)  contributed  approximately  $7.5  million  to  six  of  the 
nine  agreements,  thereby  increasing  the  amount  of  debt  we  were  able  to  treat. 
TFCA  agreements  have  been  concluded  with  Bangladesh,  Belize,  Colombia,  El  Sal-
vador,  Jamaica,  Panama  (two  agreements),  Peru,  and  the  Philippines.  In  Fiscal 
Year  2006,  the  Administration  has  requested  a  total  of  approximately  $100  million 
for  certain  debt  restructuring  programs.  These  programs  include  bilateral  Heavily 
Indebted  Poor  Countries  (HIPC)  and  poorest  country  debt  reduction,  contributions 
to the HIPC Trust Fund and TFCA debt reduction. 
Illegal Logging 

In 2003, the Department of State launched the President’s Initiative Against Ille-
gal Logging (PIAIL) to assist developing countries to combat illegal logging and the 
sale and export of illegally harvested timber products. This initiative represents the 
most comprehensive strategy undertaken by any nation to address this critical sus-
tainable  development  challenge  and  reinforces  U.S.  leadership  in  taking  action  to 
counter the problem and conserve forest resources that store carbon. 
Concluding Remarks 

Mr. Chairman, I hope that my testimony this morning conveys a sense of the vast 
extent to which the United States is working to reduce greenhouse gas intensity and 
promote energy efficient technologies, while also placing primary importance on sup-
porting  economic  growth  and  prosperity.  We  see  economic  growth,  addressing  the 
climate change problem, and energy security as integrally related. Meeting the chal-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

lenge  of  the  expected  future  growth  in  global  energy  demand,  and  reducing  green-
house  gas  emissions,  will  require  a  transformation  in  the  way  the  world  produces 
and consumes energy over the next generation and beyond. This is why we are lead-
ing  global  efforts  to  develop  and  deploy  breakthrough  technologies  for  both  the  de-
veloped and developing world. 

I  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  testify  before  this  Subcommittee  on  behalf  of 
the Department of State. I would be pleased to answer any questions you may have. 

Senator VITTER. Thank you, Mr. Reifsnyder, Dr. Cicerone? 

STATEMENT OF RALPH J. CICERONE, PH.D., PRESIDENT, 

NATIONAL ACADEMY OF SCIENCES 

Dr.  CICERONE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  Lautenberg, 
for  the  opportunity.  I  just  moved  here  recently  from  California 
where I was Chancellor of one of the U.C. campuses and Professor 
of  Chemistry  and  Professor  of  Earth  Systems  Science.  I  should 
have known about the humidity in Washington, but I didn’t, so I’m 
learning firsthand. 

This morning I’ll be—— 
Senator  VITTER.  Being  from  Louisiana,  I  would  just  note,  this  is 

spring-like weather. 

[Laughter.] 
Dr. CICERONE. Thank you. With your permission, I’d like to sub-
mit  some  written  testimony  as  well,  and  so  I’ll  summarize  briefly. 
The  current  state  of  scientific  understanding  of  climate  change, 
basing  largely  on  findings  and  recommendations  that  Academies 
reports  have  come  up  with  over  the  last  15  years  or  so,  these  re-
ports are almost always the products of a study process that brings 
together  scientists,  engineers,  public  health  officials,  and  other  ex-
perts  to  provide  a  consensus  reading  and  advice  to  the  Nation  on 
specific scientific and technical questions. 

First  of  all,  the  Earth  is  warming,  as  Senator  Lautenberg  and 
Senator Vitter said earlier. Our record is based on hundreds of mil-
lions  of  temperature  measurements  over  the  last  140  years  or  so 
from  weather  stations  and  ship-based  observations.  One  common 
measure  is  the  Planetary  Average  Surface  Temperature,  it’s  in-
creased  about  seven-tenths  of  a  degree  Fahrenheit  just  since  the 
mid-1970s,  and  in  my  written  testimony  I  have  a  figure  of  such 
data from one of the data sources, there are several. And although 
the  magnitude  of  this  warming  varies  locally,  the  warming  trend 
is very widespread. It is consistent with an array of other evidence, 
such as melting glaciers and ice caps, sea level rise, extended grow-
ing  seasons  that  have  been  observed,  and  changes  in  the  geo-
graphical distributions of plant and animal species. 

The  ocean,  which  represents  the  largest  single  reservoir  of  heat 
in  the  climate  system  because  of  the  heat  capacity  of  water,  has 
itself  warmed  by  a  little  bit  more  than  a  tenth  of  a  degree,  just  in 
the  last  12  years  or  so,  in  the  surface  layer  that  extends  down  to 
about 750 foot depth. Going back further, laboratory measurements 
of gases which have been extracted from dated ice cores around the 
world’s  glaciers  have  shown  that  for  hundreds  of  thousands  of 
years, the changes in temperature, that themselves can be deduced 
from  isotopic  contents  of  the  ice,  have  closely  tracked  atmospheric 
carbon dioxide concentrations. Carbon dioxide in the atmosphere is 
now at the highest level in the last 400,000 years, and it continues 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

to  rise,  and  it’s  due  mostly  from  the  burning  of  fossil  fuels  for  our 
energy needs. 

29 

Nearly  all  climate  scientists  today  believe  that  much  of  Earth’s 
current  warming  has  been  caused  by  the  increases  in  these  green-
house  gases  in  the  air.  One  of  the  other  ideas  is  that  changes  in 
the  sun’s  total  brightness  could  be  causing  the  recently  observed 
warming,  say  over  the  past  century,  have  become  much  more  dif-
ficult  to  accept,  due  to  the  fact  that  humans  have  been  measuring 
the sun carefully enough over the last 25 years to show that there 
is no detectable trend in the sun’s brightness. 

Computations  of  future  climate  change  project  that  in  this  cur-
rent  century,  global  surface  temperatures  are  going  to  continue  to 
rise.  The  range  of  such  temperature  increases  from,  say,  two  and 
a  half  to  10  degrees  Fahrenheit,  above  the  levels  of  15  years  ago, 
difficult  to  pin  down  the  range  any  more  than  that,  for  example, 
because we don’t know society’s own future actions—we don’t know 
what  human  numbers  will  be,  we  don’t  know  economic  growth 
rates and energy use practices underlying that. On the other hand, 
we  can  say  the  warming  will  continue,  for  example,  because  some 
latent  warming  is  built  into  the  system  already,  due  to  a  lack  of 
equilibrium in the energy balance on the planetary energy balance. 
However,  while  future  climate  change  details  and  regional  im-
pacts are inherently uncertain, they’re far from unknown. The com-
bined  effects  of  ice  melting  and  sea  water  expansion  from  ocean 
warming alone will likely cause the global average sea level to rise 
by,  oh,  say  a  half  a  meter,  plus  or  minus  four  tenths  of  a  meter 
in this coming century, and in colder climates, such warming could 
bring  longer  growing  seasons  and  less  severe  winters.  However, 
those  in  coastal  communities—especially  developing  nations—will 
be  vulnerable  to  increased  flooding  due  to  sea  level  rise  and  storm 
surges on top of the mean sea level, and it’s also likely that we will 
experience more severe storms and surges. 

In the Arctic regions, where temperatures have risen much more 
than  the  global  average,  the  landscape  and  ecosystems  are  being 
altered rapidly, however, in my own opinion, we’re not exactly sure 
why.  The  National  Academies  have  tried  very  hard,  when  re-
quested, to provide advice to Federal agencies that conduct climate 
change  research,  now  for  well  over  two  decades,  and  recently—as 
Dr.  Mahoney  said—the  Academy  has  assisted  the  U.S.  Climate 
Change  Science  Program,  by  reviewing  its  10  year  strategic  plan. 
And  in  the  2004  review,  the  Academy  recommended  that  the  plan 
be  implemented  as  soon  as  possible,  recognized  hurdles,  com-
plimented  the  strategic  planning  involved,  the  scope  of  it,  and  did 
make comments on the budget perhaps not being—as it’s currently 
arranged, at least—capable of supporting all of the activities in the 
strategic plan. 

We do have working arrangements with Dr. Mahoney’s office and 
several  other  Federal  agencies  to  continue  to  provide  critical  re-
view,  using  experts  from  inside  the  government  and  outside  the 
government  on  program  priorities  implementation,  strategy  and 
progress.  The  Academy  is,  I  hope,  fully  engaged,  and  we’ll  do  the 
best  we  can  to  provide  independent  assessments  and  advice  at 
every stage. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

I’ll just conclude by saying that the overall task of mitigating and 
preparing for the impacts of climate change will require worldwide 
collaborative  efforts  and  inputs  from  a  wide  range  of  experts,  in-
cluding  government  leaders,  and  government  at  all  levels—busi-
ness leaders, natural scientists, engineers, social scientists, medical 
people,  and  economists.  And  although  the  scientific  understanding 
of  climate  change  has  advanced  significantly  in  the  last  several 
decades,  there  are  still  many  unanswered  questions.  We  all  have 
increased  pressure  and  incentive  to  decide  how  best  to  respond, 
and I hope that we can continue to work together to do that, thank 
you. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Cicerone follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RALPH J. CICERONE, PH.D., PRESIDENT, 

NATIONAL ACADEMY OF SCIENCES 

Good morning, Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee. My name is Ralph 
Cicerone, and I am President of the National Academy of Sciences. Prior to this po-
sition, I served as Chancellor of the University of California at Irvine, where I also 
held  the  Daniel  G.  Aldrich  Chair  in  Earth  System  Science.  In  addition,  in  2001,  I 
chaired  the  National  Academies  committee  that  wrote  the  report,  Climate  Change 
Science: An Analysis of Some Key Questions, at the request of the White House. 

This  morning  I  will  summarize  briefly  the  current  state  of  scientific  under-
standing  on  climate  change,  based  largely  on  the  findings  and  recommendations  in 
recent  National  Academies’  reports,  focusing  especially  on  the  2001  report  that  I 
chaired and the 2003 report Implementing Climate and Global Change Research, in 
which the U.S. Climate Change Science Program strategic plan was reviewed. These 
reports  are  the  products  of  a  study  process  that  brings  together  leading  scientists, 
engineers,  public  health  officials,  and  other  experts  to  provide  consensus  advice  to 
the  Nation  on  specific  scientific  and  technical  questions.  The  recent  statement  on 
climate  change  issued  by  the  G8  countries,  China,  India,  and  Brazil  is  also  based 
on findings in these and other reports of the National Academies. 
Science of Climate Change 
The Earth is warming. Weather station records and ship-based observations indi-
cate that global mean surface air temperature increased about 0.7 °F (0.4 °C) since 
the early 1970s (See Figure). Although the magnitude of warming varies locally, the 
warming trend is spatially widespread and is consistent with an array of other evi-
dence  (e.g.,  melting  glaciers  and  ice  caps,  sea  level  rise,  extended  growing  seasons, 
and  changes  in  the  geographical  distributions  of  plant  and  animal  species).  The 
ocean,  which  represents  the  largest  reservoir  of  heat  in  the  climate  system,  has 
warmed by about 0.12 °F (0.06 °C) averaged over the layer extending from the sur-
face down to 750 feet, since 1993. 

Laboratory measurements of gases trapped in dated ice cores have shown that for 
hundreds of thousands of years, changes in temperature have closely tracked atmos-
pheric carbon dioxide concentrations. Burning fossil fuel for energy, industrial proc-
esses, and transportation releases carbon dioxide to the atmosphere. Carbon dioxide 
in the atmosphere is now at its highest level in 400,000 years and continues to rise. 
Nearly  all  climate  scientists  today  believe  that  much  of  Earth’s  current  warming 
has been caused by increases in the amount of greenhouse gases in the atmosphere, 
mostly  from  the  burning  of  fossil  fuels.  In  fact,  recent  analyses  of  measurements  of 
the  Sun’s  total  brightness  argue  against  any  detectable  long-term  trend  in  the  en-
ergy  Earth  receives  from  the  Sun,  making  it  difficult  to  conclude  that  the  Sun  has 
been responsible for the warming observed over the past 25 years. 

Carbon dioxide can remain in the atmosphere for many decades, and major parts 
of  the  climate  system  respond  slowly  to  changes  in  greenhouse  gas  concentrations. 
The slow response of the climate system to increasing greenhouse gases also means 
that changes and impacts will continue during the twenty-first century and beyond, 
even if emissions were to be stabilized or reduced in the near future. 
Simulations  of  future  climate  change  project  that,  by  2100,  global  surface  tem-
peratures  will  be  from  2.5  to  10.4  °F  (1.4  to  5.8  °C)  above  1990  levels.  Pinpointing 
the  magnitude  of  future  warming  is  hindered  both  by  remaining  gaps  in  under-
standing  the  science,  and  by  the  fact  that  it  is  difficult  to  predict  society’s  future 
actions, particularly in the areas of population growth, economic growth, and energy 
use  practices.  Other  scientific  uncertainties  about  future  climate  change  relate  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

the  regional  effects  of  climate  change,  and  how  climate  change  will  affect  the  fre-
quency and severity of weather events. 

It is important to recognize however, that while future climate change and its im-
pacts are inherently uncertain, they are far from unknown. The combined effects of 
ice melting and sea water expansion from ocean warming will likely cause the global 
average sea-level to rise by between 0.1 and 0.9 meters between 1990 and 2100. In 
colder  climates,  such  warming  could  bring  longer  growing  seasons  and  less  severe 
winters.  Those  in  coastal  communities,  many  in  developing  nations,  will  experience 
increased  flooding  due  to  sea  level  rise,  and  are  likely  to  experience  more  severe 
storms and surges. In the Arctic regions, where temperatures have risen more than 
the global average, the landscape and ecosystems are being altered rapidly. 
National Academies Advice on U.S. Climate Change Research 

The  National  Academies  have  provided  advice  to  the  Federal  agencies  that  con-
duct  climate  change  research  for  over  two  decades.  Recently,  the  National  Acad-
emies  assisted  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program  (CCSP)  by  reviewing  its 
10-year  strategic  plan.  The  2004  review  of  the  final  strategic  plan,  recommended 
that  it  be  implemented  as  soon  as  possible,  although  significant  hurdles  face  the 
CCSP  and  participating  agencies  in  doing  so.  For  example,  meeting  all  program 
goals  will  require  advances  in  previously  under-emphasized,  but  societally  relevant 
elements of the program, including ecosystems, the water cycle, human dimensions, 
economics,  impacts,  adaptation,  and  mitigation,  as  well  as  further  development  of 
the  program’s  decision  support  activities.  The  strategic  plan  identifies  a  much 
broader scope of activities than has historically been supported. However, the CCSP 
budget  at  the  time  did  not  appear  to  be  capable  of  supporting  all  of  the  activities 
in the strategic plan. The National Academies’ report also concluded that, given the 
political sensitivities associated with climate change, special measures may be need-
ed to ensure the scientific independence and credibility of the program and its prod-
ucts. 

One of the recommendations from the 2004 National Academies’ review to address 
these hurdles, was for the CCSP to establish a mechanism for independent oversight 
of  the  program  as  a  whole.  In  June  2005,  CCSP  requested  support  from  the  Na-
tional Academies in two new areas: 

1. A new CCSP Committee will provide ongoing, independent advice on on pro-
gram priorities and implementation strategy and will evaluate progress toward 
meeting the program’s goals. The Committee also will facilitate, when requested 
by  the  sponsor  or  participating  agencies,  (1)  National  Academies’  reviews  of 
draft CCSP synthesis and assessment products, (2) National Academies’ reviews 
of  draft  prospectuses  for  CCSP  synthesis  and  assessment  products,  and  (3)  re-
lated  analyses  to  bound  the  uncertainty  associated  with  the  interpretation  of 
scientific findings. 
2.  A  committee  is  now  being  formed  to  undertake  a  comparative  study  of  rel-
evant previous global change assessments conducted around the world, in order 
to  provide  background  information  for  the  assessments  being  prepared  by 
CCSP.  The  committee  will  evaluate  several  cases  chosen  to  span  the  range  of 
assessment approaches in terms of geographic scale, subject matter scope, entity 
responsible for conducting the assessment, and timing. 

Concluding Remarks 

The  task  of  mitigating  and  preparing  for  the  impacts  of  climate  change  will  re-
quire worldwide collaborative inputs from a wide range of experts, including natural 
scientists, engineers, social scientists, medical scientists, those in government at all 
levels,  business  leaders,  and  economists.  Although  the  scientific  understanding  of 
climate change has advanced significantly in the last several decades, there are still 
many  unanswered  questions.  Society  faces  increasing  pressure  to  decide  how  best 
to  respond  to  climate  change  and  associated  global  changes,  and  applied  research 
in direct support of decisionmaking is needed. 

The  written  testimony  that  follows  describes  in  more  detail  important  findings 
and  recommendations  from  a  number  of  recent  National  Academies’  reports  on  cli-
mate change. 
U.S. Climate Change Research 
The Earth Is Warming 

The most striking evidence of a global warming trend are closely scrutinized data 
that  show  a  relatively  rapid  increase  in  temperature,  particularly  over  the  past  30 
years.  Weather  station  records  and  ship-based  observations  indicate  that  global 
mean  surface  air  temperature  increased  about  0.7 °F  (0.4 °C)  since  the  early  1970s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

(See Figure). Although the magnitude of warming varies locally, the warming trend 
is spatially widespread and is consistent with an array of other evidence (e.g., melt-
ing  glaciers  and  ice  caps,  sea  level  rise,  extended  growing  seasons,  and  changes  in 
the geographical distributions of plant and animal species). 

The  ocean,  which  represents  the  largest  reservoir  of  heat  in  the  climate  system, 
has  warmed  by  about  0.12 °F  (0.06 °C)  averaged  over  the  layer  extending  from  the 
surface  down  to  750  feet,  since  1993.  Recent  studies  have  shown  that  the  observed 
heat  storage  in  the  oceans  is  what  would  be  expected  by  a  human-enhanced  green-
house effect. Indeed, increased ocean heat content accounts for most of the planetary 
energy  imbalance  (i.e.,  when  the  Earth  absorbs  more  energy  from  the  Sun  than  it 
emits  back  to  space)  simulated  by  climate  models  with  mid-range  climate  sensi-
tivity. 

The observed warming has not proceeded at a uniform rate. Virtually all the 20th 
century  warming  in  global  surface  air  temperature  occurred  between  the  early 
1900s  and  the  1940s,  and  since  the  1970s,  with  a  slight  cooling  of  the  Northern 
Hemisphere  during  the  interim  decades.  The  troposphere  warmed  much  more  dur-
ing  the  1970s  than  during  the  two  subsequent  decades,  whereas  Earth’s  surface 
warmed  more  during  the  past  two  decades  than  during  the  1970s.  The  causes  of 
these  irregularities,  and  the  disparities  in  the  timing,  are  not  completely  under-
stood. 

A National Academies’ report released in 2000, Reconciling Observations of Global 
Temperature  Change,  examined  different  types  of  temperature  measurements  col-
lected  from  1979  to  1999  and  concluded  that  the  warming  trend  in  global-average 
surface temperature observations during the previous 20 years is undoubtedly real, 
and is substantially greater than the average rate of warming during the twentieth 
century. The report concludes that the lower atmosphere actually may have warmed 
much  less  rapidly  than  the  surface  from  1979  into  the  late  1990s,  due  both  to  nat-
ural  causes  (e.g.,  the  sequence  of  volcanic  eruptions  that  occurred  within  this  par-
ticular  20-year  period)  and  human  activities  (e.g.,  the  cooling  of  the  upper  part  of 
the  troposphere  resulting  from  ozone  depletion  in  the  stratosphere).  The  report 
spurred many research groups to do similar analyses. Satellite observations of mid-
dle troposphere temperatures, after several revisions of the data, now compare rea-
sonably with observations from surface stations and radiosondes, although some un-
certainties remain. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
e
c
c

i

Humans Have Had an Impact on Climate 

33 

Laboratory measurements of gases trapped in dated ice cores have shown that for 
hundreds  of  thousands  of  years,  changes  in  temperature  have  closely  tracked  with 
atmospheric carbon dioxide concentrations. Burning fossil fuel for energy, industrial 
processes, and transportation releases carbon dioxide to the atmosphere. Carbon di-
oxide  in  the  atmosphere  is  now  at  its  highest  level  in  400,000  years  and  continues 
to  rise.  Nearly  all  climate  scientists  today  believe  that  much  of  Earth’s  current 
warming  has  been  caused  by  increases  in  the  amount  of  greenhouse  gases  in  the 
atmosphere. The degree of confidence in this conclusion is higher today than it was 
10, or even 5 years ago, but uncertainties remain. As stated in the Academies 2001 
report, ‘‘the changes observed over the last several decades are likely mostly due to 
human activities, but we cannot rule out that some significant part of these changes 
is also a reflection of natural variability.’’ 

Carbon  dioxide  can  remain  in  the  atmosphere  for  many  decades  and  major  parts 
of  the  climate  system  respond  slowly  to  changes  in  greenhouse  gas  concentrations. 
The slow response of the climate system to increasing greenhouse gases also means 
that changes and impacts will continue during the twenty-first century and beyond, 
even if emissions were to be stabilized or reduced in the near future. 

In  order  to  compare  the  contributions  of  the  various  agents  that  affect  surface 
temperature,  scientists  have  devised  the  concept  of  ‘‘radiative  forcing.’’  Radiative 
forcing is the change in the balance between radiation (i.e., heat and energy) enter-
ing  the  atmosphere  and  radiation  going  back  out.  Positive  radiative  forcings  (e.g., 
due  to  excess  greenhouse  gases)  tend  on  average  to  warm  the  Earth,  and  negative 
radiative  forcings  (e.g.,  due  to  volcanic  eruptions  and  many  human-produced 
aerosols) on average tend to cool the Earth. The Academies recent report, Radiative 
Forcing  of  Climate  Change:  Expanding  the  Concept  and  Addressing  Uncertainties 
(2005),  takes  a  close  look  at  how  climate  has  been  changed  by  a  range  of  forcings. 
A  key  message  from  the  report  is  that  it  is  important  to  quantify  how  human  and 
natural  processes  cause  changes  in  climate  variables  other  than  temperature.  For 
example,  climate-driven  changes  in  precipitation  in  certain  regions  could  have  sig-
nificant impacts on water availability for agriculture, residential and industrial use, 
and  recreation.  Such  regional  impacts  will  be  much  more  noticeable  than  projected 
changes in global average temperature of a degree or more. 

One area of debate has been the extent to which variations in the Sun might con-
tribute  to  recent  observed  warming  trends.  Radiative  Forcing  of  Climate  Change: 
Expanding  the  Concept  and  Addressing  Uncertainties  (2005)  also  summarizes  cur-
rent understanding about this issue. The Sun’s brightness—its total irradiance—has 
been measured continuously by a series of satellite-based instruments for more than 
two  complete  11-year  solar  cycles.  These  multiple  solar  irradiance  datasets  have 
been combined into a composite time series of daily total solar irradiance from 1979 
to  the  present.  Different  assumptions  about  radiometer  performance  lead  to  dif-
ferent  reconstructions  for  the  past  two  decades.  Recent  analyses  of  these  measure-
ments,  taking  into  account  instrument  calibration  offsets  and  drifts,  argue  against 
any detectable long-term trend in the observed irradiance to date. Likewise, models 
of  total  solar  irradiance  variability  that  account  for  the  influences  of  solar  activity 
features—dark  sunspots  and  bright  faculae—do  not  predict  a  secular  change  in  the 
past two decades. Thus, it is difficult to conclude from either measurements or mod-
els  that  the  Sun  has  been  responsible  for  the  warming  observed  over  the  past  25 
years. 

Knowledge  of  solar  irradiance  variations  is  rudimentary  prior  to  the  commence-
ment  of  continuous  space-based  irradiance  observations  in  1979.  Models  of  sunspot 
and  facular  influences  developed  from  the  contemporary  data  base  have  been  used 
to  extrapolate  daily  variations  during  the  11-year  cycle  back  to  about  1950  using 
contemporary sunspot and facular proxies, and with less certainty annually to 1610. 
Circumstantial  evidence  from  cosmogenic  isotope  proxies  of  solar  activity  (14C  and 
10Be)  and  plausible  variations  in  Sun-like  stars  motivated  an  assumption  of  long- 
term  secular  irradiance  trends,  but  recent  work  questions  the  evidence  from  both. 
Very  recent  studies  of  the  long  term  evolution  and  transport  of  activity  features 
using  solar  models  suggest  that  secular  solar  irradiance  variations  may  be  limited 
in amplitude to about half the amplitude of the 11-year cycle. 
Warming will continue, but its impacts are difficult to project 

The  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  (IPCC),  which  involves  hun-
dreds  of  scientists  in  assessing  the  state  of  climate  change  science,  has  estimated 
that,  by  2100,  global  surface  temperatures  will  be  from  2.5  to  10.4°F  (1.4  to  5.8°C) 
above 1990 levels. Similar projections of temperature increases, based on rough cal-
culations  and  nascent  theory,  were  made  in  the  Academies  first  report  on  climate 
change  published  in  the  late  1970s.  Since  then,  significant  advances  in  our  knowl-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

edge of the climate system and our ability to model and observe it have yielded con-
sistent estimates. Pinpointing the magnitude of future warming is hindered both by 
remaining  gaps  in  understanding  the  science  and  by  the  fact  that  it  is  difficult  to 
predict  society’s  future  actions,  particularly  in  the  areas  of  population  growth,  eco-
nomic growth, and energy use practices. 

One of the major scientific uncertainties is how climate could be affected by what 
are  known  as  ‘‘climate  feedbacks.’’  Feedbacks  can  either  amplify  or  dampen  the  cli-
mate  response  to  an  initial  radiative  forcing.  During  a  feedback  process,  a  change 
in  one  variable,  such  as  carbon  dioxide  concentration,  causes  a  change  in  tempera-
ture,  which  then  causes  a  change  in  a  third  variable,  such  as  water  vapor,  which 
in  turn  causes  a  further  change  in  temperature.  Understanding  Climate  Change 
Feedbacks  (2003)  looks  at  what  is  known  and  not  known  about  climate  change 
feedbacks  and  identifies  important  research  avenues  for  improving  our  under-
standing. 

Other  scientific  uncertainties  relate  to  the  regional  effects  of  climate  change  and 
how  climate  change  will  affect  the  frequency  and  severity  of  weather  events.  Al-
though scientists are starting to forecast regional weather impacts, the level of con-
fidence  is  less  than  it  is  for  global  climate  projections.  In  general,  temperature  is 
easier  to  predict  than  changes  such  as  rainfall,  storm  patterns,  and  ecosystem  im-
pacts.  It  is  very  likely  that  increasing  global  temperatures  will  lead  to  higher  max-
imum  temperatures  and  fewer  cold  days  over  most  land  areas.  Some  scientists  be-
lieve  that  heat  waves  such  as  those  experienced  in  Chicago  and  central  Europe  in 
recent  years  will  continue  and  possibly  worsen.  The  larger  and  faster  the  changes 
in  climate,  the  more  difficult  it  will  be  for  human  and  natural  systems  to  adapt 
without adverse effects. 

There is evidence that the climate has sometimes changed abruptly in the past— 
within a decade—and could do so again. Abrupt changes, for example the Dust Bowl 
drought  of  the  1930s  displaced  hundreds  of  thousands  of  people  in  the  American 
Great  Plains,  take  place  so  rapidly  that  humans  and  ecosystems  have  difficulty 
adapting to it. Abrupt Climate Change: Inevitable Surprises (2002) outlines some of 
the  evidence  for  and  theories  of  abrupt  change.  One  theory  is  that  melting  ice  caps 
could  ‘‘freshen’’  the  water  in  the  North  Atlantic,  shutting  down  the  natural  ocean 
circulation  that  brings  warmer  Gulf  Stream  waters  to  the  north  and  cooler  waters 
south  again.  This  shutdown  could  make  it  much  cooler  in  Northern  Europe  and 
warmer near the equator. 

It  is  important  to  recognize  that  while  future  climate  change  and  its  impacts  are 
inherently  uncertain,  they  are  far  from  unknown.  The  combined  effects  of  ice  melt-
ing  and  sea  water  expansion  from  ocean  warming  will  likely  cause  the  global  aver-
age sea-level to rise by between 0.1 and 0.9 meters between 1990 and 2100. In cold-
er  climates,  such  warming  could  bring  longer  growing  seasons  and  less  severe  win-
ters.  Those  in  coastal  communities,  many  in  developing  nations,  will  experience  in-
creased  flooding  due  to  sea  level  rise  and  are  likely  to  experience  more  severe 
storms  and  surges.  In  the  Arctic  regions,  where  temperatures  have  risen  almost 
twice  as  much  as  the  global  average,  the  landscape  and  ecosystems  are  being  al-
tered rapidly. 
Observations and Data Are the Foundation of Climate Change Science 

There is nothing more valuable to scientists than the measurements and observa-
tions  required  to  confirm  or  contradict  hypotheses.  In  climate  sciences,  there  is  a 
peculiar  relation  between  the  scientist  and  the  data.  Whereas  other  scientific  dis-
ciplines can run multiple, controlled experiments, climate scientists must rely on the 
one realization that nature provides. Climate change research requires observations 
of numerous characteristics of the Earth system over long periods of time on a glob-
al basis. Climate scientists must rely on data collected by a whole suite of observing 
systems—from  satellites  to  surface  stations  to  ocean  buoys—operated  by  various 
government  agencies  and  countries  as  well  as  climate  records  from  ice  cores,  tree 
rings, corals, and sediments that help reconstruct past change. 
Collecting and Archiving Data To Meet the Unique Needs of Climate Change Science 
Most of the instrumentation and observing systems used to monitor climate today 
were established to provide data for other purposes, such as predicting daily weath-
er;  advising  farmers;  warning  of  hurricanes,  tornadoes  and  floods;  managing  water 
resources;  aiding  ocean  and  air  transportation;  and  understanding  the  ocean.  How-
ever,  collecting  climate  data  is  unique  because  higher  precision  is  often  needed  in 
order  to  detect  climate  trends,  the  observing  programs  need  to  be  sustained  indefi-
nitely  and  accommodate  changes  in  observing  technology,  and  observations  are 
needed at both global scales and at local scales to serve a range of climate informa-
tion users. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

Every  report  on  climate  change  produced  by  the  National  Academies  in  recent 
years  has  recommended  improvements  to  climate  observing  capabilities.  A  central 
theme  of  the  report  Adequacy  of  Climate  Observing  Systems  (1999)  is  the  need  to 
dramatically upgrade our climate observing capabilities. The report presents ten cli-
mate  monitoring  principles  that  continue  to  be  the  basis  for  designing  climate  ob-
serving systems, including management of network change, careful calibration, con-
tinuity  of  data  collection,  and  documentation  to  ensure  that  meaningful  trends  can 
be derived. 

Another key concept for climate change science is the ability to generate, analyze, 
and archive long-term climate data records (CDRs) for assessing the state of the en-
vironment  in  perpetuity.  In  Climate  Data  Records  from  Environmental  Satellites 
(2004),  a  climate  data  record  is  defined  as  a  time  series  of  measurements  of  suffi-
cient  length,  consistency,  and  continuity  to  determine  climate  variability  and 
change. The report identifies several elements of successful climate data record gen-
eration  programs,  ranging  from  effective,  expert  leadership  to  long-term  commit-
ment to sustaining the observations and archives. 
Integrating Knowledge and Data on Climate Change Through Models 

An  important  concept  that  emerged  from  early  climate  science  in  the  1980s  was 
that Earth’s climate is not just a collection of long-term weather statistics, but rath-
er  the  complex  interactions  or  ‘‘couplings’’  of  the  atmosphere,  the  ocean,  the  land, 
and plant and animal life. Climate models are built using our best scientific knowl-
edge,  first  modeling  each  process  component  separately  and  then  linking  them  to-
gether to simulate these couplings. 

Climate  models  are  important  tools  for  understanding  how  the  climate  operates 
today,  how  it  may  have  functioned  differently  in  the  past,  and  how  it  may  evolve 
in the future in response to forcings from both natural processes and human activi-
ties.  Climate  scientists  can  deal  with  uncertainty  about  future  climate  by  running 
models  with  different  assumptions  of  future  population  growth,  economic  develop-
ment,  energy  use,  and  policy  choices,  such  as  those  that  affect  air  quality  or  influ-
ence how nations share technology. Models then offer a range of outcomes based on 
these different assumptions. 
Modeling Capability and Accuracy 

Since the first climate models were pioneered in the 1970s, the accuracy of models 
has  improved  as  the  number  and  quality  of  observations  and  data  have  increased, 
as  computational  abilities  have  multiplied,  and  as  our  theoretical  understanding  of 
the  climate  system  has  improved.  Whereas  early  attempts  at  modeling  used  rel-
atively crude representations of the climate, today’s models have very sophisticated 
and carefully tested treatment of hundreds of climate processes. 

The National Academies’ report Improving Effectiveness of U.S. Climate Modeling 
(2001)  offers  several  recommendations  for  strengthening  climate  modeling  capabili-
ties,  some  of  which  have  already  been  adopted  in  the  United  States.  At  the  time 
the report was published, U.S. modeling capabilities were lagging behind some other 
countries. The report identified a shortfall in computing facilities and highly skilled 
technical workers devoted to climate modeling. Federal agencies have begun to cen-
tralize  their  support  for  climate  modeling  efforts  at  the  National  Center  for  Atmos-
pheric Research and the Geophysical Fluid Dynamics Laboratory. However, the U.S. 
could still improve the amount of resources it puts toward climate modeling as rec-
ommended in Planning Climate and Global Change Research (2003). 
Climate Change Impacts Will Be Uneven 

There will be winners and losers from the impacts of climate change, even within 
a  single  region,  but  globally  the  losses  are  expected  to  outweigh  the  benefits.  The 
regions  that  will  be  most  severely  affected  are  often  the  regions  that  are  the  least 
able  to  adapt.  For  example,  Bangladesh,  one  of  the  poorest  nations  in  the  world,  is 
projected  to  lose  17.5  percent  of  its  land  if  sea  level  rises  about  40  inches  (1  m), 
displacing tens of thousands of people. Several islands throughout the South Pacific 
and  Indian  Oceans  will  be  at  similar  risk  of  increased  flooding  and  vulnerability  to 
storm surges. Coastal flooding likely will threaten animals, plants, and fresh water 
supplies. Tourism and local agriculture could be severely challenged. 

Wetland and coastal areas of many developed nations including the United States 
are  also  threatened.  For  example,  parts  of  New  Orleans  are  as  much  as  eight  feet 
below  sea  level  today.  However,  wealthy  countries  are  much  more  able  to  adapt  to 
sea  level  rise  and  threats  to  agriculture.  Solutions  could  include  building,  limiting 
or  changing  construction  codes  in  coastal  zones,  and  developing  new  agricultural 
technologies. 

The  Arctic  has  warmed  at  a  faster  rate  than  the  Northern  Hemisphere  over  the 
past  century.  A  Vision  for  the  International  Polar  Year  2007–2008  (2004)  reports 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

that this warming is associated with a number of impacts including: melting of sea 
ice,  which  has  important  impacts  on  biological  systems  such  as  polar  bears,  ice-de-
pendent  seals  and  local  people  for  whom  these  animals  are  a  source  of  food;  in-
creased rain and snow, leading to changes in river discharge and tundra vegetation; 
and degradation of the permafrost. 
Preparing for Climate Change 

One  way  to  begin  preparing  for  climate  change  is  to  make  the  wealth  of  climate 
data and information already collected more accessible to a range of users who could 
apply  it  to  inform  their  decisions.  Such  efforts,  often  called  ‘‘climate  services,’’  are 
analogous  to  the  efforts  of  the  National  Weather  Service  to  provide  useful  weather 
information. Climate is becoming increasingly important to public and private deci-
sionmaking in various fields such as emergency management planning, water qual-
ity,  insurance  premiums,  irrigation  and  power  production  decisions,  and  construc-
tion  schedules.  A  Climate  Services  Vision  (2001)  outlines  principles  for  improving 
climate services that include making climate data as user-friendly as weather serv-
ices are today, and active and well-defined connections among the government agen-
cies,  businesses,  and  universities  involved  in  climate  change  data  collection  and  re-
search. 

Another avenue would be to develop practical strategies that could be used to re-
duce  economic  and  ecological  systems’  vulnerabilities  to  change.  Such  ‘‘no-regrets’’ 
strategies,  recommended  in  Abrupt  Climate  Change:  Inevitable  Surprises  (2002), 
provide  benefits  whether  a  significant  climate  change  ultimately  occurs  or  not,  po-
tentially  reducing  vulnerability  at  little  or  no  net  cost.  No-regrets  measures  could 
include  low-cost  steps  to:  improve  climate  forecasting;  slow  biodiversity  loss;  im-
prove  water,  land,  and  air  quality;  and  make  institutions—such  as  the  health  care 
enterprise,  financial  markets,  and  transportation  systems—more  resilient  to  major 
disruptions. 
Reducing the Causes of Climate Change 

The  climate  change  statement  issued  in  June  2005  by  11  science  academies,  in-
cluding  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences,  stated  that  despite  remaining  unan-
swered  questions,  the  scientific  understanding  of  climate  change  is  now  sufficiently 
clear to justify nations taking cost-effective steps that will contribute to substantial 
and long-term reduction in net global greenhouse gas emissions. Because carbon di-
oxide and some other greenhouse gases can remain in the atmosphere for many dec-
ades and major parts of the climate system respond slowly to changes in greenhouse 
gas concentrations, climate change impacts will likely continue throughout the 21st 
century  and  beyond.  Failure  to  implement  significant  reductions  in  net  greenhouse 
gas  emissions  now  will  make  the  job  much  harder  in  the  future—both  in  terms  of 
stabilizing their atmospheric abundances and in terms of experiencing more signifi-
cant impacts. 

At the present time there is no single solution that can eliminate future warming. 
As  early  as  1992,  Policy  Implications  of  Greenhouse  Warming  found  that  there  are 
many  potentially  cost-effective  technological  options  that  could  contribute  to  stabi-
lizing  greenhouse  gas  concentrations.  These  options  range  from  personal  choices 
such  as  driving  less,  to  national  choices  such  as  regulating  emissions,  to  inter-
national choices such as sharing energy technologies. 
Meeting Energy Needs Is a Major Challenge to Slowing Climate Change 

Energy—either  in  the  form  of  fuels  used  directly  (i.e.,  gasoline)  or  as  electricity 
produced  using  various  fuels  (fossil  fuels  as  well  as  nuclear,  solar,  wind,  and  oth-
ers)—is  essential  for  all  sectors  of  the  economy,  including  industry,  commerce, 
homes,  and  transportation.  Energy  use  worldwide  continues  to  grow  with  economic 
and  population  growth.  Developing  countries,  China  and  India  in  particular,  are 
rapidly increasing their use of energy, primarily from fossil fuels, and consequently 
their  emissions  of  CO2.  Carbon  emissions  from  energy  can  be  reduced  by  using  it 
more  efficiently  or  by  switching  to  alternative  fuels.  It  also  may  be  possible  to  cap-
ture carbon emissions from electric generating plants and then sequester them. 

Energy  efficiency  in  all  sectors  of  the  U.S.  economy  could  be  improved.  The  2002 
National  Academies’  report,  Effectiveness  and  Impact  of  Corporate  Average  Fuel 
Economy  (CAFE)  Standards,  evaluates  car  and  light  truck  fuel  use  and  analyzes 
how fuel economy could be improved. Steps range from improved engine lubrication 
to  hybrid  vehicles.  The  2001  Academies  report,  Energy  Research  at  DOE,  Was  It 
Worth  It?  addresses  the  benefits  of  increasing  the  energy  efficiency  of  lighting,  re-
frigerators,  and  other  appliances.  Many  of  these  improvements  (e.g.,  high-efficiency 
refrigerators)  are  cost-effective  means  to  significantly  reducing  energy  use,  but  are 
being  held  back  by  market  constraints  such  as  consumer  awareness,  higher  initial 
costs, or by the lack of effective policy. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

Electricity  can  be  produced  without  significant  carbon  emissions  using  nuclear 
power  and  renewable  energy  technologies  (e.g.,  solar,  wind,  and  biomass).  In  the 
United  States,  these  technologies  are  too  expensive  or  have  environmental  or  other 
concerns  that  limit  broad  application,  but  that  could  change  with  technology  devel-
opment,  or  if  the  costs  of  fossil  fuels  increase.  Replacing  coal-fired  electric  power 
plants  with  more  efficient,  modern  natural  gas-fired  turbines  would  reduce  carbon 
emissions per unit of electricity produced. 

Several  technologies  are  being  explored  that  would  collect  CO2 that  would  other-
wise  be  emitted  to  the  atmosphere  from  fossil  fuel-fired  power  plants,  and  then  se-
quester  it  in  the  ground  or  the  ocean.  Successful,  cost-effective  sequestration  tech-
nologies  would  weaken  the  link  between  fossil  fuels  and  greenhouse  gas  emissions. 
The  2003  National  Academies’  report,  Novel  Approaches  to  Carbon  Management: 
Separation,  Capture,  Sequestration,  and  Conversion  to  Useful  Products,  discusses 
the development of this technology. 

Capturing  CO2 emissions  from  the  tailpipes  of  vehicles  is  essentially  impossible, 
which  is  one  factor  that  has  led  to  considerable  interest  in  hydrogen  as  a  fuel.  As 
with electricity, hydrogen must be manufactured from primary energy sources. Sig-
nificantly reducing carbon emissions when producing hydrogen from fossil fuels (cur-
rently the least expensive method) would require carbon capture and sequestration. 
Substantial  technological  and  economic  barriers  in  all  phases  of  the  hydrogen  fuel 
cycle must first be addressed through research and development. The 2004 National 
Academies’ report, The Hydrogen Economy: Opportunities, Costs, Barriers and R&D 
Needs, presents a strategy that could lead eventually to production of hydrogen from 
a  variety  of  domestic  sources—such  as  coal  (with  carbon  sequestration),  nuclear 
power, wind, or photo-biological processes—and efficient use in fuel cell vehicles. 
National Academies Advice on U.S. Climate Change Research 
Review of the 2003 U.S. Climate Change Science Program Strategic Plan 

Implementing Climate and Global Change Research (2004) reviewed the Strategic 
Plan  for  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program,  released  in  July  2003.  The  re-
port finds that the strategic plan articulates a guiding vision, is appropriately ambi-
tious, and is broad in scope. It encompasses activities related to areas of long-stand-
ing  importance,  together  with  new  or  enhanced  cross-disciplinary  efforts.  It  appro-
priately  plans  for  close  integration  with  the  complementary  Climate  Change  Tech-
nology Program. The CCSP responded constructively to the National Academies’ re-
view  and  other  community  input  in  revising  the  strategic  plan.  In  fact,  the  ap-
proaches  taken  by  the  CCSP  to  receive  and  respond  to  comments  from  a  large  and 
broad  group  of  scientists  and  stakeholders,  including  a  two-stage  independent  re-
view of the plan, set a high standard for government research programs. As a result, 
the  revised  strategic  plan  includes  the  elements  of  a  strategic  management  frame-
work  that  could  permit  it  to  effectively  guide  research  on  climate  and  associated 
global  changes  over  the  next  decades.  Advancing  science  on  all  fronts  identified  by 
the program will be of vital importance to the Nation. The report recommends that 
the CCSP implement the activities described in the strategic plan with urgency. 

The  revised  strategic  plan  identifies  a  much  broader  scope  of  activities  than  has 
historically  been  supported  under  the  auspices  of  the  Global  Change  Research  Pro-
gram. To succeed, such an expansion in scope will require a concomitant expansion 
in  funding.  A  fully  informed  assessment  of  whether  adequate  funding  is  available 
for  the  proposed  program  was  not  possible  because  the  CCSP  did  not  provide  the 
committee  with  prospective  budget  information  and  because  many  of  the  objectives 
in the plan are too vaguely worded to determine what will constitute success. How-
ever,  the  CCSP  budget  at  the  time  did  not  appear  to  be  capable  of  supporting  all 
of the activities in the strategic plan. While well-established program elements have 
a  track  record  of  funding,  the  newer  or  expanded  areas  in  the  strategic  plan  lack 
clear budget lines and agency homes, and are therefore likely to be under supported. 
The  major  expansion  in  climate  modeling  and  the  observing  system  that  the  plan 
calls  for  will  also  require  an  increase  in  funding  above  current  levels.  There  is  no 
evidence  in  the  plan  or  elsewhere  of  a  commitment  to  provide  the  necessary  funds 
for these newer or expanded program elements. The report recommends that what-
ever the budget allocations, the CCSP and its parent committees: (1) develop a clear 
budgetary  process  linking  tasks  to  agency  and  program  budgets;  (2)  secure  the  fi-
nancial  resources,  for  the  present  and  the  future,  that  will  ensure  the  overall  suc-
cess  of  the  plan;  and  (3)  consider  new  approaches  to  funding  that  will  enable  new 
initiatives  and  the  shifting  of  resources  to  respond  to  the  Nation’s  evolving  needs. 
Significant  hurdles  face  the  CCSP  and  participating  agencies  as  they  implement 
the  strategic  plan.  First,  meeting  all  program  goals  will  require  advances  in  pre-
viously underemphasized but societally relevant elements of the program, including 
ecosystems,  the  water  cycle,  human  dimensions,  economics,  impacts,  adaptation, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

and mitigation, as well as further development of the program’s decision support ac-
tivities.  Second,  a  clearer  strategic  approach  is  needed  to  achieve  the  necessary  ex-
pansion  of  observation  systems  and  modeling  capabilities.  Third,  the  management 
structure proposed by the CCSP is very complex, will require significant interagency 
cooperation,  and  is  essentially  untested.  Fourth,  given  the  political  sensitivities  as-
sociated with climate and associated global change, special measures may be needed 
to  ensure  the  scientific  independence  and  credibility  of  the  program  and  its  prod-
ucts. The report recommends that the CCSP establish a mechanism for independent 
oversight  of  the  program  as  a  whole  in  order  to  maintain  its  long-term  scientific 
credibility.  Likewise,  the  CCSP  should  ensure  the  credibility  of  synthesis  and  as-
sessment  products  by  producing  them  with  independent  oversight  and  review  from 
the  wider  scientific  and  stakeholder  communities  throughout  the  process.  Finally, 
the  CCSP  needs  to  evaluate  the  available  capacity  within  the  community  to  imple-
ment the plan, and address any capacity gaps that are revealed. 

The Nation and the global community will be better prepared to address the chal-
lenges of climate and associated global changes if the CCSP’s vision and overarching 
goals are achieved. In this effort, the CCSP represents a transition from the science- 
based  Global  Change  Research  Program  of  the  past  decade  to  a  program  that  em-
ploys science in the service of societal objectives. While many opportunities exist to 
improve  the  plan,  as  discussed  in  Implementing  Climate  and  Global  Change  Re-
search, the major challenge ahead is for vigorous implementation. 
New  National  Academies  Committee:  Strategic  Advice  on  the  U.S.  Climate  Change 

Science Program 

One  of  the  recommendations  of  Implementing  Climate  and  Global  Change  Re-
search was for the CCSP to establish a mechanism for independent oversight of the 
program as a whole. In June 2005, CCSP asked the National Academies to establish 
a  committee  to  provide  independent  advice  on  the  strategy  and  evolution  of  the 
CCSP.  This  CCSP  Committee  will  produce  annual  reports  on  specific  topics  mutu-
ally  agreed  upon  by  the  program  and  the  National  Academies.  Topics  to  be  ad-
dressed during the first 3 years likely will include the following: 

(1)  Strategic  advice  on  program  priorities  and  implementation  strategy  in  the 
context  of  scientific  and  societal  objectives,  including  the  identification  of  high 
priority program areas not supported in the past; 
(2) An evaluation of progress toward meeting the program’s goals; and 
(3)  A  high-level  review  of  the  program’s  decision  support  activities  in  the  con-
text of the program’s strategic goals. 

The committee also will facilitate, when requested by the sponsor or participating 
agencies,  (1)  National  Academies’  reviews  of  draft  CCSP  synthesis  and  assessment 
products,  (2)  National  Academies’  reviews  of  draft  prospectuses  for  CCSP  synthesis 
and  assessment  products,  and  (3)  related  analyses  to  bound  the  uncertainty  associ-
ated with the interpretation of scientific findings. 
New National Academies Study: Analysis of Global Change Assessments 

Assessments  of  global  environmental  changes  and  their  effects  on  humans  and 
ecosystems  are  increasingly  being  conducted  to  synthesize  the  state  of  knowledge, 
inform  dialogue  about  policy  and  resource  management  decisions,  and  guide  plans 
for  future  research.  The  scientific  community  invests  significant  time  into  con-
ducting  assessments.  A  better  understanding  is  needed  of  the  strengths  and  weak-
nesses of assessment processes and the value of the end products for achieving their 
overall  purposes.  This  new  study,  requested  by  the  CCSP  in  June  2005,  will  seek 
to  identify  lessons  learned  from  a  wide  range  of  past  assessments  to  guide  future 
assessment activities of the CCSP. An ad hoc committee will conduct a comparative 
analysis  of  past  assessments  that  have  stated  objectives  broadly  similar  to  those  of 
the  CCSP.  The  committee  will  evaluate  several  cases  chosen  to  span  the  range  of 
assessment approaches in terms of geographic scale, subject-matter scope, entity re-
sponsible  for  conducting  the  assessment,  and  timing.  The  committee  will  provide 
specific  advice  about  which  purposes,  approaches,  and  products  are  most  effective 
for meeting the CCSP’s stated objectives for assessments. 
Concluding Remarks 

The  task  of  mitigating  and  preparing  for  the  impacts  of  climate  change  will  re-
quire worldwide collaborative inputs from a wide range of experts, including natural 
scientists, engineers, social scientists, medical scientists, those in government at all 
levels,  business  leaders,  and  economists.  Although  the  scientific  understanding  of 
climate change has advanced significantly in the last several decades, there are still 
many  unanswered  questions.  Society  faces  increasing  pressure  to  decide  how  best 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

to  respond  to  climate  change  and  associated  global  changes,  and  applied  research 
in direct support of decisionmaking is needed. 
National Academies Reports Cited in the Testimony 

Radiative Forcing of Climate Change: Expanding the Concept and Addressing Un-

certainties (2005) 

Climate Data Records from Environmental Satellites (2004) 
Implementing Climate and Global Change Research (2004) 
A Vision for the International Polar Year 2007–2008 (2004) 
The Hydrogen Economy: Opportunities, Costs, Barriers and R&D Needs (2004) 
Understanding Climate Change Feedbacks (2003) 
Planning Climate and Global Change Research (2003) 
Novel  Approaches  to  Carbon  Management:  Separation,  Capture,  Sequestration, 

and Conversion to Useful Products (2003) 

Abrupt Climate Change: Inevitable Surprises (2002) 
Effectiveness  and  Impact  of  Corporate  Average  Fuel  Economy  (CAFE)  Standards 

(2002) 

Climate Change Science: An Analysis of Some Key Questions (2001) 
Improving the Effectiveness of U.S. Climate Modeling (2001) 
A Climate Services Vision: First Steps Toward the Future (2001) 
Energy Research at DOE, Was It Worth It? (2001) 
Reconciling Observations of Global Temperature Change (2000) 
Adequacy of Climate Observing Systems (1999) 
Policy Implications of Greenhouse Warming (1992) 

Senator  VITTER.  Thank  you  very  much,  Doctor,  now  we’ll  move 
on  to  questions  from  the  Subcommittee,  I’ll  kick  it  off  with  Dr. 
Mahoney. 

Doctor, I wanted to focus and ask you a few things about climate 
models. Tell me what climate models you fund through your offices 
and  activities,  and  something  about  how  we  develop  those  models 
and  validate  them—is  there  an  independent  validation  process? 
What sort of data is used, and should we use taxpayer funds, gen-
erally  speaking,  for  multiple  models?  What  is  your  general  philos-
ophy on that? 

Dr. MAHONEY. Thank you, Senator. The Climate Change Science 
Program,  through  its  agencies,  funds  model  development,  evalua-
tion  and  validation  activities,  principally  through  four  agencies— 
that  is,  through  ourselves  in  NOAA,  where  the  climate  models 
have,  in  part,  grown  out  of  our  weather  forecasting  models,  al-
though  I  stress  that  the  climate  model  development  stands  on  its 
own  right,  and  actually  is  largely  conducted  in  another  center, 
where  we  work  a  great  deal  to  make  sure  that  we  take  advantage 
of  all  the  lessons  learned  from  the  shorter-term  weather  fore-
casting, and apply them into the longer-term modeling. 

Second,  the  National  Science  Foundation  has  had,  for  many 
years, a very significant climate model development activity, large-
ly through its core support for the National Center for Atmospheric 
Research  in  Boulder,  but  that  NCAR  support,  in  turn,  has  ema-
nated  out  to  a  very  broad-based,  what  is  called,  Community  Cli-
mate  Model  Development  Activity  that  involves  hundreds  of  cli-
mate  scientists  dealing  not  only  with  the  computational  models, 
but with the underlying processes that are necessary to capture in 
the models. 

Third,  the  Department  of  Energy  has  a  long  record  of  working 
on  climate  model  development,  and  continues  to  do  that,  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

fourth,  NASA  also  has  played  a  role  in  significant  climate  model 
development, also dating back to the 1980s. 

One  fair  question  would  be,  why  have  these  different  groups 
doing  this?  I  think  that  is  a  fair  question,  but  the  fair  answer  I 
would  give  is  this  is  such  an  important  area  that  I  view  it  as  an 
element of sort of the free market development of ideas, it’s so im-
portant  that  we  get  exposed  to  the  best  possible  modeling  capa-
bility,  that  we  would  not  want  to  put  all  of  our  bets  on  one  par-
ticular  group  in  an  area  which  is  core  to  the  development  of  na-
tional skills here. 

Moving  on  to  your  question  about  validation  and  evaluation. 
When  the  prior  international  assessments,  the  work  of  the  IPCC, 
the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change,  which  produced 
its third assessment in the year 2000, and is scheduled to produce 
its fourth assessment in the year 2007, and similarly when the na-
tional assessment conducted in the United States in the late 1990s 
were  conducted,  the  models  used  for  those  exercises,  state-of-the- 
art at the time, did not include the U.S. models because they were 
not  considered  to  be  as  advanced  as  models  available  from  the 
U.K., from other European sources, and from the Canadians. 

That situation, all modeling, has advanced substantially. I think 
we  certainly  believe  that  the  advances  in  the  U.S.  modeling  capa-
bility  has  really  put  our  modeling  efforts  really  at  the  forefront  of 
this  these  days,  and  we  see  substantially  more  skill,  and  every-
thing  we’re  doing  now  in  the  U.S.  is  based  on  our  models,  in  close 
collaboration  with  our  international  partners,  and  even  in  the 
IPCC  international  activity,  the  U.S.  models  will  be  a  major  con-
tributor,  and  indeed  the  U.S.  model  runs  were  the  first  ones  com-
pleted for use in IPCC assessments underway now. 

Just  a  final  word  on  the  validation—the  broad  issue,  of  course, 
is that related to looking back over the past 25 years, or sometimes 
the  past  century,  to  see  how  well  the  models  work  in  so-called 
hindcasting,  so  we  can  better  understand  their  ability  to  forecast 
going forward, and that activity has proceeded a great deal. At the 
core,  though,  is  the  question  of,  well,  when  we  fit  our  parameters, 
since they’re literally hundreds of parameters in the models, are we 
at  risk  that  we’ve  just  parameter-ized,  based  on  past  data,  so  that 
we don’t really have a good forecast going forward? 

With  that  in  mind,  the  modeling  community  has  done  a  great 
deal  to  deal  with  other  methods  of  validation—looking  at  regional 
patterns, looking at shorter-term influences and the like, and in all 
of  this,  we’ve  seen  major  improvement  in  these  models.  We  have 
a  large  model  validation  effort  which  runs  on  a  long-term  basis, 
sponsored  by  DOE  at  Lawrence  Livermore  laboratory,  and  a  pro-
gram on climate model validation and interpretation. That activity 
is the core U.S. resource in this area that has logged very substan-
tial improvements in recent years. Thank you. 

Senator VITTER. Thank you, Mr. Conover, briefly, what are some 
of the most promising technologies identified by the technology pro-
gram,  and  could  you  briefly  describe  the  technology  transfer  proc-
ess,  and  how  it  could  be  improved,  if  you  have  any  thoughts  on 
that? 

Mr. CONOVER. Sure, thank you, Mr. Chairman. The intent of our 
program is to ensure that we maintain a diversified portfolio of re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

search  and  development  investments,  the  Federal  Government 
doesn’t have a particularly good track record on picking winners in 
the technology area, and so the idea is to ensure that we are fund-
ing  a  variety  of  promising  technologies  that  can  be  brought  to  the 
marketplace,  and  where  they  will  compete  against  one  another  in 
the marketplace, ultimately, then, determining which ones succeed 
and which ones fail. 

The  President  is  committed  to  the  hydrogen  fuel  initiative,  that 
a  child  born  today  has  an  opportunity  to  drive  a  vehicle  powered 
by  hydrogen  with  zero  emissions.  We’ve  been  very  successful—the 
Department  through  its  Energy  Efficiency  and  Renewable  Energy 
program  in  advancing  that  goal—very  promising  area  is  in  carbon 
sequestration,  where  we  have  established  a  network  of  seven  re-
gional  consortia,  with  the  University,  state  and  local  governments, 
industry  all  grappling  with  a  variety  of  issues  associated  with  car-
bon sequestration—what the technology needs to be, what the reg-
ulatory framework needs to be, how are we going to make sure that 
it  is  acceptable  to  local  communities,  et  cetera.  We’re  very  excited 
about the prospects for the Future Gen Program, which is based on 
today’s technology—integrated gasification and combined cycles for 
cleaner  coal  technology,  but  with  an  ability  to  separate  out  carbon 
dioxide, and then sequester the carbon dioxide, producing both elec-
tric  power  and  a  hydrogen  stream  that  can  be  used  for  our  trans-
portation  sector  with  zero  emissions  from  the  power  generation 
itself. 

All  of  these  projects  are  conducted  in  partnership  with  the  pri-
vate sector, the contribution of the private sector ranges from about 
20  percent  to  50  percent  in  any  individual  project,  and  what  we 
have  found  is  that  as  these  technologies  become  more  mature,  the 
fact  that  the  private  sector  actually  has  a  stake  in  an  individual 
research and development or demonstration project helps to ensure 
that  the  transfer  ultimately,  of  the  technology  to  the  marketplace, 
will be smooth. 

We  have  an  ongoing  effort  on  an  annual  basis  to  evaluate  and 
monitor  our  technology  transfer  activities,  both  within  the  Depart-
ment and through our network of national laboratories, and I think 
most people are perhaps surprised to learn that the first largest in-
vestment  in  our  portfolio  is  energy  efficiency  R&D,  but  the  second 
is deployment. So with respect, I believe, that we have a very good 
track  record  on  deploying  these  technologies,  obviously  things  like 
hydrogen  and  sequestration  are  some  years  down  the  road,  but 
there is a robust public/private partnership that bodes well for the 
future and transferring these technologies into the marketplace. 

Senator  VITTER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Conover,  I’ll  come  back  to  the 

other witnesses, but let me move on to Senator Lautenberg. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman,  ob-
viously the subject is a fairly complicated one, global warming, and 
it  needs  a  fair  amount  of  explanation,  but  I  would  ask  whenever 
possible to crystallize, or reduce the answering time so that we can 
get  through  the  questions,  but  understand  exactly  what  it  is  that 
you’re  saying.  The  scientific  influences  in  this  are  critical,  but  I 
come  from  the  world  of  business,  and  we  always  try  to  get  to  the 
bottom  line  if  we  can,  and  that,  I  think,  is  the  mission  here.  I  no-
tice  that  there  are  a  substantial  number  of  young  people  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

cleared the room, and I don’t know whether it was something that 
was said or wasn’t said, but the fact is that if we can get it quickly 
into comprehensible language, it would help. 

I  would  like,  Dr.  Cicerone,  have  you  seen  the  Pentagon  report 
that  came  out  in  2003,  that  presented,  or  projected,  a  worse-case 
scenario  in  the  event  of  an  abrupt  climate  change,  have  you  seen 
that report? 

Dr. CICERONE. Yes. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  What  do  you  think  about  the  veracity,  or 
the  value  of  the  conclusions  that  they  make?  Do  you  think  this  is 
reliably, scientifically-based? 

Dr.  CICERONE.  I  assume  we’re  speaking  about  the  same  report. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  This  is  the  one  that  projects  significant 
disaster in the latter part of this century as a result of flooded na-
tions,  and  people  looking  for  higher  ground,  and  the  military  re-
sponsibility for keeping them off of it. 

Dr.  CICERONE.  At  first  I  saw  only  press  reports  about  that,  per-
haps  a  year  and  a  half  ago,  and  some  people  in  the  business  com-
munity  in  California  asked  my  opinion  of  it,  so  I  found  a  website, 
dug up part of the report and read it, and I thought that the writ-
ers  made 
it  pretty  clear  that  they  were  speaking  about 
plausibilities  that  were  within  the  realm  of  possibility,  and  it  was 
well  done.  I  didn’t  think  that  it  was  fictional,  on  the  other  hand, 
I  thought  the  writers  made  it  clear  that  they  were  speaking  from 
a  range  of  possibilities  that  have  been  identified,  and  weren’t  nec-
essarily  saying,  ‘‘This  is  exactly  what’s  going  to  happen,’’  but  they 
did put their finger on some vulnerabilities. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Forecast  about  flooded  nations,  I  mean, 
you know, if we look at recent history and October 2003, the Ward 
Hunt  Ice  Shelf,  the  largest  ice  shelf  in  the  Antarctic  broke  up.  I 
mean,  is  this  true,  or  isn’t  it  true?  If  it’s  true,  what’s  the  signifi-
cance of something like that? 

Dr.  CICERONE.  Well,  the  amounts  of  sea  ice  and  continental  ice 
around  the  world  are  enormous.  The  ones  that  we  would  be  most 
concerned  about  are  the  ice  formations  which  are  now  on  land,  so 
that  if  they  were  to  melt,  they  would  increase  sea  level,  the  ones 
that  are  already  floating  in  the  ocean,  melting  them  might  have 
some biological effects, and would, but wouldn’t raise sea level. So, 
there  has  been  a  massive  effort  underway,  not  as  big  as  it  should 
be, to learn more about the sea ice mechanics, what it’s vulnerable 
to,  and  studying  the  climate  feedbacks,  much  in  the  way  that  Dr. 
Mahoney just mentioned about the climate modeling business. 

There  are  different  ways  to  describe  and  predict  the  way  that 
these  land-held  ice  amounts  will  respond  in  the  early  days  of  cli-
mate change, and in the later days. And the predictions are not yet 
very  clear—generally  speaking,  people  think  that  changes  will  be 
slow, and inexorable, on the other hand, I’m not convinced that we 
know  enough  about  the  mechanics  of  this  ice  to  make  that  pre-
diction.  Therefore,  the  Pentagon  report  was  plausible.  We  cannot 
rule it out, we cannot rule out those scenarios. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  They  talk  about  things  like,  in  20  years— 
and  this  goes  back  to  February  2004—warned  that  in  the  next  20 
years,  major  European  coastal  cities  could  sink,  beneath  the  sea, 
and  the  military  defines  a  likelihood  of  its  responsibilities  in  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

second  half  of  this  century  as  in  preparing  the  kind  of  equipment 
they  need  to  fight  off  waves  of  refugees  looking  for  higher  land 
coming  here,  and  people  whose  lives  are  threatened  to  begin  with 
are  going  to  take  any  chance  they  can  to  climb  aboard.  Well,  I 
mean,  that  scene  of  chaos  sounds  like  something  that  we  see  in 
these movies, Star Wars and so forth, and that is an ominous kind 
of projection. 

Dr. Mahoney, it’s been 5 years since the last national assessment 
of  climate  impacts  report.  Can  you  explain  why  the  Climate 
Change  Science  Program  failed  to  produce  a  report  that  was  due 
in 2004? 

Dr.  MAHONEY.  Senator,  first  of  all  we  put  our  effort—when  I 
came on board at the beginning of 2002, we put our effort into ad-
dressing what we believed to be a real core question, which was to 
assure  that  we  were  advancing  the  science,  understanding  better 
issues  that  were  left  very  uncertain  from  the  time  of  the  prior  as-
sessment  activity,  so  that  strategic  plan  is  the  document  I  men-
tioned  awhile  ago,  that  was  published  just  2  years  ago,  just  now, 
in  fact  it  was  released  that  day,  I  conducted  a  large  briefing  for 
staff  here  in  the  Senate,  and  a  similar  briefing  the  same  day  for 
House staff to try to get the word out very quickly. So, we’ve been 
on  record  very  clearly  with  a  plan  and  schedule  for  the  work  that 
we  propose  to  do  for  2  years.  And  we’ve  taken  a  view  in  that  that 
we would produce a series of 21 synthesis and assessment reports. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Are  these  far  off  the  time  target  that  we 

expected to meet? 

Dr.  MAHONEY.  When  we  produced  the  plan,  we  expected  that 
they would be all prepared within a 4-year period. We still plan to 
finish within the 4-year period. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Four-year  period  starting  when,  Dr. 

Mahoney? 

Dr.  MAHONEY.  Starting  from  the  time  the  plan  was  produced  in 
the  middle  of  2002,  we’re  now  projecting  producing  all  of  these,  at 
least,  we’ll  have  to  make  one  exception,  we’re  planning  to  produce 
most  of  them  by  the  end  of  the  year  2007,  and  in  correspondence 
we’ve  sent  just  recently,  because  we’ve  been  asked  for  some 
changes  in  the  coverage  on  the  reports,  we  have  undertaken  to 
agree to include those changes. The result of that is some that were 
considered  to  be  not  directly  responsive  to  the  requirements  of  the 
law,  we  have  proposed  to  delay  submitting  those  until  the  begin-
ning  of  2008,  because  there’s  only  so  much  work  the  community 
can  do  at  one  time.  But  we  were  originally  on  a  program  of  pro-
ducing this through 2007, we’re still largely on that program, what 
slipped  was  that  in  the  first  year  of  our  activity,  we  fell  behind  in 
the expected early production of this, and we’re in a catch-up mode 
for that now. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Because all of these things are fairly long- 
range,  but  I  think  they’re  imminent  because  of  the  prospective 
problems that we face, and we don’t want to continue to put things 
off,  we’re  spending  a  lot  of  money,  but  the  question  is  whether 
we’re spending it as wisely and as efficiently as we might. 

Mr.  Chairman,  we’re  going  to  continue  the  questioning  process. 
Senator VITTER. Sure. Thank you, Chairman Stevens? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  Dr.  Mahoney,  I  was  sad-
dened to get the call yesterday concerning your possible departure. 
I  want  to  thank  you  very  much  for  what  you’ve  done,  I  hope  that 
your departure is not too quick, but I understand that it will come. 
I want to thank all of you for responding to my request for addi-
tional  funds  to  be  released  to  carry  out  the  continued  observation 
of  the  temperature  changes  in  the  Arctic  Ocean.  There  are  three 
to  four  icebreakers  out  there  this  summer  around  the  circum-
ference  of  the  Arctic  Ocean  on  an  international  basis.  I  think  the 
continued  use  of  those  to  find  out  what’s  really  happening  in  the 
Arctic will be very important in this overall question. 

Some  years  ago,  as  Chairman  of  the  Appropriations  Committee, 
I took the Committee down to Antarctica, because at the time I no-
ticed  the  disparity  between  funding  for  the  Antarctic  and  the  Arc-
tic, and after I visited there, I came back and told you all that the 
work  going  on  down  there  should  not  be  disturbed,  but  we  had  to 
find  some  additional  money  for  the  Arctic.  I’m  still  trying  to  find 
that money. I have here, I think, they’re your documents, the Octo-
ber 19, 2004 Nome storm, which was classified as a 949 milibar cy-
clone, totally unpredicted, as was the Barrow storm that took place 
on  September  9th  of  2003.  I  do  hope  we’ll  find  some  way  to  deal 
with  prediction  of  storms  in  the  Arctic,  we  have  very  little  capa-
bility  of  doing  that  right  now,  and  I  think  the  basic  global  climate 
changes are more evident in the Arctic, and I would hope we would 
find  some  way  to  implement  general  forecasting  of  the  weather  in 
the Arctic. If that cyclone happened in California, Dr. Cicerone, we 
would have known about it by the minute, with this one, we knew 
it  about  2  hours  after  it  happened.  I  really  think  we  need  better 
prediction  and  better  information  for  our  people  with  regard  to 
those storms. 

Now, one of my basic problems, however, is the question of what 
to do about the situation in our state. I think as far as the United 
States  is  concerned,  the  evidence  of  global  climate  change  is  more 
apparent  in  Alaska  than  anywhere  else.  I  will  request  a  National 
Guard aircraft to fly me up the West Coast of Alaska to take a look 
at that damage that occurred from the storms last year. Very clear-
ly we have to address those issues as the Senator has said, to help 
protect  the  people  that  were  involved  in  the  past  storms.  We  need 
some predictions as to what we should do for the future of the nine 
villages that suffered the most. 

I’m  sure  you’ve  seen  the  GAO  report,  at  my  request,  that  indi-
cates at least three of them are in eminent need of some attention. 
One of the small villages, costs an estimated $200 million to move. 
I  think  we’ve  got  to  figure  out  a  way  to  relocate  some  of  these  vil-
lages  before  they’re  destroyed—it’s  easier  to  move  them  piece  by 
piece  than  it  is  to  move  them  after  the  disasters  occur.  One  of  the 
basic  problems  still  facing  us  is  whether  we  have  a  way  to  distin-
guish  between  natural  and  man-made  causes  of  global  climate 
change,  or  warming.  How  far  are  we  from  being  able  to  do  that? 
Dr.  MAHONEY.  Well,  Senator,  I’ll  take  that  on  for  a  minute,  and 
I’ll  try  to  give  a  brief,  direct  answer  as  Senator  Lautenberg  ad-
vised.  I  will  comment,  too,  it  is  my  plan  to  stay  on  board  until  my 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

successor  is  confirmed,  so  I  hope  to  be  at  it  for  many  months,  still 
working  with  you.  While  my  health  has  deteriorated  some,  and  I 
can’t  go  on  over  years,  I  don’t  want  to  leave  any  of  this  open,  so 
I look forward to working with you for quite some time. 

On  your  question  about  this  difference  between  natural  varia-
bility  and  human-caused—first  of  all,  it’s  important  to  sort  out 
sometimes there are, what I will call, political arguments that want 
to  go  to  one  extreme  or  the  other,  the  scientific  argument  is  much 
more  complicated  in  the  middle.  There  is  no  question  there’s  nat-
ural  variability,  and  I  will  say  very  directly,  there’s  also  no  ques-
tion that there is an important element of human-caused effects, so 
the  science  challenge  is  to  tease  out  those  differences.  And  it’s  not 
especially  easy  to  do  at  the  outset  because  when  you  look  at  the 
record,  it’s  just  a  noisy  record,  and  it’s  a  question  of  how  you  pull 
it  apart.  Even  so,  the  last  few  years,  and  even  the  last  two  or  3 
years  have  seen  substantial  progress  in  being  able  to  better  iden-
tify the human cause, elements, and some of the work on this deals 
with  regional  patterns  of  temperature  change,  and  salinity  change 
in the ocean that tends to relate to regional factors associated with 
the  carbon  dioxide  in  the  atmosphere.  So,  we’re  beginning  to  see 
from  the  oceanic  record  more  help  in  what  we  call  ‘‘fingerprinting’’ 
of these changes that can be related to human effects. 

The  same  way  we  see  this  generally,  and  when  we  look  at  the 
atmosphere  overall,  there  is  now  enough  information  again  on 
doing  regional  correlations  as  well  as  long-term  studies  to  give  us 
a  better  picture  that  indicates  that  in  the  end,  both  natural  varia-
bility  and  human  causes  are  playing  a  role,  so  there  is  no  one  can 
make a statement that it’s exactly 50/50 or 40/60 or something, but 
we  have  enough  information  to  say  human  effects  are  significant, 
and  I  would  say  that’s  where  we  are,  and  without  taking  the  time 
with  long,  complicated  questions  or  answers,  there  is  substantially 
better  information  to  help  make  this  difference,  but  we  will  need 
to  continue  to  sharpen  that  because  it’s  such  an  important  point, 
I  expect  we’ll  need  to  sharpen  that  distinction  through  these  field 
measurements  and  model  studies  in  the  years  immediately  ahead. 
The CHAIRMAN. Dr. Cicerone, if you look at the information that’s 
available  to  us,  we  have  a  lot  more  information  available  from  the 
area  you  just  left  in  California  than  we  do  for  the  Arctic,  but  we 
do  have  some  information  coming  in  about  the  so-called  Atlantic 
and Pacific Oscillation, and what it may mean in terms of dumping 
more  heat  into  the  Arctic  Ocean,  how  far  along  is  that  before  peo-
ple  start  talking  about  it?  I  haven’t  really  heard  about  it,  except 
from  the  scientists  associated  with  the  International  Arctic  Re-
search Center in Fairbanks, but are you all looking into this? 

Dr.  CICERONE.  Yes,  and  I  know  some  individual  scientists  who 
are, I wish I could tell you when people will be able to say whether 
they  think  the  rapid  and  large  warming  in  the  Arctic  is  more  at-
tributable  to  humans  or  natural  variation.  I  started  out  thinking 
that whatever is going on in the Arctic must be some unknown nat-
ural  variation,  but  others  in  the  last  few  years  are  telling  me  no, 
they  think,  they’re  working  on  ideas  that  link  it  more  to  global 
warming, I don’t see the answer, I don’t know if anybody has a de-
finitive  answer  yet,  but  because  of  the  dramatic  warming,  the  loss 
of  permafrost,  the  loss  of  sea  ice,  the  raised  temperatures,  the  in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

creased growing season length—in the Arctic a lot more people are 
working on it. 

I’m  reminded,  though,  of  the  ozone  layer  business  that  we  went 
through 20 some years ago, where the appearance of the Antarctic 
ozone  hole  was  totally  unexpected,  unpredicted,  and  perhaps  a  lit-
tle  bit  fortunate  that  the  first  large  damage  to  the  ozone  layer  oc-
curred  over  Antarctica  rather  than  over  more  populated  regions. 
People  in  New  Zealand,  Australia,  and  Southern  Chile  might  dis-
agree  because  they’re  dealing  with  the  increased  ultraviolet  light 
now,  but  the  reason  we  didn’t  predict  it—and  I  remember  taking 
a  lot  of  heat  in  public  lectures—people  came  up  to  me  and  said, 
‘‘Why  didn’t  you  predict  this?  You  never  said  that  it  was  going  to 
be  this  bad,’’  is  that  there  were  mechanisms,  the  chemistry  of  the 
atmosphere that we didn’t understand. All we can do is do the best 
we  can  with  the  available  science,  and  it  gets  to  the  question  of 
Senator  Vitter  about  these  different  models  that  are  being  used  to 
do  these  computations,  I  think  they’re  absolutely  essential  to  have 
different sources of funding, different competing scientists, and dif-
ferent approaches to these questions. The seriousness of the Arctic 
situation  is  a  great  example,  where  the  approximations  that  some 
scientists are making in the way they solve these equations will be 
more accurate in the Arctic, or less accurate in the tropics. And the 
only way to find out is to try different techniques. 

In  the  meantime,  the  Arctic  situation  is  much  more  widespread 
than people realized, the temperature records are showing a warm-
ing  over  the  Arctic,  a  bigger  east/west  extent,  and  a  longer  period 
of time than any of us knew, it just got more rapid recently. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  how  much  of  it  is  related  to  this  ocean  os-

cillation, has anyone really measured that? 

Dr.  CICERONE.  That  was  the  biggest  initial  invest  hypothesis, 
that  the  so-called  North  Atlantic  Oscillation  might  have  a  mode 
that  would  lead  to  some  kind  of  rapid  warming  every  40  years  or 
so,  but  I  don’t  think  that  is  turning  out  to  provide  all  of  the  an-
swers  either.  It’s  still  one  of  the  major  hypotheses,  that  we  should 
better map out natural variation, but it doesn’t seem to be yielding, 
it  doesn’t  seem  to  be  explaining  what  we’re  seeing  completely,  at 
least. 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, am I wrong to say that the world seems to 
be  looking  to  us  to  examine  this  because  of  our  scientific  commu-
nity  and  the  way  it’s  funded,  as  opposed  to  other  areas?  For  in-
stance, those ships in the Arctic. We’re financing those and I thank 
you for that, someone has to do it. We don’t have very much obser-
vation  in  the  Arctic,  I  don’t  think  Canada  has  a  lot,  and  we’re  not 
increasing  the  emphasis  of  research  or  observation  there,  which  I 
think  should  be  taken  into  account.  I  don’t  want  to  see  us  taking 
anything  away  from  Antarctica,  I  think  that’s  very  important  to 
mankind in the long run. The short run of trying to find out what’s 
going on for us is in the Arctic, everyone says, ‘‘Stevens, you’re get-
ting  another  pork  barrel.’’—it  has  nothing  to  do  with  that,  it  has 
to  do  with  getting  the  information  we  need  about  what  has  hap-
pened,  and  get  some  predictions  of  what  might  happen  in  the  Arc-
tic because of the location of our state. Where do we have the abil-
ity to act? I don’t think many nations do. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

Dr.  CICERONE.  At  one  time,  the  former  Soviet  Union  had  a  very 
active presence there, I don’t think it was as large, so I think your 
statement  is  very  fair,  however,  because  of  the  dramatic  changes 
in  Alaska  and  the  rest  of  the  Arctic,  the  Norwegians  and  English 
are  paying  attention  and  trying  to  do  their  part  of  it,  but  I  think 
your statement is fair, they’re looking to us to do more. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, I will see if Congress will 

try, thank you. 

Senator VITTER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. I hope you’ve noticed, we’ve organized three Sub-
committees  of  this  Committee  to  get  into  this  basic  area,  and  I  do 
want  you  to  know  we’re  going  to  continue  that  emphasis  as  long 
as I’m Chairman, thank you. 

Senator  VITTER.  Let  me  go  back  to  Mr.  Reifsnyder.  You  men-
tioned  upcoming  climate  forums  in  Montreal  and  another  recently 
announced  in  London.  What  will  be  the  U.S.  goals  at  those  meet-
ings? 

Mr. REIFSNYDER. Thank you, Chairman. The London meeting, as 
we  understand  it,  will  seek  to  look  at  the  specific  items  in  the 
Gleneagles Program of Action, and to try to devise ways and means 
of taking those forward, so our goal there will be to try to put some 
flesh  on  the  bones  of  what  was  contained  in  the  Gleneagles  Pro-
gram  of  Action,  specifically.  As  I  say,  we  don’t  have  a  great  deal 
more  information  at  the  moment,  we  know  that  the  United  King-
dom plans to convene a meeting on the first of November, with re-
spect  to  the  11th  conference  of  the  parties  under  the  U.N.  Frame-
work  Convention  on  Climate  Change,  we  have  sought  in  the  past 
two or 3 years to highlight what we’re doing with respect to science 
and  technology,  we  did  that  at  the  COP–9  in  Milan  last  year,  we 
sought  to  highlight  what  we’re  doing  with  respect  to  our  domestic 
programs,  as  well  as  our  international  programs.  We’ve  taken  an 
active  approach  to  these  COPs,  not  just  dealing  with  the  issues 
that come up there, but using them as an opportunity to showcase 
all that the United States is doing, and I think we will try to take 
the same approach in Montreal this year. 

Now,  much  of  the  discussion  in  Montreal  will  focus  on  the  entry 
and  into  force  of  the  Kyoto  Protocol  among  the  parties  that  have 
ratified  Kyoto.  And  there  were  a  number  of  decisions,  Kyoto  was, 
in  effect,  a  kind  of  framework,  there  was  much  work  that  took 
place under the Framework Convention on Climate Change to pre-
pare  for  entry  into  force  of  Kyoto  that  has  happened,  and  now 
those  decisions  have  to  be  taken  up  by  the  meeting  of  the  parties 
under  the  Kyoto  Protocol,  so  that  will  be  a  large  part  of  the  focus 
in Montreal. 

Senator  VITTER.  OK,  thank  you.  Dr.  Cicerone,  Chairman  Barton 
over  on  the  House  side,  recently  had  some  inquiries  into  the 
backup  data  and  work  behind  some  of  the  climate  science,  and  in 
response  to  that,  you’ve  sent  in  a  letter,  and  there  has  been  some 
uncertainty about exactly where you’re coming from in the letter in 
terms  of  whether  you  were  just  offering  help  to  folks  involved  in 
Congressional oversight, or whether you were suggesting that over-
sight  belongs  somewhere  else  outside  of  Congress—could  you  sort 
of speak to that, and clarify your letter? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

Dr.  CICERONE.  Yes,  I  drove  across  country  at  the  end  of  June, 
and all of this was happening while I was driving. When I got here, 
I  received  a  large  number  of  contacts  from  scientists  around  the 
country,  and  people  who  represent  them,  scientific  society,  saying 
they  were  very  concerned  with  that  kind  of  request,  that  they 
hadn’t  seen  anything  like  it  before,  and  that  it’s  difficult  for  sci-
entists to go back and get everything that was asked for, and they 
said, ‘‘Is this a new way of doing business?’’ And I tried to put my-
self in Congressman Barton’s position of trying to get at the bottom 
of that particular climate record, so I wrote a letter that expressed 
the concern that had been conveyed to me, that some scientists find 
it  to  be  intimidating  to  receive  that  kind  of  a  letter—by  the  way, 
I  don’t  know  the  three  scientists  to  whom  it  was  addressed,  I’ve 
never  met  any  one  of  them,  and  so  I’m  not  dealing  with  anything 
personal  here—so  the  letter  basically  said,  to  express  concern  over 
the  way  the  letter  was  being  received,  and  offer  any  help  that  we 
could provide in helping Congressman Barton and his colleagues to 
get  to  the  heart  of  this  very  specialized  matter,  how  you  read  the 
climate  record  of  the  last  thousand  years,  during  most  of  which 
time  people  were  not  measuring  temperatures.  And  so  I  offered 
that we could convene a study to help, if necessary, or to find oth-
ers to do it for them if they would rather work with somebody else, 
and we had the letter personally delivered to Congressman Barton 
last Friday morning. 

Senator VITTER. Following up on that, how would you describe a 

valid oversight role of relevant Committees in the Congress? 

Dr. CICERONE. I think that’s up to you, Senator Vitter. I suspect 
that everything the Congressman asked for, he’s entitled to ask for, 
we  certainly  don’t  challenge  that.  What  I  would  really  like  to  get 
across  is  science—one  of  the  reasons  I’ve  been  attracted  to  it  over 
my lifetime is it’s perhaps the only, but one of few human endeav-
ors  that  is  self-correcting.  And  that  we  can  rely  on  the  method  to 
get  at  the  truth  of  the  matter  eventually—we  just  keep  going  over 
things,  find  independent  ways  to  ask  the  same  question,  find  an-
swers  so  what  we’ve  volunteered,  and  hope  that  the  Academy  can 
help  with,  is  to  convene  an  up-to-date  group  to  look  at  where  we 
are right now, at any point in time, on any question, and give Con-
gress,  if  it  wishes,  what  we  hope  is  the  best  available  information. 
I’m  sure  part  of  your  role  is  getting  that  information  one  way  or 
the other. 

Senator VITTER. OK, Doctor, and one other question. Recently, as 
you  know,  there  was  some  controversy  regarding  a  recent  joint 
Science  Academy  statement,  and  how  it  was  characterized  by  dif-
ferent  parties,  and  specifically,  the  British  Royal  Society’s  charac-
terization, could you sort of speak to that? 

Dr.  CICERONE.  Yes,  in  fact,  some  of  you  may  have  seen  the  ex-
change  between  my  predecessor  who  just  left  town  a  couple  of 
weeks  ago,  with  the  head  of  the  Royal  Society  where  we  objected 
to the way they characterized the statement that the Science Acad-
emies  from  the  G8  nations,  and  India,  and  China,  and  Brazil  had 
agreed to, we thought that the press release went beyond what we 
had  agreed  to,  and  we  were  surprised  by  the  timing  of  it.  But  the 
intention of the Science Academies of these nations is driven by the 
hope and the belief that a scientific reading of scientific data of any 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

situation will be helpful to our governments, so there will probably 
be  more  efforts  of  these  Academies  to  work  together  in  the  future 
on such statements, guided by the lessons of this time, I hope. 

Senator  VITTER.  And  have  those  lessons  been  agreed  to  within 
the Societies? Has their been a response from the British Royal So-
ciety  that  is  satisfactory  to  you,  or  are  you  still  frustrated  by  the 
experience? 

Dr. CICERONE. A little frustrated, we have some work to do. 
Senator VITTER. Senator Lautenberg? 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
Dr. Cicerone, you said that the melt on land—if I understood you 
correctly—was  more  significant  as  you  looked  at  it  now,  then  the 
sea  melt,  because  the  sea  melt  couldn’t  yet  be  fully  assessed,  but 
do I generally phrase correctly what you’ve said? 

Dr.  CICERONE.  And  one  raises  the  sea  level,  and  the  other 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Right.  But,  when  we  look  at  Glacier  Na-
tional Park, and Kilimanjaro, and places like that, that were homes 
for  ice  and  snow,  and  now  they’re  almost  barren,  that’s  a  pretty 
worrisome indicator, is it not? 

Dr. CICERONE. Inland glaciers generally are disappearing around 

doesn’t. 

the world, perhaps not at the rate of Kilimanjaro, but yes. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. And that portends problems in a disturbed 
ecology,  the  Union  of  Concerned  Scientists  in  2004  released  a  crit-
ical report on the Administration’s use of science in forming policy, 
and the report was signed by 64 scientists, including 20 Nobel Lau-
reates.  And  part  of  the  criticism  evolved  around  something,  Dr. 
Mahoney,  about  changes  to  the  references,  EPA,  to  remove  ref-
erences in a report to the 2001 National Academy of Science study, 
that  confirmed  that  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change 
finding human activity is contributing to climate change, and to in-
sert  instead  a  discredited  study  of  temperature  records  that  were 
funded, in part, by the American Petroleum Institute. 

I wrote you a letter on June 29, requesting that you remove from 
NOAA’s website, two reports on climate change which were altered 
by a former member of the White House staff, and I thank you for 
your  written  reply.  But  it’s  not  clear  to  me  from  your  response 
whether  changes  made  by  Mr.  Cooney,  the  gentleman  in  question, 
and  approved  by  non-partisan  scientists,  did  scientists  sign-off  on 
Mr. Cooney’s changes? 

Dr.  MAHONEY.  Senator,  I  think  the  short,  simple  answer  is  yes, 
in  particular  in  the  sense  that  all  of  the  edit  comments  we  receive 
come  back  and  are  vetted  by  our  core  office,  and  by  me.  It’s  a  re-
sponsibility  I  have,  and  the  other  key  staff  who  work  with  me  on 
that are all Ph.D. level scientists. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. So, it was OK to alter the report as it was 

Dr.  MAHONEY.  Well,  Senator,  there  was  no  alteration  of  the  re-
port,  the  phrasing  you’re  using  makes  it  sound  like  a  report  was 
prepared  and  then  it  was  changed  by  this  person.  The  fact  is  that 
a  draft  was  prepared,  and  that  draft  was  circulated  to  the  rep-
resentatives  of  all  13  agencies  who  take  part  in  the  program,  as 
well  as  representatives  of  OMB,  and  CEQ,  and  OSTP,  all  White 

produced? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

House functions, so basically, everything we produce first exists as 
a draft, then it goes to 16 addresses. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. So, you’re satisfied, Dr. Mahoney, that the 
hand  of  science  was  firmly  imprinted  on  that  report  as  it  finally 
came  out?  Because  you  suggest  that  a  draft  was  only  a  draft,  but 
this  isn’t  a  novel,  a  fictional  novel  that  is  being  written  and  some-
one  is  editing,  I  mean,  I  assume  that  we’re  dealing  with  facts,  de-
termined,  developed  in  the  production  of  the  draft,  is  that  not  so? 
Dr. MAHONEY. Well, that’s true, however, the principle of the two 
documents—the  one  that  we’re  speaking  about—is  the  strategic 
plan I mentioned earlier. That plan was not a statement of fact or 
finding,  it  was  a  statement  of  our  planned  work  program  over  the 
years  ahead,  so  that  is  not  the  same  thing  as  a  document  that 
would be saying, ‘‘Here are our key findings about climate change,’’ 
it  was,  instead,  ‘‘Here’s  our  work  plan.’’  And  that  work  plan  was 
very  heavily  commented  on  by  all  16  of  those  entities  that  I  men-
tioned, the 13 agencies and the three White House offices. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  thank  you  for  that  explanation.  The 

Union of Concerned Scientists, are they a reliable organization? 

Dr. MAHONEY. Yes, I think they’re an advocacy organization, but 
that doesn’t mean they’re unreliable, but sometimes advocacy orga-
nizations—— 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  What  do  you  think  of  them,  Dr.  Cicerone? 
Are  they  a  lobbying  organization  more  than  they  are  a  science  or-
ganization? 

Dr.  CICERONE.  They’re  pretty  activist.  A  lot  of  great  individual 
scientists  work  with  them,  so  I  certainly  don’t  dismiss  them,  but 
I do know they’re pretty activist. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Which  says  that  what  they  issue  is  not 

necessarily unbiased, scientific discovery? 

Dr. CICERONE. No, I think they use a record that can be checked, 
so I think they try to use a scientific method. I think that the topic 
that they’ve been concerned about is their reading that science ad-
vice  generally  hasn’t  been  used  as  much  in  the  last  decade  as  pre-
viously,  so  this  is  part  of  their  view,  a  lot  of  scientists  feel  that 
way. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. OK, but what they would produce, or they 
would  publish,  would  be  fairly  well  based  on  scientific  knowledge, 
and  it  wouldn’t  be  largely  on  advocacy,  kind  of  mission,  but  would 
they  be  stimulated  to  produce  a  report  based  on  the  knowledge  of 
science? 

Dr.  CICERONE.  I  think  so,  and  they  usually  document  what  they 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  OK.  So,  Dr.  Mahoney,  if  the  commentary 
that accompanied their criticism, or their information developed as 
a result of a change in the report, the National Science Association, 
the NAS study that confirmed the Intergovernmental Panel on Cli-
mate Change finding that human activities contributing to climate 
change,  and  to  insert  a  discredited  study  of  temperature  records 
that  was  funded,  in  part,  by  the  American  Petroleum  Institute— 
are you aware of that assertion? 

Dr.  MAHONEY.  Senator,  I’m  not  aware  of  the  specific  assertion, 
what I do know is that the Union of Concerned Scientists has writ-
ten  at  least  one  broad  letter  criticizing  the  use  of  science  in  this 

say. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

Administration. I know that the Union of Concerned Scientists also 
expressed  displeasure,  and  I  think  it  may  have  been  in  a  written 
document  about  information  in  an  EPA  document  that  dealt,  in 
part,  with  climate  issues.  I’m  not  aware  of  any  written  statement 
or  even  verbal  statement  from  the  Union  of  Concerned  Scientists 
about  the  documents  for  which  I’m  responsible  in  the  Climate 
Change  Science  Program,  so  I  don’t  have  the  basis  to  respond  di-
rectly, I’m not aware of it. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  just  want  to  confirm  something  and  I’ll 
turn the podium back to the Chairman, but you feel that what Mr. 
Cooney  did,  that  to  your  knowledge,  you’re  familiar  with  the 
changes? 

Dr. MAHONEY. Absolutely, the comments he made—— 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  They  were  approved  by  those  with  a 
science background? People who understood and saw no harm or no 
change of materiality in the changes that he’d made? 

Dr.  MAHONEY.  Well,  I  think  you’re  asking  a  question,  sort  of, 
with two parts. One, were they approved, and then saying, did any-
body  see  any  change,  any  materiality?  I  don’t  want  to  parse  the 
words too much. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  That’s  not  for  us  to  argue,  but  I’m  not 
talking about the process, I’m talking about the outcome. Were Mr. 
Cooney’s  comments,  you  said  they  were  vetted  by  those  who  have 
science as their background? 

Dr. MAHONEY. Yes. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  And  that  there  were  not  significant,  there 
were  no  changes  as  a  result  of  his  comments.  He’s  not  in  the  Ad-
ministration any longer, as we know. 

Dr. MAHONEY. That’s correct, he’s not in the Administration. He, 
like  many  other  commenters,  made  a  very  large  number  of  sug-
gested  edits  to  these  draft  reports,  and  our  job  after  getting  those 
draft edits from everyone was to consider them all, and then to re-
cast  the  report,  making  our  best  judgment  about  the  right  things 
to  say  and  the  right  science.  I’ve  now  done  two  stints  in  govern-
ment  dealing  with  this  kind  of  interagency  work,  I  did  this  with 
acid  rain  back  in  the  late  1980s,  too,  and  in  both  of  these  cases, 
basically every document that is produced goes for review by all of 
those who might want to comment on it, but then it all comes back, 
so  that  someone  is  responsible  for  deciding  what  comments  to  ac-
cept or partly accept, or reject, and I would say specifically, relative 
to  Mr.  Cooney’s  comments,  they  came,  sometimes,  to  others  first, 
but  they  all  come  to  me.  So  that  document,  at  the  end  of  the  day 
is my responsibility. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  And  you’re  confirming  you  were  satisfied 

with the changes you made? 

Dr.  MAHONEY.  To  get  to  the  core  of  it,  absolutely.  I  confirm  that 

I am—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. That you endorse it? 
Dr. MAHONEY. I endorse it. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much, Dr. Mahoney. 
Senator  VITTER.  All  right,  I  want  to  thank  all  of  our  witnesses 
again for your participation in this hearing, we certainly appreciate 
it.  We’ll  also  be  sending  along  some  follow-up  written  questions, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

and  would  appreciate  those  answers  so  we  can  consider  them  and 
make them part of the record. 

[Whereupon, at 11:35 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

HON. JAMES R. MAHONEY 

Background: The recent announcement of a new Asian-Pacific climate pact involv-
ing India, China, and the U.S. highlights the important role of international collabo-
ration  in  climate  change  policy  and  in  the  scientific  research  that  will  continue  to 
improve  our  understanding  of  the  consequences  of  changes  in  climate  for  commu-
nities,  governments,  and  businesses  in  the  Asia-Pacific  region  and  throughout  the 
world.  As  you  know,  the  State  of  Hawaii  is  home  to  a  number  of  scientific  institu-
tions  and  programs  that  will  be  important  assets  as  the  U.S.  moves  forward  with 
this new Asian-Pacific climate pact including, for example: the International Pacific 
Research  Center  (IPRC)  at  the  University  of  Hawaii;  the  NOAA  Joint  Institute  for 
Marine  and  Atmospheric  Research  (JIMAR);  the  East-West  Center;  the  new  NOAA 
Integrated  Environmental  Applications  and  Information  Center  (NIEAIC);  and  a 
number  of  ongoing  NOAA-supported  programs  such  as  the  Pacific  Islands  Regional 
Integrated  Science  and  Assessment  (RISA)  program,  NWS  international  weather 
and  climate  research  and  services,  and  regional  contributions  to  environmental  ob-
serving  system  programs  such  as  the  Global  Climate  Observing  System  and  the 
Global Ocean Observing System. 

Question.  Please  describe  the  Administration’s  plans,  with  specific  focus  on 
NOAA’s  plans,  for  engaging  these  assets  in  support  of  the  observations,  research, 
modeling,  and  assessment  programs  that  will  be  necessary  to  support  the  new 
Asian-Pacific climate pact as well as other regional and international climate agree-
ments  in  the  region  such  as  the  U.S.-New  Zealand  and  U.S.-Australia  Climate 
Change Science bilaterals and the long-standing science bilateral with Japan. 

Answer. 

Asia-Pacific Partnership 

The  Asia-Pacific  Partnership  on  Clean  Development  and  Climate  (AP–6)  and  the 
activities NOAA are involved with such as the United States Group on Earth Obser-
vations  (USGEO)  are  two  separate  programs  with  separate  objectives.  The  AP–6  is 
a  public/private  partnership  for  addressing  the  challenges  of  assuring  economic 
growth  and  development,  poverty  eradication,  energy  security,  pollution  reduction, 
and  mitigating  climate  change.  The  U.S.  joined  by  Australia,  China,  India,  Japan, 
and South Korea, are actively engaging leaders in the private sector in our various 
countries  to  develop  and  implement  programs  and  projects  that  implement  the  ob-
jectives  of  AP–6  while  making  good  business  sense.  This  creative  partnership  is 
unique  because  it  made  up  of  6  countries  with  common  energy  needs,  and  because 
of the substantial private sector involvement. 

NOAA,  through  its  leadership  of  the  United  States  Group  on  Earth  Observations 
(USGEO),  plans  to  work  with  the  15  other  agencies  and  3  White  House  offices  to 
identify parameters for measuring success in energy efficiency and emissions reduc-
tion. These parameters could include emissions output, energy consumption, partic-
ulate  matter  and  air  quality,  weather  conditions  affecting  energy  load,  etc.  Tools 
such as those being developed through the USGEO should prove very useful to ini-
tiatives such as the Asia-Pacific Partnership. 

Working  through  the  international  mechanism,  the  intergovernmental  Group  on 
Earth  Observations  (GEO),  which  is  co-chaired  by  the  U.S.  (Under  Secretary 
Lautenbacher) and China, and in which all 6 Asia-Pacific Partnership countries par-
ticipate, the United States can provide leadership in establishing common data for-
mats  for  measuring  like  parameters  in  each  country  by  providing  a  trusted,  but 
verifiable  metric.  Common  formats  will  ensure  more  accurate  performance  meas-
ures. 
Pacific Climate Science and Information Services 

NOAA  and  its  extramural  partners  at  the  East-West  Center,  the  University  of 
Hawaii  (including  the  International  Pacific  Research  Center,  the  School  of  Ocean 

(53) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

and  Earth  Science  and  Technology,  and  the  Social  Science  Research  Institute),  the 
University of Guam, and other agency partners continue their substantial collabora-
tion  toward  the  development  of  an  integrated,  regional  climate  information  system 
for the Pacific. 

The  Pacific  climate  information  system  will  engage  and  build  on  a  strong  legacy 

of ongoing programs including: 

• The  Pacific  ENSO  (El  Nin˜ o  Southern  Oscillation)  Applications  Center  (PEAC) 
which  delivers  ENSO-based  climate  forecast  and  applications  services  to  the 
American  Flag  and  U.S.-Affiliated  Pacific  Islands  in  the  Pacific  and  represents 
a key node in the emerging WMO Regional Climate Centre for the Pacific; 

• The Pacific Regional Integrated Science and Assessment (Pacific RISA) program 
designed to understand and reduce regional vulnerability to climate-related ex-
treme events (e.g., droughts, floods, and tropical cyclones) through a number of 
program objectives including: sustained, interactive dialogue with decision-mak-
ers  in  climate-sensitive  sectors;  enhanced  regional  efforts  to  develop  and  apply 
climate forecasts and information products; develop enhanced data and informa-
tion  products  that  address  the  nature  and  consequences  of  climate-related  ex-
treme events; and adapt and apply model-based decision support tools and tech-
niques  designed  to  more  effectively  manage  the  risks  associated  with  climate- 
related extreme events; and 

• NOAA’s  climate  information  services  in  the  Pacific  are  being  coordinated  with 
the efforts of other Federal, state, and local agencies, regional organizations and 
scientific partners in universities and the private sector). 

U.S. Climate Science Bilateral Agreements in the Pacific 

Since  2003,  the  U.S.  (led  by  the  State  Department)  has  entered  into  a  number 
of important bilateral climate agreements. Specifically, the U.S. GCOS Program Of-
fice  is  involved  in  funding  projects  with  Australia  and  New  Zealand  that  directly 
relate  toward  furthering  the  progress  of  GCOS  and  GOOS  in  the  region.  The  bilat-
eral  projects  cover  a  wide  range  of  projects  dealing  with  climate  prediction,  ocean 
observing, stratospheric detection, water vapor measurements, capacity building and 
training,  and  communication  of  information,  and  will  focus  the  attention  and  re-
sources  of  all  these  countries  toward  developing  a  more  sustainable  and  robust 
GCOS program. 

For  example,  in  conjunction  with  the  National  Institutes  of  Water  and  Atmos-
phere  (NIWA)  in  New  Zealand,  there  are  now  two  new  projects  which  have  been 
implemented  on  a  long-term  basis.  The  first  one  involves  the  implementation  of  a 
global  stratospheric  water  vapor  measurement  station  in  Lauder,  New  Zealand.  A 
second significant project involves the implementation of a new ship track for trace 
gas  measurements,  which  has  been  implemented  on  a  car  carrier  ship  on  a  route 
between  Nelson,  New  Zealand,  and  Nagoya,  Japan.  This  is  a  brand  new  route  and 
is  unique  in  that  it  crosses  both  the  Intertropical  and  South  Pacific  convergence 
zones. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

HON. JAMES R. MAHONEY 

Question 1. Given that we now know, as the President has said, that ‘‘the surface 
of the Earth is warmer and that an increase in greenhouse gases caused by humans 
is  contributing  to  the  problem,’’  when  does  the  Administration  intend  to  produce  a 
plan to reduce emissions and stabilize the concentrations of greenhouse gases in the 
atmosphere? 

Answer.  The  goal  of  the  Climate  Change  Science  Program  (CCSP)  is  to  advance 
the  science  and  provide  scientific  results  that  can  be  used  to  support  policies  and 
planning  to  address  climate  change  for  policymakers.  In  fact,  CCSP  recently  held 
a  public  workshop  on  Climate  Science  in  Support  of  Decision  Making,1 which  drew 
more  than  700  participants  from  the  research,  decisionmaking,  and  international 
communities,  as  well  as  students,  users,  and  individuals  interested  in  the  applica-
tions  of  climate  science.  The  workshop  included  discussion  of  decision-maker  needs 
for scientific information on climate variability and change, as well as expected out-
comes of CCSP’s research and assessment activities that are necessary for sound re-
source management, adaptive planning, and policy formulation. 

1 http://www.climatescience.gov/workshop2005/default.htm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

Over the past few years, several actions—in addition to the roughly $2 billion an-
nual  investment  in  science—have  been  taken  by  the  Administration  to  address  the 
reduction of greenhouse gas emissions and concentrations, which include: 

2012. 

• Setting  a  national  goal  to  reduce  greenhouse  gas  intensity  by  18  percent  by 
• Asia-Pacific Partnership for Clean Development and Climate.2 
• Energy Policy Act of 2005, which includes $9.2 billion in tax incentive over the 
period  of  2005–2015  and  other  important  provisions  that  will  promote  new, 
cleaner technologies. 
• Reaffirming  the  commitment  to  the  United  Nations  Framework  Convention  on 
Climate  Change  and  regular  participation  in  the  Conference  of  Parties  meet-
ings. 
• Approximately $2 to $3 billion in annual investments into the development and 
deployment of transformational technologies through the Climate Change Tech-
nology  Program.3 Key  research  and  development  areas  are  included  in  the 
President’s Advanced Energy Initiative: biomass, solar, wind, hydrogen, nuclear, 
and  clean  coal.  CCTP  deployment  programs  include  Climate  VISION 4 (Vol-
untary Innovative Sector Initiatives: Opportunities Now), Climate Leaders,5 and 
SmartWay Transport Partnership.6 
• Leadership  in  the  Group  on  Earth  Observations 7 and  the  development  of  the 
• United  States  Department  of  Agriculture’s  conservation  programs,  which  pro-
• Increased fuel economy standards for new light trucks and sport utility vehicles 

vide incentives for actions that may increase carbon sequestration. 

Global Earth Observation System of Systems. 

by 1.5 miles per gallon over the next three model years. 

Question  2.  If  you  do  not  intend  to  do  so,  I  want  to  point  out  that  the  National 
Academies  of  Science  said:  ‘‘[L]ack  of  full  scientific  certainty  about  some  aspects  of 
climate  change  is  not  a  reason  for  delaying  an  immediate  response  that  will,  at  a 
reasonable cost, prevent dangerous anthropogenic interference with the climate sys-
tem.’’  What  specific  scientific  questions  does  the  Administration  need  answered  be-
fore it is convinced that we need such a plan to reduce emissions and stabilize con-
centrations? 

Answer.  A  key  finding  of  the  2001  NAS  report  on  climate  science  requested  by 
the  President  was  as  follows:  ‘‘While  scientific  uncertainties  remain,  we  can  begin 
now  to  address  the  factors  that  contribute  to  climate  change.’’  Key  scientific  uncer-
tainties being addressed by the Climate Change Science Program include: 

warming is contributed by humans versus natural variability)? 

• How  much  humans  contribute  to  climate  change  (i.e.,  what  percentage  of  the 
• How much of the change in climate is reversible? 
• How effective would various mitigation and adaptation strategies be? 
In  addition,  the  President  stated  in  2001  that  the  Academy’s  report  tells  us  that 
we  do  not  know  how  much  effect  natural  fluctuations  in  climate  may  have  had  on 
warming. We do not know how much our climate could, or will change in the future. 
We  do  not  know  how  fast  change  will  occur,  or  even  how  some  of  our  actions  could 
impact it. CCSP is addressing these questions as well. 

Despite  not  having  answers  to  these  key  questions,  the  Administration,  as  ex-
plained in response to Question 1, has already invested in several programs and has 
provided  tax  incentives  to  slow  the  growth  of  greenhouse  gas  emissions.  Our  ap-
proach draws upon the best scientific research, harnesses the power of markets, fos-
ters  the  creativity  of  entrepreneurs,  and  works  with  the  developing  world  to  meet 
shared aspirations for our people, our economy, and our environment. 

Question 3. Eleven national science academies (including the U.S. National Acad-
emy  of  Sciences)  said  in  their  statement  issued  on  7  June  2005:  ‘‘It  is  likely  that 
most  of  the  warming  in  recent  decades  can  be  attributed  to  human  activities.’’  Do 
you agree with this statement? 

Answer.  Since  2001,  the  President  has  stated  that  humans  are  contributing  to 
changes in climate. However, as explained in response to Question 2, there are still 

2 http://www.whitehouse.gov/news/releases/2005/07/20050727-11.html. 
3 http://www.climatetechnology.gov. 
4 http://www.climatevision.gov. 
5 http://www.epa.gov/climateleaders. 
6 http://www.epa.gov/smartway. 
7 http://earthobservations.org/. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

uncertainties around how much humans are contributing versus natural variability 
and what types of strategies will be most effective. 

56 

Question 4. The National Academy of Sciences’ review of the new CCSP strategic 
plan  was  particularly  glowing.  In  your  written  testimony  you  highlight  this  fact 
with an extended quote from the review. Left out of your excerpt, however, is NAS’ 
conclusion  that  the  CCSP  budget  did  not  appear  sufficient  to  meet  all  of  the  goals 
in  the  strategic  plan.  If  the  President’s  climate  budget  is  enacted  unchanged,  the 
CCSP  budget  will  have  shrunk  by  $84  million,  or  4  percent,  from  Fiscal  Year  2004 
enacted  levels.  How  will  these  cuts  alter  implementation  of  the  strategic  plan  that 
was so well received by the National Academies? 

Answer.  CCSP  priorities  are  reviewed  on  an  annual  cycle  through  the  budget 
process.  A  critical  function  of  CCSP  is  coordinating  the  CCSP  budget  across  the  13 
CCSP  agencies.  In  Fiscal  Year  2006,  this  coordination  process  involved  the  align-
ment of agency climate programs with the goals and key research focus areas in the 
CCSP Strategic Plan, thus helping to ensure consistency. The emphasis is on ensur-
ing  alignment  of  current  funding  with  a  recommended  list  of  priorities  and  identi-
fying  gaps  that  may  occur,  as  well  as  identifying  measurable  milestones  and 
deliverables that reflect accountability toward meeting program goals. 

Each year, we expect that agency budgets will fluctuate. Thus, the current CCSP 
program is a high-priority selection of activities that merit continued support. How-
ever, new initiatives are required to move in directions identified in the CCSP Stra-
tegic  Plan.  CCSP  must  maintain  key  research  activities,  while  encouraging  innova-
tion  in  a  constrained  budget  environment.  There  is  a  need  for  continuing  evolution 
of  program  priorities  and  activities  through  new  initiatives,  the  competitive  grant 
process within agencies, and other evolutional redirection reflecting new focus areas 
for high-priority research in climate science. 

Question 5. Could you elaborate on the different activities undertaken by the Cli-
mate  Change  Research  Initiative  and  the  U.S.  Global  Change  Research  Program? 
How are they different? 

Answer. The U.S. Global Change Research Program (USGCRP) supports research 
on  the  interactions  of  natural  and  human-induced  changes  in  the  global  environ-
ment and their implications for society. The USGCRP began as a Presidential initia-
tive  in  1989  and  was  codified  by  Congress  in  the  Global  Change  Research  Act  of 
1990,  which  mandates  development  of  a  coordinated  interagency  research  program. 
USGCRP  organized  its  research  in  seven  areas:  Atmospheric  Composition,  Climate 
Variability  and  Change,  Global  Water  Cycle,  Land-Use  and  Land-Cover  Change, 
Global Carbon Cycle, Ecosystems, and Human Contributions and Responses. 

The  Climate  Change  Research  Initiative  (CCRI)  was  launched  by  the  President 
in  2001  with  four  key  priorities:  (1)  to  reduce  significant  uncertainties  in  climate 
science; (2) improve global observing systems; (3) develop science-based information 
resources  to  support  policymaking  and  resource  management;  and  (4)  communicate 
findings broadly among the international scientific and user communities. 

The Climate Change Science Program (CCSP) was announced in 2002 with strong 
focus  on  advancing  scientific  understanding  of  global  climate  change,  as  well  as  co-
ordinating  and  integrating  scientific  research  on  global  change  and  climate  change 
sponsored  by  13  Federal  departments  and  agencies.  This  new  structure  required 
CCSP to incorporate and integrate the long-standing work of USGCRP and the more 
recent research organized within CCRI. 

As CCSP has evolved, the four CCRI priorities continue to form the basis for the 
nine  priorities  areas  of  CCSP  overall  for  Fiscal  Year  2006.  However,  there  is  still 
a  current  budget  line  for  CCRI,  as  displayed  in  Our  Changing  Planet,  the  annual 
report  to  Congress.  The  CCRI  line  budget  totals  include  research  specifically  to  re-
duce  uncertainties  in  the  areas  listed  above.  For  example,  CCRI  line  items  for 
NOAA  in  Fiscal  Year  2006  include  Global  Climate  Observing  System  and  Global 
Ocean  Observing  System  to  support  the  CCRI  priority  to  improve  global  observing 
systems. The USGCRP line items for NOAA in Fiscal Year 2006 include Global Car-
bon Cycle and Atmospheric Composition research which are two of the seven science 
elements established under USGCRP. These topics are not necessarily mutually ex-
clusive, but specific research items under each program determine how they are re-
ported  for  budget  purposes.  Both  the  CCRI  and  USGCRP  lines  make  up  the  CCSP 
totals. 

Question  6.  What  contribution  is  the  CCSP  making  to  the  Global  Earth  Observa-
tion System? Please be specific in terms of both money and other programmatic sup-
port. 

Answer.  Under  NOAA’s  Climate  Change  Research  Initiative  (CCRI)  budget  line 
for the support of atmospheric Global Climate Observing System (GCOS) networks, 
the  U.S.  remains  committed  to  improvements  in  the  management  and  operation  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

GCOS  and  GCOS-related  atmospheric  and  oceanographic  networks  in  line  with  the 
GCOS  Implementation  Plan  approved  in  October  2004  (see  http://www.wmo.int/ 
web/gcos/gcoshome.html).  GCOS  is  an  international  program  with  inputs  from 
many countries as well as U.S. Government agencies. The U.S. National GCOS Re-
port  done  in  2001  was  a  multi-agency  effort.  GCOS  also  serves  as  an  organizing 
focus  for  the  CCSP’s  Observations  Program.  Finally,  GCOS  is  the  formal  climate 
component of the Global Earth Observations System of Systems (GEOSS) and forms 
the  basis  for  the  Climate  component  of  the  U.S.  Strategic  Plan  for  the  Integrated 
Earth Observations System. 

NOAA’s  U.S.  GCOS  Program  Office,  which  represents  the  U.S.  on  the  GCOS  Co-
operation Board, has committed to leading the way for facilitating improvements in 
the  management  and  operation  of  GCOS  and  GCOS-related  atmospheric  networks. 
The U.S. GCOS Program Office has taken leadership, working with our partners at 
the  World  Meteorological  Organization,  in  further  GCOS  improvements.  The  U.S. 
GCOS  Program  Office  has  been  the  catalyst  for  revitalizing  the  GCOS  Cooperation 
Mechanism  process  by  organizing  the  second  meeting  of  the  GCOS  Cooperation 
Donor  Board  that  took  place  on  November  30,  2005,  in  Montreal,  Canada,  in  con-
junction with the meeting of the United Nations Framework Convention on Climate 
Change.  This  work  began  in  Fiscal  Year  (FY)  2003  and  plans  are  for  continued  ef-
forts  in  this  area  for  the  foreseeable  future.  The  GCOS  program  reflects  a  broad- 
based  approach  that  looks  at  supporting  observing  and  data  management  activities 
at  the  international,  regional,  and  bi-lateral  levels.  In  addition,  support  for  Pacific 
Islands Ocean and Climate observing regional coordinators in Fiji and Samoa to aid 
in  coordinating  these  observing  activities  among  developing  countries  in  the  region 
has been a great boost toward capacity building in that critical region. 

Support  for  developing  nations  has  primarily  been  to  retrofit  surface  and  upper 
air observing stations that had been silent but are key to global climate monitoring 
activities. Countries that have received new equipment and resources over the past 
2  years  include:  Argentina,  Armenia,  Congo,  Cook  Islands,  Costa  Rica,  Ecuador, 
Ivory Coast, Kenya, Maldives, Namibia, the Philippines, and Zimbabwe. In addition, 
and in cooperation with the U.S. State Department, a number of workshops for en-
hancing  climate  change  monitoring  in  support  of  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on 
Climate  Change  (IPCC)  have  or  are  being  staged  in  South  Africa,  southern  South 
America,  northern  South  America  and  Central  America,  Southwest  Asia,  Southern 
Asia, and Southern and Eastern Africa. These workshops are all hands-on, involving 
seminars  and  hands-on  work  with  data  from  the  various  countries  in  attendance. 
In  addition,  the  State  Department  has  been  instrumental  in  aiding  the  establish-
ment  of  regional  GCOS  maintenance  facilities  which  have  been  established  in  the 
Pacific and the Caribbean. In 2005, a third regional GCOS Maintenance Center was 
established  in  Botswana  to  aid  in  monitoring  and  maintaining  GCOS  equipment  in 
Eastern  and  Southern  Africa.  The  maintenance  centers  have  demonstrated  real 
progress in improving the performance of GCOS in those three regions. 

The  support  provided  is  used  to:  (1)  Support  the  operations  of  the  GCOS  Secre-
tariat;  (2)  stage  GCOS  regional  workshops  in  developing  countries;  and  (3)  support 
critical GCOS data management activities at the GCOS Lead Data Center at NCDC 
in  Asheville,  North  Carolina.  The  Fiscal  Year  2005  budget  of  $3.5M  continued  the 
work  begun  in  2003  and  2004  and  expanded  support  to  GCOS  Upper  Air  Network 
observing  sites  in  Argentina,  Armenia,  Congo,  Cook  Islands,  Costa  Rica,  Ecuador, 
Ivory Coast, Kenya, the Maldives, Namibia, the Philippines, and Zimbabwe. 

Over the past decade NOAA has worked with national and international partners 
to  begin  building  a  sustained  global  ocean  system  for  climate,  focusing  first  on  the 
tropical Pacific, and expanding to the Atlantic and the Indian Oceans. It is now well 
understood that documenting and forecasting climate will require continuous meas-
urements  from  space,  along  with  the  measurements  obtained  from  instruments  de-
ployed  across  the  entire  global  ocean.  The  present  international  effort  is  about  51 
percent  of  what  will  ultimately  be  needed  for  the  global  system.  NOAA  presently 
maintains  approximately  60  percent  of  the  in  situ  networks  and  30  percent  of  the 
space  components,  and  is  committed  to  the  goal  of  providing  at  least  50  percent  of 
the  composite  system  over  the  long  term.  The  existing  foundation  is  comprised  of 
twelve  complementary  in  situ,  space  based,  data  and  assimilation  subsystems:  (1) 
Global  Tide  Gauge  Network;  (2)  Global  Surface  Drifting  Buoy  Array;  (3)  Global 
Ships of Opportunity Network; (4) Tropical Moored Buoy Network; (5) Argo Profiling 
Float  Array;  (6)  Ocean  Reference  Stations;  (7)  Coastal  Moorings;  (8)  Ocean  Carbon 
Monitoring  Network;  (9)  Arctic  observing  System;  (10)  Dedicated  Ship  Operations; 
(11)  Satellites  for  Sea  Surface  Temperature,  Sea  Surface  Height,  Surface  Vector 
Winds, Sea Ice, and Ocean Color; and (12) Data and Assimilation Systems and their 
products. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

NOAA’s  plan  includes  an  additional  element—System  Management  and  Product 
Delivery—to  focus  program  resources  on  answering  the  Nation’s  highest  priority 
policy-  and  economically-relevant  questions.  The  global  ocean  observing  system, 
when fully implemented, will provide specific ocean outcomes such as data sets that 
can  be  used  to  drive  forecast  models,  and  analysis  products  describing  the  present 
state  of  the  ocean,  how  the  present  state  compares  with  the  past,  and  the  con-
fidence/uncertainty in the analysis. NOAA’s contribution to this global implementa-
tion  is  represented  in  the  program  budget  profile  illustrated  in  Appendix  B.  Imple-
mentation  of  this  program  plan  demonstrates  to  the  world  community  that  the 
United  States  is  taking  action  to  observe  climate,  is  playing  a  leadership  role  in 
achieving  global  coverage  of  the  ocean  networks,  and  is  committed  to  sustained  op-
erations. 

The progress that the U.S. GCOS Program has made over the past few years was 
recently  recognized  by  the  United  Nations  Framework  Convention  on  Climate 
Change  (UNFCCC).  In  September  2004,  the  UNFCCC  Secretariat  published  an  In- 
depth  Review  (IDR)  of  the  Third  National  communication  from  the  U.S.,  entitled 
‘‘U.S.  Climate  Action  Report—2002  (Climate  Action  Report  3)’’.  The  IDR  was  per-
formed by an independent review team on behalf of the UNFCCC and is now avail-
able online at http://unfccc.int/resource/docs/idr/usa03.pdf. Climate Action Report 
3  (CAR3)  can  be  found  online  at  http://unfccc.int/resource/docs/natc/usnc3.pdf. 
The  IDR  had  a  number  of  findings  related  to  CAR3,  however  the  U.S.  GCOS  pro-
gram was specifically identified in findings 130 and 131 on pages 28–29 of their re-
port as follows: 

130. The United States has one of the most impressive national Global Climate 
Observing Systems (GCOS) for climate monitoring in five distinct yet integrated 
areas.  The  system  acquires  detailed  local  and  large-scale  national  data,  includ-
ing observation of environmental variables, representing a major contribution to 
the Integrated Global Observing Strategy. 
131.  The  review  team  was  informed  that  NOAA  has  formulated  a  framework 
for international GCOS support. It focuses on needed improvements to meteoro-
logical surface-based networks and on the GCOS terrestrial and oceanic surface- 
based  and  satellite-based  observation  networks.  NOAA  has  identified  nine  ac-
tivities that it proposed to launch in 2003 in association with the GCOS Secre-
tariat,  with  a  total  spending  of  USD  4  million  annually.  Additional  funding  for 
rescue  and  digitization  of  long-period  observational  data  in  Africa  and  Asia  is 
also  provided.  The  provision  of  these  datasets  comprises  a  major  contribution 
to the science of climate change, and is likely to enhance the Intergovernmental 
Panel  for  Climate  Change  (IPCC)  process.  The  review  team  noted  a  NOAA  ini-
tiative for the development of radio and Internet-based climate information dis-
semination tools for rural farmers in developing countries. 

The  work  undertaken  by  the  U.S.  GCOS  Program  is  consistent  with  the  G8 
Gleneagles  Plan  of  Action  on  Climate  Change,  Clean  Energy,  and  Sustainable  De-
velopment issued in July 2005; item number 34 from that plan addresses particular 
needs with respect to GCOS that the U.S. program will continue to work on. 

The  G8  made  a  commitment  at  Evian  to  strengthen  international  cooperation 
on  global  Earth  observations.  We  will  continue  to  exercise  leadership  in  this 
area, and welcome the adoption of the 10-year implementation plan for develop-
ment of the Global Earth Observation System of Systems (GEOSS) at the Third 
Earth Observations Summit which took place in Brussels in February this year. 
We  will:  (a)  move  forward  in  the  national  implementation  of  GEOSS  in  our 
member  states;  (b)  support  efforts  to  help  developing  countries  and  regions  ob-
tain full benefit from GEOSS, including from the Global Climate Observing Sys-
tem (GCOS) such as placement of observational systems to fill data gaps, devel-
oping  of  in-country  and  regional  capacity  for  analysing  and  interpreting  obser-
vational  data,  and  development  of  decision-support  systems  and  tools  relevant 
to local needs; (c) in particular, work to strengthen the existing climate institu-
tions  in  Africa,  through  GCOS,  with  a  view  to  developing  fully  operational  re-
gional climate centres in Africa. 

In summary, the inception of the U.S. GCOS Program Office in 1999, coupled with 
the  resources  provided  via  the  CCRI  program  has  led  to  a  robust  and  active  U.S. 
GCOS program. The program has been working with a number of partners in order 
to provide support across a broad range of international, regional, and bi-lateral cli-
mate activities that are leading to progress for GCOS in-line with the overall GCOS 
Implementation  Plan.  Appendices  A  and  B  of  this  document  details  the  amount  of 
funding  contributed  toward  GCOS  from  Fiscal  Year  2003–05,  including  more  than 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

$12.3M for atmospheric climate observing support and more than $43.4M for ocean 
climate observing support. 

59 

APPENDIX A 

Summary of U.S. GCOS Support for FY 2003, FY 2004 and FY 2005 

[NOAA and State Dept Funds] 

Support Area 

Funding 

Level 

Activities Supported 

FY 2003 

$1650K  7 Sites Upgraded with Radiosonde Support 

GCOS  Upper  Air  Network 

(GUAN) 

Atmospheric Brown Cloud (ABC) 
Regional Maintenance 

$1462K  New ABC Observatory Support 
$500K  Regional  GCOS  Maintenance 

(e.g.,  spares, 

radiosondes) for RA–I; RA–IV; and RA–V) 

Global  Atmosphere  Watch  (GAW) 

$300K  Enhanced Observing Equipment for South Africa 

Aerosol Observations 

GAW 
Data Management 

and China GAW Stations 

$215K  Support for North American QA/SAC # 
$189K  Support  for  National  Climatic  Data  Center  as  a 

GCOS Secretariat 

GCOS/IPCC Workshops 

GAW 

Regional  Activities,  and  Other 

GCOS-related Support 

Administrative Travel 

Total 

GUAN 
ABC 
GCOS/IPCC Workshop Support 

GAW 
Data Management 
Bi-Lateral Support 
Global  Observing  System  Infor-

mation Center 
Regional Support 
GCOS Secretariat 
GCOS Surface Network (GSN) 

Total 

ABC 
GUAN 
U.S. GCOS Office Support 
GSN Support 
GAW 
Bi-Lateral Climate Support 
Data Management 
Global  Observing  System  Infor-

mation Center 

Full-Time  GCOS  Implementation 
Manager at GCOS Secretariat— 
Geneva 

Regional Support (Pacific) 

$150K  Support  for  Full-Time  Equivalent  GCOS  Imple-

Global GCOS Data Center 

mentation Project Manager 

$108K  4  Climate  Workshops  in  RA–I,  RA–II,  RA–III, 

$100K  Regional  Ozone  Calibration  Facility  for  South 

and RA–IV 

America 

$100K  GCOS  regional  workshop  in  South  America, 
upper  air  site  surveys,  and  Pacific  Region 
GCOS/GOOS support 

$7K  ABC Science Panel Meeting for 2 persons 

$4853K 

FY 2004 

$1475K  10 Sites Upgraded with Radiosonde 
$1398K  New ABC Observatory Support 
$225K  Climate  Workshop  in  India  (and  associated 

IPCC software work) 

$215K  Support for North American QA/SAC # 
$202K  Support for Global GCOS Data Center 
$180K  Pacific GCOS Support 
$125K  GCOS Data Management 

$115K  Regional GCOS-related activities 
$110K  Support for GCOS Secretariat 
$56K  Prototype high-altitude GSN site 

$4099K 

FY 2005 

$1398K  New ABC Observatory Support 
$535K  4 Sites Upgraded with Radiosonde 
$375K  Travel and Salaries 
$350K  4 Prototype Reference Sites in AK and HI 
$265K  Support for North American QA/SAC # 
$250K  Pacific GCOS Support 
$200K  Support for GCOS Lead Data Center 
$125K  GCOS Data Management 

$110K  Salary  and  Travel  for  Project  GCOS  Project  Im-

provement Projects 

$95K  Regional GCOS-related activities 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

Summary of U.S. GCOS Support for FY 2003, FY 2004 and FY 2005—Continued 

[NOAA and State Dept Funds] 

Support Area 

Funding 

Level 

Activities Supported 

Central UV Calibration Facility 

$40K  Critical  Support  for  Baseline  Surface  Radiation 

Network now Radiation Component of GCOS 

Total 

$3743K 

APPENDIX B—GLOBAL OCEAN CLIMATE OBSERVATIONS SUPPORT 

Question 7. The scientific and international communities have found it very useful 
to  have  a  single  document,  such  as  the  IPCC  Third  Assessment  report,  to  point  to 
as  a  universal  overview  of  climate  science  knowledge.  In  a  recent  letter  addressed 
to this committee you suggest that the conclusions of all 21 CCSP assessments will 
be summarized in a standard programmatic progress report, presumably in 2007 or 
2008. This hardly seems like the appropriate place for establishing a true synthesis 
of all the knowledge gained over the previous seven or 8 years. Why has the CCSP 
elected not to produce a single synthesis volume? 

Answer. The current position of the Climate Change Science Program is to incor-
porate a summary of findings of all completed products required by the 1990 Global 
Change Research Act in our annual Our Changing Planet report to Congress, start-
ing  in  2006.  The  CCSP  assessment  activity  is  an  ongoing  process,  and  this  is  the 
most efficient mechanism to disseminate summaries of each completed product. The 
alternative  would  be  to  wait  for  the  completion  of  the  entire  set  of  21  products  be-
fore beginning the preparation of a single summary document. While CCSP is com-
mitted to providing timely dissemination of the summary information on an annual 
basis through the mechanism of the existing OCP series, we will seriously consider 
the  question  of  providing  a  single  summary  document  upon  the  completion  of  the 
series of 21 Synthesis and Assessment documents. 

Question  8.  Phillip  Cooney,  the  former  Chief  of  Staff  for  the  Council  on  Environ-
mental  Quality  resigned  amidst  allegations  he  had  improperly  edited  climate  re-
ports.  Do  you  feel  his  editing  of  a  scientific  report  was  appropriate  for  an  official 
in his position? 

Answer.  CCSP  documents  are  produced  through  a  customary  interagency  review 
process.  The  thirteen  CCSP  agencies  (U.S.  Agency  for  International  Development; 
Department of Agriculture; Department of Commerce, National Oceanic and Atmos-
pheric Administration and National Institute of Standards and Technology; Depart-
ment  of  Defense;  Department  of  Energy;  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Serv-
ices,  National  Institutes  of  Health;  Department  of  State;  Department  of  Transpor-
tation;  Department  of  the  Interior,  U.S.  Geological  Survey;  Environmental  Protec-
tion  Agency;  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration;  National  Science 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
n
0
2
7

61 

Foundation;  and  the  Smithsonian  Institution),  the  Council  on  Environmental  Qual-
ity, the Office of Management and Budget, and the Office of Science and Technology 
Policy  review  draft  documents  and  propose  edits  that  range  from  corrections  of 
grammatical  errors  to  suggestions  for  insertions  or  deletions  of  text.  The  comments 
and  suggested  revisions  are  considered  by  CCSP  Office  scientific  staff  working 
under the supervision of the CCSP Director or directly by the CCSP Director. Subse-
quently  revised  drafts  are  prepared  and  these  drafts  are  again  circulated  for  final 
clearance and release. As Director of the CCSP, I have had final authority over the 
editorial  process  and  the  approved  content  of  all  CCSP  reports  disseminated  since 
2002. 

We  do  not  view  the  edits  proposed  by  CEQ  as  inappropriate,  but  rather  sugges-
tions  made  through  a  review  process  that  may  or  may  not  appear  in  the  final 
version of the document. 

Question 9. Has the Administration learned anything from this incident? Why was 

Phillip Cooney involved in editing scientific literature at all? 

Answer. All CCSP planning and program report documents undergo a well estab-
lished review process that involves all thirteen of the Federal agencies participating 
in  CCSP  (DOC/NOAA,  EPA,  DOE,  NSF,  NASA,  USDA,  DOI,  State,  USAID,  DOD, 
Smithsonian,  DOT,  and  HHS),  as  well  as  three  or  more  units  within  the  Executive 
Office  of  the  President  (OSTP,  CEQ,  and  OMB,  and  occasionally  other  elements). 
Each  CCSP  document  begins  as  a  draft  that  is  circulated  to  the  sixteen  (or  more) 
agencies  or  offices  mentioned  above.  Representatives  of  all  sixteen  entities—both 
scientific  and  non-scientific  personnel—are  invited  to  comment  on  the  draft  docu-
ment by means of individual responses to the CCSP Office. The CCSP Office Direc-
tor (who coordinates the day-to-day operations of the interagency CCSP Office) and 
his  immediate  technical  staff  (Ph.D.-level  scientists),  as  well  as  the  CCSP  Director 
(Senate-confirmed appointee who supervises the entire CCSP program and products) 
and  his  immediate  technical  staff  (also  Ph.D.-level  scientists)  are  responsible  for 
considering  all  suggested  editorial  comments,  and  for  final  decisions  about  the  text 
contained  in  the  published  document.  It  is  common  that  many  of  the  proposed  edi-
torial comments are not adopted, or are only partially adopted, by the CCSP senior 
technical  management.  In  the  end,  the  CCSP  Director  is  responsible  for  the  sci-
entific integrity of these CCSP planning and program report documents. 

Question  10.  Why  not  go  back  to  commissioning  scientific  reports  from  inde-
pendent  teams  of  eminent  scientists,  and  let  them  write  their  reports  without  sub-
jecting them to a clearance process by the White House? 

Answer.  The  Federal  Government  has  a  process  in  place  to  develop  scientific  in-
formation  with  the  best  possible  science  and  assurance  of  information  quality.  The 
CCSP  was  created  to  advance  the  understanding  of  climate  science  and  to  develop 
scientific  information  useful  to  decision  and  policymakers.  The  CCSP  was  also  cre-
ated on the premise that open and transparent processes would be used during the 
development  of  its  deliverables.  CCSP  has  a  wide  range  of  resources  (technical,  ad-
ministrative, and financial support from 13 agencies) to develop and deliver the best 
possible scientific information. The Information Quality Act (IQA) 1 required the Of-
fice  of  Management  and  Budget  (OMB)  to  issue  guidance  to  Federal  agencies  de-
signed  to  ensure  the  ‘‘quality,  objectivity,  utility,  and  integrity’’  of  information  dis-
seminated to the public. The IQA also required agencies to issue their own informa-
tion  quality  guidelines,  and  to  establish  administrative  mechanisms  that  allow  af-
fected persons to seek correction of information maintained and disseminated by the 
agencies that does not comply with the OMB guidance. IQA also requires a rigorous 
peer review mechanism for scientific and technical papers from a panel that has the 
appropriate expertise and is balanced, independent, and free of conflicts. 

Most CCSP deliverables will have significant input from non-Federal experts (e.g., 
non-Federal  scientists,  academicians,  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences,  and  Fed-
eral  Advisory  Committees).  However,  because  they  will  be  CCSP  products,  these 
documents are held to a higher standard using the best available science, open and 
transparent processes, and must comply with the Information Quality Act. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

HON. JAMES R. MAHONEY 

Question  1.  Dr.  Mahoney,  $1.8  billion  is  a  lot  of  money.  I  understand  you  are 
doing an enormous amount of research with it, but for Congress to benefit from that 
research,  NOAA  must  produce  a  report  summarizing  its  research.  The  GAO  rec-

1 http://www.whitehouse.gov/omb/inforeg/iqgloct2002.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

ommended  that  NOAA  prepare  at  least  a  summary  of  the  21  reports  you’ve  pro-
posed. Will you do that? 

Answer.  As  stated  in  a  letter  sent  transmitted  to  the  Hill  on  July  15,  2005,  the 
Climate Change Science Program will incorporate a summary of findings of all com-
pleted  products  required  by  the  1990  Global  Change  Research  Act  in  our  annual 
Our  Changing  Planet  report  to  Congress,  starting  in  2006.  The  CCSP  assessment 
activity  is  an  ongoing  process,  and  this  is  the  most  efficient  mechanism  to  dissemi-
nate summaries of each completed product. The alternative would be to wait for the 
completion of the entire set of 21 products before beginning the preparation of a sin-
gle summary document. While CCSP is committed to providing timely dissemination 
of the summary information on an annual basis through the mechanism of the exist-
ing  OCP  series,  we  will  seriously  consider  the  question  of  providing  a  single  sum-
mary  document  upon  the  completion  of  the  series  of  21  Synthesis  and  Assessment 
documents. 

Question  2.  What  do  you  see  as  the  key  potential  impacts  of  climate  change,  and 

what are you doing to study and report on them? 

Answer. The purpose of the Climate Change Science Program is to obtain the best 
possible science that is useful in managing climate variability and change. Research 
conducted  through  CCSP  is  building  on  scientific  advances  of  the  last  few  decades 
and  is  deepening  our  understanding  of  the  interplay  of  natural  and  human-caused 
forces. CCSP is developing information to facilitate comparative analysis of different 
approaches to adaptation and mitigation of climate change. CCSP also promotes ca-
pacity  development  among  scientists  and  information  users—both  in  the  developed 
and  developing  world—to  address  the  interactions  between  climate  change,  society, 
and the environment. 

The  potential  impacts  of  climate  change  are  vast  and  we  include  many  of  these 
impacts  in  the  CCSP  research  elements—Atmospheric  Composition,  Climate  Varia-
bility  and  Change,  Global  Water  Cycle,  Land-Use  and  Land-Cover  Change,  Global 
Carbon  Cycle,  Ecosystems,  Decision  Support  Resources  Development,  Related  Re-
search  on  Human  Contributions  and  Responses,  and  Observations  and  Monitoring. 
As  described  in  the  last  two  editions  of  Our  Changing  Planet,  hundreds  of  re-
search and impact studies are produced each year to enhance our understanding of 
climate  science.  CCSP  is  preparing  21  Synthesis  and  Assessment  Products  to  sup-
port  informed  discussion  and  decision-making  on  climate  variability  and  change  by 
policymakers,  resource  managers,  stakeholders,  the  media,  and  the  general  public. 
These  products  will  integrate  research  results  focused  on  key  issues  and  related 
questions frequently raised by decision-makers. 

CCSP recently held a public workshop, titled Climate Science in Support of Deci-
sion  Making.  The  workshop  which  drew  more  than  700  participants  from  the  re-
search,  decisionmaking,  and  international  communities,  as  well  as  students,  users, 
and  individuals  interested  in  the  applications  of  climate  science.  The  workshop  in-
cluded discussion of decision-maker needs for scientific information on climate varia-
bility and change, as well as expected outcomes of CCSP’s research and assessment 
activities  that  are  necessary  for  sound  resource  management,  adaptive  planning, 
and policy formulation. The principal topics covered in the workshop provide a use-
ful guide for some of the most climate-impacted areas being studied by CCSP. These 
include  Water  Management,  Ecosystems  Management,  Coastal  Management,  Air 
Quality Management, and Energy Systems Management. The abstracts for the pres-
entations are available on the CCSP website.1 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN MCCAIN TO 

HON. JAMES R. MAHONEY 

Question  1.  Do  you  agree  with  the  recent  joint  statement  by  the  National  Acad-

emies from the G8 countries concerning the state of climate change science? 

Answer.  We  rely  on  the  continued  efforts  and  leadership  of  the  U.S.  National 
Academy  of  Sciences,  working  with  its  sister  societies,  to  ensure  the  U.S.  response 
to  climate  change  is  informed  by  the  best  available  scientific  knowledge.  The  Joint 
Academies’ Statement on Climate Change reaffirms the central findings of the 2001 
National Academy of Sciences report on climate science requested by the President. 
Based on this advice, President Bush stated his comment back in 2001 that ‘‘While 
scientific  uncertainties  remain,  we  can  begin  now  to  address  the  factors  that  con-
tribute to climate change.’’ 

We recognize that action is needed to address climate change and we have already 
taken several important steps toward that goal, including leading public investment 

1 http://www.climatescience.gov/workshop2005/default.htm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

in  the  development  of  low  greenhouse  gas  (GHG)  emissions  technology  suitable  for 
application  by  all  nations;  continuing  investments  on  essential  climate  research 
questions; major participation in the development of an integrated Global Earth Ob-
servation  System  of  Systems  (GEOSS);  extensive  industry  and  sector  specific  GHG 
emissions  control  programs;  and  collaborative  bilateral  and  multilateral  programs 
with key partners throughout the developed and developing world. More information 
on this effort can be found at: http://www.whitehouse.gov/news/releases/2005/05/ 
20050518-4.html. 

Question  2.  In  terms  of  being  responsive  to  the  science  which  the  President  has 
stated  the  Administration  would  be,  do  you  believe  that  the  Climate  Science  Pro-
gram  is  being  responsive  and  taking  urgent  action  as  called  for  by  the  joint  state-
ment by delaying the national assessment report further? 

Answer.  The  Climate  Change  Science  Program  (CCSP)  is  taking  urgent  action  to 
obtain  the  best  scientific  information  that  is  useful  to  Congress,  stakeholders,  the 
media,  and  the  general  public.  CCSP  was  announced  in  February  2002  and  by  No-
vember  2002,  CCSP  published  a  Discussion  Draft  Strategic  Plan  for  public  review. 
After holding an international workshop and considering comments from a National 
Academy of Sciences review and the public, CCSP released its revised 10-year Stra-
tegic  Plan  in  July  2003.  This  strategic  plan  describes  a  strategy  for  developing 
knowledge  of  variability  and  change  in  climate  and  related  environmental  and 
human  systems,  and  for  encouraging  the  application  of  knowledge.  The  plan  also 
identifies  21  Synthesis  and  Assessment  products  to  fulfill  the  assessment  required 
by  statute.  Modifications  have  been  made  to  the  list  of  21  products,  with  the  prod-
ucts required by law scheduled for completion by 2007. 

While  much  of  the  focus  from  Congress  and  the  media  has  been  on  the  21 
deliverables,  the  CCSP  agencies  continue  to  publish  hundreds  of  papers  each  year 
that  deepen  our  understanding  of  climate  science.  These  papers  are  referenced  in 
Our  Changing  Planet.  We  take  climate  change  very  seriously,  and  we  are  aggres-
sively working to deliver our findings to Congress and the public in a timely manner 
without compromising the scientific process. 

Question 3. The Washington Post recently reported that the White House’s Coun-
cil of Environmental Quality has been altering the scientific reports. Many are con-
cerned that this type of altering will only seek to undermine and destroy the credi-
bility  of  the  not  only  the  Climate  Change  Science  Program,  but  all  Federal  science 
programs. How do you respond to such criticisms? 

Answer.  CCSP  documents  are  produced  through  a  customary  interagency  review 
process.  The  thirteen  CCSP  agencies  (U.S.  Agency  for  International  Development; 
Department of Agriculture; Department of Commerce, National Oceanic and Atmos-
pheric Administration and National Institute of Standards and Technology; Depart-
ment  of  Defense;  Department  of  Energy;  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Serv-
ices,  National  Institutes  of  Health;  Department  of  State;  Department  of  Transpor-
tation;  Department  of  the  Interior,  U.S.  Geological  Survey;  Environmental  Protec-
tion  Agency;  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration;  National  Science 
Foundation;  and  the  Smithsonian  Institution),  the  Council  on  Environmental  Qual-
ity, the Office of Management and Budget, and the Office of Science and Technology 
Policy, and other offices as necessary review draft documents and propose edits that 
range  from  corrections  of  grammatical  errors  to  suggestions  for  insertions  or  dele-
tions of text. The comments and suggested revisions are considered by CCSP Office 
scientific  staff  working  under  the  supervision  of  the  CCSP  Director  or  directly  by 
the  CCSP  Director.  Subsequently  revised  drafts  are  prepared  and  these  drafts  are 
again circulated for final clearance and release. As Director of the CCSP, I have had 
final  authority  over  the  editorial  process  and  the  approved  content  of  all  CCSP  re-
ports disseminated since 2002. 

We do not view the edits proposed by CEQ as alterations of a document, but rath-
er  suggestions  made  through  a  review  process  that  may  or  may  not  appear  in  the 
final version of the document. 

Question  4.  There  has  been  a  lot  of  controversy  concerning  the  ‘‘hockey  stick’’  or 
the  1,000  year  temperature  record  for  the  Northern  Hemisphere  over  the  past  few 
months.  Chairman  Barton  of  the  House  Energy  and  Commerce  Committee  has  re-
quested  an  extraordinary  amount  of  information  from  the  individual  scientists  who 
develop the temperature record. Others, including Dr. Cicerone, have criticized this 
request for information as an attack on the individual scientists. As head of the Cli-
mate  Change  Science  Program,  what  are  your  views  of  the  technical  merits  of  the 
‘‘hockey stick?’’ 

Answer. The scientific conclusion that climate change, or more specifically ‘‘global 
warming,’’  has  been  observed  rests  in  part  on  analysis  of  surface  temperature 
records.  A  1998  study  (Mann  et  al.,  1998)  reconstructed  temperatures  using  a  com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

bination  of  instrumental  records  and  proxy  data  derived  from  tree  rings,  ice  cores, 
and corals, and concluded that warming during the 20th century was unprecedented 
in  the  last  600  years.  The  resulting  curve  of  surface  temperature  plotted  over  time 
resembles  a  hockey  stick  laid  on  its  side.  That  conclusion,  which  was  extended  to 
the  last  1,000  years  in  subsequent  studies,  figured  prominently  in  the  2001  IPCC 
Third  Assessment  Report  and  seemed  to  mark  a  turning  point  in  the  scientific  de-
bate about climate change. 

Two  Canadian  researchers  (MacIntyre  and  McKitrick,  2005)  criticized  the  Mann 
et  al.  study  on  a  number  of  grounds.  Their  reanalysis  of  the  Mann  et  al.  data  con-
cluded  that  the  14th  century  was  roughly  as  warm  as  the  20th  century  and  hence 
that  current  temperatures  are  not  unique,  as  Mann  et  al.  concluded.  In  addition, 
MacIntyre  and  McKitrick  said  that  Mann  et  al.  used  data  that  biased  the  results 
toward  the  ‘‘hockey  stick’’  shape.  Subsequently,  Mann  has  been  accused  of  filtering 
data,  and  MacIntyre  and  McKitrick  have  been  accused  of  using  ‘‘bad’’  (no  quality 
control) data. 

A  number  of  additional  studies  have  been  conducted  since  the  original  Mann  et 
al.  study,  some  extending  the  analysis  even  further  back  in  time  and  some  using 
different techniques in both use of the data and the analytic methods. 

Two  key  differences  among  the  studies  relate  to  the  answers  they  provide  to  the 

following questions: 

(1) Is the warming trend observed in the 20th century unique? Specifically, was 
a period in the Medieval Period as warm or warmer? 
(2) How much has temperature varied naturally? 

Subsequent analyses have been conducted. Rutherford et al. (2005) is an updated 
version of the Mann et al. (1998) analysis and includes the Mann et al. (1998) team 
as  co-authors.  Moberg  et  al.  (2005)  uses  a  completely  different  analysis  technique 
called  wavelet  decomposition  and  reconstruction,  a  time  series  signal  processing 
technique  frequently  used  in  telecommunications.  Rutherford  et  al.  (2005)  and 
Moberg  et  al.  (2005)  both  support  the  Mann  et  al.  (1998)  conclusion  that  the  late 
20th  century  is  anomalous  in  the  context  of  the  last  millennium.  As  stated  by 
Moberg et al., ‘‘We find no evidence for any earlier periods in the last two millennia 
with  warmer  conditions  than  the  post-1990  period—in  agreement  with  previous 
similar  studies.’’  Moberg  et  al.,  believe  that  the  main  implication  of  their  study  is 
that  ‘‘natural  multicentennial  climate  variability  may  be  larger  than  commonly 
thought, . . . [although] this does not imply that the global warming of the last few 
decades has been caused by natural forcing factors alone. . . .’’ There are secondary 
controversies  over  the  ‘‘medieval  warm  period’’  and  the  ‘‘little  ice  age’’  (this  is  not 
new,  see  Hughes  and  Diaz  1994),  but  no  controversy  remains  on  the  late  20th  cen-
tury anomalous warming. 

As  Director  of  CCSP,  I  feel  that  the  Mann  et  al.  reconstruction  is  one  of  many 
that are broadly consistent with a finding of unusual warming in the late 20th cen-
tury.  I  also  note  that  this  type  of  debate  is  the  result  of  a  sound  scientific  process 
whereby  there  is  encouragement  of  varying  scientific  ideas.  The  scientific  commu-
nity  does  not  often  ‘‘walk  in  step’’  and  we  often  find  that  continued  probing  with 
different processes may yield divergent results. 
References: 
Hughes, M.K. and Diaz, H.F., 1994. Was there a ‘Medieval Warm Period’ and if so, 

where and when? Climate Change 26: 109–142. 

Mann, M.E., R.S. Bradley, and M.K. Hughes, Global-scale temperature patterns and 

climate forcing over the past six centuries, Nature, 392, 779–787, 1998. 

Mann,  M.E.,  R.S.  Bradley,  and  M.K.  Hughes,  Northern  Hemisphere  Temperatures 
During the Past Millennium: Inferences, Uncertainties, and Limitations, Geo-
physical Research Letters, 26, 759–762, 1999. 

McIntyre,  S.  and  McKitrick,  R.,  2005.  The  M&M  critique  of  the  MBH98  Northern 
Hemisphere climate index: updata and implications. Energy and Environment 
16:69–100. 

Moberg,  A.,  Sonechkin,  D.M.,  Holmgren,  Datsenko,  N.M.,  and  Karlen,  W.,  2005. 
Highly  variable  Northern  Hemisphere  temperatures  reconstructed  from  low- 
and high-resolution proxy data. Nature 443:613–617 (10-Feb–2005). 

Rutherford, S., Mann, M.E., Osborn, T.J., Bradley, R.S., Briffa, K.R., Hughes, M.K., 
Jones,  P.D.,  2005,  Proxy-based  Northern  Hemisphere  Surface  Temperature 
Reconstructions:  Sensitivity  to  Methodology,  Predictor  Network,  Target  Sea-
son and Target Domain, Journal of Climate, (in press, July 2005 issue). 

Question  5.  Obviously,  we  have  a  difference  of  opinion  as  to  when  the  next  na-
tional assessment is due. You stated in your July 15, 2005 letter to me, you request 
that the Congress recognize the year 2007 as the required completion date for those 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

products  required  by  the  section  106  of  the  Global  Change  Research  Act  of  1990. 
Why  should  we  accept  this  date  when  the  U.S.  Global  Change  Research  Program’s 
website  still  indicate  the  previous  assessment  was  submitted  to  the  President  and 
Congress  in  November  2000?  This  is  also  the  date  the  GAO  indicated  in  its  April 
14, 2005 report. 

Answer.  The  CCSP  Strategic  Plan  was  published  in  July  2003  and  in  the  plan 
we identified 21 Synthesis and Assessment Products, that would fulfill the require-
ments for an updated assessment contained in Section 106 of the Global Change Re-
search  Act,  to  be  delivered  4  years  from  the  release  of  the  plan  or  2007.  We  used 
our  resources  to  develop  the  plan  in  2002  and  2003  and  provide  direction  to  the 
scope and breadth of the program and its deliverables. We have since begun the pro-
duction  of  the  Synthesis  and  Assessment  Products  as  well  as  continue  publishing 
papers, many of which will be considered during the development of these products. 
As previously stated, we have had to make some modifications to the schedule of 
some products due to some administrative issues as well as an underestimate of the 
complexity and scope of the development of the products. In the July 15, 2005 letter, 
we  requested  that  Congress  consider  establishing  a  longer  cycle  for  future  assess-
ments, to be prepared under the provisions of the GCRA, which reflects the increas-
ing  complexity  of  climate  science  and  related  information.  We  note  that  the  Inter-
governmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  has  adopted  a  six-year  cycle  for  its  Fourth 
Assessment Report. 

Question  6.  The  Administration  has  worked  with  other  nations  to  develop  an  im-
plementation  plan  for  the  Global  Earth  Observation  System  of  Systems.  Can  you 
discuss the coordination of this implementation plan with the Strategic Plan for the 
Science program? 

Answer.  Chapter  12  of  the  Climate  Change  Science  Program’s  (CCSP)  Strategic 
Plan of July 2003 [http://climatescience.gov/Library/stratplan2003/final/] lays out 
the basis for a climate observing system strategy in the U.S. that is based upon sev-
eral  key  Global  Climate  Observing  System  (GCOS)  documents.  GCOS  is  an  inter-
national  program  sponsored  by  the  World  Meteorological  Organization  (WMO),  the 
Intergovernmental  Oceanographic  Commission  (IOC),  the  United  Nations  Environ-
ment Program (UNEP), and the International Council for Science (ICSU), and forms 
the  climate  component  of  the  Global  Earth  Observation  System  of  Systems 
(GEOSS). In addition to being sponsors of GCOS, the WMO, IOC, UNEP, and ICSU 
are also part of the GEOSS process. 

In  setting  forth  the  CCSP’s  climate  observing  system  priorities,  as  stated  in  the 
CCSP  Strategic  Plan,  the  guiding  document  has  been  the  GCOS  Second  Adequacy 
Report,  April  2003  [http://www.wmo.ch/web/gcos/gcoshome.html]  table  of  ‘‘Essen-
tial Climate Variables’’ as a baseline of required observables for climate. The GCOS 
Second  Adequacy  Report  was  developed  by  an  international  panel  of  scientists,  in-
cluding  several  in  the  U.S.,  and  this  scientific  document  forms  the  basis  for  the 
GCOS  Implementation  Plan  of  October  2004  [http://www.wmo.ch/web/gcos/ 
gcoshome.html].  If  fully  implemented,  the  GCOS  Implementation  Plan  will  provide 
most  of  the  observations  of  Essential  Climate  Variables.  This  plan  is  in  response 
to  the  GCOS  Second  Adequacy  Report  and  has  considered  existing  global,  regional, 
and  national  plans,  programs  and  initiatives.  The  implementation  plan  was  devel-
oped  in  consultation  with  a  broad  and  representative  range  of  scientists  and  data 
users,  and  included  an  open  review  of  the  implementation  plan.  Review  occurred 
both within CCSP, through the Observations Working Group, and at workshops or-
ganized  by  the  ad  hoc  Interagency  Working  Group  on  Earth  Observations,  IWGEO 
(now  the  U.S.  Group  on  Earth  Observations).  The  plan  identifies  implementation 
priorities,  resource  requirements  and  funding  options,  and  includes  indicators  for 
measuring progress in implementation and is fully aligned with the CCSP Strategic 
Plan. 

The  goal  of  the  GCOS  Implementation  Plan  is  to  specify  the  actions  required  to 
implement  a  comprehensive  observing  system  for  the  Essential  Climate  Variables 
that would, if fully implemented provide for: 

• Global coverage. 
• Free and unrestricted exchange and availability of observations of the Essential 
Climate Variables required for global-scale climate monitoring in support of the 
UNFCCC. 

• The availability of integrated global climate-quality products. 
• Improvements  to  and  maintenance  of  the  global  in  situ  surface  and  airborne 
networks and satellites required to sustain these products, including system im-
provements and capacity building in developing countries, especially in the least 
developed countries and small island developing states. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

• Internationally  accepted  standards  for  data  and  products  especially  in  the  ter-
restrial domain and adherence to the GCOS Climate Monitoring Principles. 
• Characterization of the state of the global climate system and its variability. 
• Monitoring of the forcing of the climate system, including both natural and an-
• Support for the attribution of the causes of climate change. 
• Support for the prediction of global climate change. 
• Projecting  global  climate  change  information  down  to  regional  and  local  scales. 
• Characterizing extreme events important in impact assessment and adaptation, 

thropogenic contributions. 

and to the assessment of risk and vulnerability. 

As  the  U.S.  plan  for  climate  observations  moves  forward,  we  strive  to  build  on 
the GCOS Implementation Plan by addressing priority elements over the near-term 
(2–4  years);  mid-term  (4–7  years),  and  long-term  (7–10  years),  which  are  in  line 
with the goals of the CCSP Strategic Plan. 

Furthermore,  GCOS  is  the  climate  component  of  the  Global  Earth  Observation 
System  of  Systems  (GEOSS).  Understanding,  Assessing,  Predicting,  Mitigating  and 
Adapting to Climate Variability and Change has been identified as one of the 9 soci-
etal benefits of the Global Earth Observation System of Systems. As the implemen-
tation plan states: 

‘‘The climate has impacts in each of the other eight societal benefit areas. Cop-
ing  with  climate  change  and  variability  demands  good  scientific  understanding 
based on sufficient and reliable observations. GEOSS outcomes will enhance the 
capacity to model, mitigate, and adapt to climate change and variability. Better 
understanding of the climate and its impacts on the Earth system, including its 
human and economic aspects, will contribute to improved climate prediction and 
facilitate  sustainable  development  while  avoiding  dangerous  perturbations  to 
the climate system.’’ 

The need for enhanced observations was clearly identified in the Climate Change 
Strategic Plan as a necessity for understanding the science underlying climate vari-
ability and change. 

As  a  participant  in  the  National  Science  and  Technology  Council’s  committee 
structure which develops the U.S. input into the international process to implement 
GEOSS, the Climate Change Science Program contributed to the development of the 
GEOSS Implementation Plan to ensure the two were consistent. 

2006? 

Question 7. What is the status of the Our Changing Planet report for Fiscal Year 

Answer.  Our  Changing  Planet  for  Fiscal  Year  2006,  was  published  November  9, 
2005.  Copies  were  distributed  to  the  office  of  every  Member  of  the  House  and  the 
Senate,  and  to  relevant  majority  and  minority  staff  of  key  Committees  in  both 
Houses.  The  document  is  also  being  widely  distributed  within  the  global  climate 
science  community.  It  is  available  on  the  CCSP  website,1 and  CDs  are  being  pre-
pared for distribution to include the full document. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

DR. RALPH J. CICERONE 

Question 1. I am very disturbed by the mounting series of attacks on science and 
scientists  in  recent  years.  I  appreciate  your  recent  suggestion  to  an  independent 
panel to help settle scientific disputes. Do you think a permanent non-partisan con-
gressional office of science could be effective in settling these disputes? 

Answer.  The  National  Academies  have  long  recommended  a  permanent  non  par-
tisan office of science and technology advice to the Congress. It did so when the old 
Office of Technology was created in the early 1970s, and also recommended against 
its closure in 1994. We think such an office would have many benefits and continue 
to think so now. 

Question  2.  During  the  Energy  Bill  debate,  I  offered  an  amendment  to  protect 
agency reports that were based on peer-reviewed science from being tampered with. 
I was unable to get a vote on my amendment. Is there a role for the National Acad-
emy of Sciences in countering this trend of the politicization of science? 

Answer.  The  National  Academies  have  made  a  number  of  recommendations  con-
cerning  the  structure  of  the  peer  review  system  over  the  last  twenty  years.  How-

1 http://www.climatescience.gov. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

ever, since we are not a governmental entity, it is difficult for us to actually govern 
the actions of government. We can only give advice. 

Question  3.  Recent  press  accounts  have  reported  that  the  2001  National  Assess-
ment entitled, ‘‘Climate Change Impacts on the United States, ‘‘ published by Cam-
bridge University Press, is being removed from all documents and reports generated 
by the United States Climate Change Science Program (CCSP). The CCSP recently 
asked  the  National  Research  Council  (NRC)  to  conduct  a  comparative  analysis  of 
lessons  learned  from  prior  assessments.  Will  the  2001  National  Assessment  be  in-
cluded  in  this  NRC  study?  I  would  like  to  see  the  full  task  list  and  related  docu-
ments regarding this analysis, including the original proposal. 

Answer.  The  NRC  will  be  beginning  to  look  at  the  use  of  climate  assessments, 
which  will  include  the  2001  National  Assessment.  The  task  statement  for  that 
project is as follows: 

‘‘An  ad  hoc  committee  will  seek  to  identify  lessons  learned  from  past  assess-
ments  to  guide  future  global  change  assessment  activities  of  the  U.S.  Climate 
Change  Science  Program  (CCSP).  The  study  will  be  approached  in  two  steps. 
(1)  The  committee  will  conduct  a  comparative  analysis  of  past  assessments  that 
have stated objectives similar to those of the CCSP. Specifically, the committee will 
examine the strengths and weaknesses of selected past assessments in the following 
areas: 

confidence limits; 

and review of assessment products; 

• establishing clear rationales and appropriate institutional structures; 
• designing and scheduling assessment activities; 
• involving the scientific community and other relevant experts in the preparation 
• engaging the potential users of assessment products; 
• accurately and effectively communicating scientific knowledge, uncertainty, and 
• guiding plans for future global change research activities, including observation, 
• creating assessment products that are valued by their target audiences. 
(2)  The  committee  will  identify  approaches  (in  terms  of  geographic  scale,  scope, 
assessment entity, and timing) and products that are most effective for meeting the 
CCSP’s stated objectives for assessments.’’ 

monitoring, and modeling of past and future changes; and 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

DANIEL A. REIFSNYDER 

Question. The G8 Summit statement claimed that there is uncertainty with regard 
to  global  warming,  but  at  the  same  time,  the  U.S.  and  10  other  National  Academy 
of Sciences issued this statement. 

‘‘The  U.S.  National  Academy  of  Sciences  joined  10  other  national  science  acad-
emies  today  in  calling  on  world  leaders,  particularly  those  of  the  G8  countries 
meeting  next  month  in  Scotland,  to  acknowledge  that  the  threat  of  climate 
change is clear and increasing, to address its causes, and to prepare for its con-
sequences.’’ National Academy of Sciences—June 7, 2005. 

Isn’t  there  a  serious  intellectual  gap  between  what  the  scientists  are  saying  and 
what  the  G8  leaders  are  willing  to  say?  Using  energy  efficiency  measures  alone, 
IBM,  DuPont,  Bayer  and  three  other  corporate  giants  have  reduced  their  carbon 
emissions by 60 percent since the early 1990s, while at the same time growing busi-
ness.  What  data  supports  the  Administration’s  claim  that  mandatory  carbon  reduc-
tions will harm businesses and our economy? 

Answer. No, there is no gap between what the scientists are saying and what the 
G8 leaders said at Gleneagles. In their statement on Climate Change, Clean Energy 
and Sustainable Development, G8 leaders said: 

‘‘Climate  change  is  a  serious  and  long-term  challenge  that  has  the  potential  to 
affect  every  part  of  the  globe.  We  know  that  increased  need  and  use  of  energy 
from  fossil  fuels,  and  other  human  activities,  contribute  in  large  part  to  in-
creases  in  greenhouse  gases  associated  with  warming  of  the  Earth’s  surface. 
While  uncertainties  remain  in  our  understanding  of  climate  science,  we  know 
enough  to  act  now  to  put  ourselves  on  a  path  to  slow  and,  as  the  science  justi-
fies, stop then reverse the growth of greenhouse gases.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

68 

The Academy report encapsulates the diverse views of the many distinguished sci-
entists  that  served  on  the  panel.  While  significant  gaps  remain  in  our  under-
standing of climate change, many of them described in the Academy report, we are 
taking  steps  now  to  address  the  factors  that  contribute  to  it,  in  a  serious  and  sen-
sible way. 

The G8 Summit highlighted that the issue of climate change is a part of an inter-
related  set  of  challenges  dealing  with  energy  security,  economic  development,  and 
air  pollution.  The  climate  document  frames  the  issue  in  those  terms  and  contains 
a  concrete  set  of  actions  and  initiatives  that  the  G8  have  agreed  upon  to  advance 
work cooperatively in advancing our objectives in those interrelated areas. 

The  Gleneagles  outcomes  are  fully  consistent  with  our  longstanding  approach  of 
practical, cost-effective actions in the near term along with substantial, strategic in-
vestments in key longer-term technologies. Moreover, they highlight the interrelated 
nature of energy security, climate change and other sustainable development issues. 
The  plan  puts  climate  change  in  the  context  of  broader  sustainable  development 
goals, a key United States priority. 

The  Administration  applauds  the  private  sector  for  looking  at  ways  to  continue 
to apply technologies to addressing climate change. This demonstrates how the pri-
vate  sector  is  able  to  identify  and  take  advantage  of  opportunities  that  offer  both 
financial benefits and address other issues such as reducing air pollution and green-
house gas emissions while diversifying sources of energy. 

It is widely acknowledged that the mandatory carbon limits for the United States 
contained in the Kyoto Protocol would have required at least a 30 percent reduction 
in U.S. greenhouse gas emissions from the level that would otherwise have obtained 
in  the  2008–2012  time  period,  with  significant  implications  for  the  U.S.  economy. 
Examples of the projected impacts in the U.S. economy can be found in many stud-
ies, including: 

• Management  Information  Services  Inc.  (MISI),  Potential  Economic  Impacts  of 
the Kyoto Climate Change Protocol on Blacks and Hispanics in the U.S. (Wash-
ington,  D.C.:  MISI,  June  2000) 
(http://www.nationalbcc.org/downloads/ 
MISIStudy.pdf). 

• Energy Information Administration, I Analysis of the Impacts of an Early Start 
for  Compliance  with  the  Kyoto  Protocol,  SR/OIAF/99–02  (Washington,  D.C., 
July 1999). (http://www.eia.doe.gov/oiaf/kyoto3/pdf/sroiaf9902.pdf). 

• Charles  River  and  Associates,  The  Post  Kyoto  Climate:  Impacts  on  the  U.S. 

Economy (Washington, D.C.: Charles River and Associates, 1999). 

• Energy  Information  Administration,  Impacts  of  the  Kyoto  Protocol  on  U.S.  En-
ergy  Markets  and  Economic  Activity,  SR/OIAF/98–03  (Washington,  D.C.,  Octo-
ber 1998). (http://www.eia.doe.gov/oiaf/kyoto/pdf/sroiaf9803.pdf). 

• WEFA,  Inc.,  Global  Warming:  The  High  Costs  of  the  Kyoto  Protocol,  National 

and State Impacts (Washington, D.C.: WEFA, 1998). 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

DAVID W. CONOVER 

Question.  Most  of  the  reductions  in  carbon  emissions  so  far  have  resulted  from 
corporations  who  invest  in  renewables  and  conservation,  yet  the  President’s  budget 
would cut funding for both renewable energy and energy conservation by nearly $50 
million. Could you explain the rationale for these cuts? 

Answer.  The  Administration’s  R&D  investment  criteria  help  guide  2006  Budget 
decisions. The Fiscal Year 2006 request reduces or closes out several program efforts 
that were identified as complete (e.g., Hydropower Program) or have reached a point 
where Federal funding for some program activities is no longer appropriate (e.g., In-
dustrial Technologies Program). We have focused our research, development and de-
ployment funds on projects that will most cost-effectively help us achieve public ben-
efits  (such  as  reduced  energy  consumption  or  energy  costs)  that  the  private  sector 
would  not  undertake  on  its  own.  Also,  excessive  Congressional  earmarks  in  renew-
able energy programs have slowed many programs’ technological progress. 

It  is  important  to  note  that  the  President’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  request  also 
included $3.6 billion in tax incentives to deploy energy efficiency and renewable en-
ergy technologies. These incentives included credits for residential solar heating sys-
tems,  the  purchase  of  hybrid  and  fuel  cell  vehicles,  energy  produced  from  landfill 
gas, electricity produced from alternative energy sources such as wind and biomass, 
and combined heat and power systems. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

DAVID W. CONOVER 

Question  1.  In  a  2003  report,  the  Government  Accountability  Office  found  that 
this  Administration  had  no  plans  to  generate  an  interim  report  on  progress  toward 
its  2012  greenhouse  gas  intensity  reduction  goal.  Without  this  report,  GAO  noted 
that the Administration would have no means of gauging its success in meeting its 
stated goals until its Climate Change Initiative was a decade old. Do you have plans 
to assess progress in the interim? 

Answer.  Under  the  provisions  of  the  U.N.  Framework  Convention  on  Climate 
Change (UNFCCC), the United States periodically prepares and submits a ‘‘national 
communication’’  detailing  its  activities  in  support  of  the  Framework  Convention. 
These  reports  provide  detailed  information  on  GHG  inventories,  policies  and  meas-
ures  taken  to  limit  or  remove  GHG  emissions,  the  estimated  mitigation  impacts  of 
these policies and measures, and their projected impacts on future emissions, among 
other  information.  An  interagency  process  is  underway  to  develop  the  fourth  U.S. 
national communication, which the Administration plans to submit to the UNFCCC 
sometime  next  year.  This  and  subsequent  national  assessments  will  help  the  Ad-
ministration and the Congress assess our progress. 

Question 2. If so, are your voluntary programs on track to achieve the 18 percent 

reduction in greenhouse gas intensity? 

Answer. Yes. The President’s 18 percent intensity goal represents an average an-
nual  rate  of  improvement  off  about  2.0  percent  (compounded)  over  the  ten-year  pe-
riod.  Recent  data  suggest  that  we  are  making  good  progress  in  achieving  this  goal. 
According  to  the  Energy  Information  Administration’s  (EIA)  Emissions  of  Green-
house  Gases  in  the  United  States  2003,  the  GHG  emissions  intensity  of  the  U.S. 
economy was 2.3 percent lower in 2003 than in 2002. The report said: 

‘‘U.S. emissions of greenhouse gases in 2003 totaled . . . 0.7 percent more than 
in  2002.  . . .  The  U.S.  economy  grew  by  3.0  percent  in  2003,  which  is  equiva-
lent to the average annual growth rate that has prevailed during the 1990–2003 
period.  Consequently,  U.S.  greenhouse  gas  intensity  (greenhouse  gas  emissions 
per  unit  of  real  economic  output)  was  2.3  percent  lower  in  2003  than  in  2002.’’ 
[http://www.eia.doe.gov/oiaf/1605/ggrpt/index.html]. 

This is 0.3 percentage points better than the annual rate of improvement needed 

goal? 

to meet President Bush’s objective. 

Moreover,  in  June  2005,  EIA  released  it  2004  ‘‘flash  estimate’’  of  energy-related 
GHG emissions—which account for about 83 percent of total U.S. GHG emissions— 
and  reported  an  improvement  in  the  energy-related  carbon  intensity  of  the  U.S. 
economy  of  2.6  percent  [http://www.eia.doe.gov/oiaf/1605/flash/flash.ppt].  These 
EIA  carbon  emissions  data  suggest  that  we  are  maintaining  an  annual  rate  of  im-
provement greater than that needed to achieve the President’s goal. 

Question  3.  How  is  the  Administration  tracking  progress  annually  toward  this 

Answer. The Administration is able to track general progress in meeting its over-
all  goal  of  an  18  percent  reduction  in  greenhouse  gas  (GHG)  emissions  intensity 
using publicly available emissions, sequestration/sinks data, and economic data. 

EIA publishes an annual report on greenhouse gas emissions, Emissions of Green-
house Gases in the United States, usually in December. EIA also provides estimates 
of  energy-related  carbon  emissions  in  flash  estimates  based  on  preliminary  energy 
data,  and  its  Annual  Energy  Outlook  presents  projections  of  energy-related  carbon 
emissions. 

The  Environmental  Protection  Agency’s  U.S.  Emissions  Inventory  reports,  pub-
lished  annually  each  April,  provides  a  very  detailed  and  comprehensive  look  at  the 
U.S. GHG emissions, individual greenhouse gases, emissions from specific economic 
and industrial sectors, emissions trends, removals and sinks, and factors that affect 
changes in emissions. The data used to produce this report are derived from a num-
ber of agencies and organizations. Economic data from the Department of Commerce 
is  used  to  the  measure  GHG  emissions  intensity,  which  is  calculated  as  emissions 
per unit of economic output. 

Question  4.  GAO  has  also  reported,  and  the  Administration  has  confirmed,  that 
emissions  intensity  reductions  will  still  result  in  increased  annual  emissions.  How 
much  has  greenhouse  gas  intensity  decreased  (or  increased)  since  2002  and  what 
does  this  translate  to  in  terms  of  reducing  or  increasing  emissions  of  greenhouse 
gases  since  2002?  How  much  have  greenhouse  gas  emissions  increased  annually 
since 2000? What are projected emissions levels in 2012? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

Answer. From 2002 to 2003, total net U.S. GHG emissions intensity decreased 2.3 
percent.  Although  total  GHG  data  are  not  yet  available  for  2004,  preliminary  EIA 
data  show  an  improvement  in  energy-related  carbon  emissions  intensity  of  2.6  per-
cent  (see  the  response  to  Question  2).  Given  that  energy-related  carbon  emissions 
represent about 83 percent of total GHG emissions, it is unlikely that the improve-
ment in total GHG intensity for 2004 will differ appreciably from this figure, absent 
significant revisions to the underlying energy consumption data. 

Between 2002 and 2003 (the most recent year for which data are available), total 
GHG  emissions  grew  0.7  percent,  rising  from  6,031.6  to  6,072.2  MMTCO2 [http:// 
yosemite.epa.gov/oar/globalwarming.nsf/UniqueKeyLookup/RAMR5CZKVE/$File/ 
ghgbrochure.pdf].  EIA  data  for  energy-related  carbon  emissions  are  available 
through  2004.  From  5,746  MMTCO2 in  2002,  carbon  emissions  rose  to  5,796 
MMTCO2 in 2003 (an annual increase of 0.9 percent) and to 5,896 MMTCO2 in 2004 
(an  annual  increase  of  1.7  percent)  [http://www.eia.doe.gov/oiaf/1605/flash/ 
flash.ppt]. 

Total  net  GHG  emissions  from  2000  to  2003  decreased  at  an  annual  rate  of  0.3 
percent  owing  primarily  to  a  large  decline  in  emissions  in  2001  caused  by  a  weak 
economy 
[http://yosemite.epa.gov/oar/globalwarming.nsf/UniqueKeyLookup/RAM 
R5CZKVE/$File/ghgbrochure.pdf].  EIA  energy-related  carbon  emissions  data  are 
available through 2004. Over the 2000 to 2004 period, these emissions increased by 
an  average  of  0.4  percent  per  year  [http://www.eia.doe.gov/oiaf/1605/flash/ 
flash.ppt]. 

Projections  of  total  GHG  emissions  out  to  2012  will  be  included  in  the  U.S.  na-
tional communication to the UNFCCC, which is now being prepared. The last (third) 
U.S. national communication, issued in 2002, included projections of total net GHG 
emissions of 6,972 MMTCO2 in 2010 and 7,604 MMTCO2 in 2015 [http://unfccc.int/ 
resource/docs/natc/usnc3.pdf].  More  recently,  ETA’s  Annual  Energy  Outlook  2005 
reference  case  projects  energy-related  carbon  emissions  of  6,812  MMTCO2 in  2012 
[http://www.eia.doe.gov/oiaf/aeo/pdf/aeotabl18.pdf]. 

Question  5.  Could  you  please  provide  the  Committee  with  documentation  for  the 

intensity reduction and total emissions figures? 

Answer.  Web  links  to  data  sources  have  been  provided  in  the  response  to  each 

question. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:56 Nov 22, 2010 Jkt 062359 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62359.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

